1
THE LORGNETTE.
MAY 10, NEW-YORK. SECOND SERIESNO. 1.
Mirandola
(II satiro si ander a poco a poco addomesticando.)
La Locandiera
.
Well
, Fritz, it is even true, that notwithstanding
my rusticity, I find myself approaching, little by
little, to a state of town domestication; and at the
earnest solicitation of my worthy bookseller, I am
led to resume my weekly observations, and even to
extend their influence, if influence they have, by
association with a large publishing house, which
will give to them a wide country circulation. It
is quite possible, therefore, that this may fall under
your eye at the house of your parson (if a
liberal-minded
person), or of your village attorney (if a
man of progress), even before you shall have broken
my private seal.
Nor shall my country readers be without their
share of aliment; for, to say nothing of the
approaching
season, when the town disgorges itself
upon the rural districts, and when safely I may
turn my glass upon our Nebuchadnezzar in the
fields, I shall allow myself from time to time a
rural diversion of remark; and the damp places of
our country society shall here and there serve to
wet my pencil; and the village gossips shall have
a relisher to their tea that will marvelously
quicken the point of their Souchong and
Gunpowder
talk.
Even the brusque, self-important, country
pettifogger
shall have his miniature set off in the
dainty
binding of a town-worker: and the fashionable
belles of the village, too delicate to be buxom, and
too buxom for the gas-lights of a Waverley Place
rout, shall have as truthful a daguerreotype as ever
was painted by the limner of the exquisite Eve
Effingham.
And as for the civilian turned loose, a little
careless
and very eccentric habit of travel will enable
me,Providence and the rheumatism willing,to
follow them to the ocean breezes of Nahant and
Newport, or to the sulphury mountain air of Sharon.
The town-ladies will find an old seven-league boot
set upon my heel, which will make me as untiring
in the chase of their charms, and perhaps as
romantic
in my adventure, as the Knight of La Mancha
upon his raw-boned Rosinante.
The French understand the
phisiologie du gout
,
as you know, and will throw in a basted partridge,
blanketed with pork, between the soberer courses
of a boiled meat and a
filet;
so I, Fritz, will spit
together on the same bundle of converging rays, a
squeamish town poetaster stuffed with garlic, and
a Broadway beauty gone wild in Schoharie or at
Lebanon. But as for the bill of fare setting forth
at length the name and family of the dishes, I shall
leave it to the happy
initial
graces of the Express
and Herald; and you must judge of the quality of
your meal, only by the taste and the spice of the
cookery.
It will astonish, doubtless, many very good
people
who are not believers either in Fourierism or
in the Rochester Knockings, to find John Timon so
ubiquitous in his flights as to be one week
sketching
in the city, the next brushing away the mists
from his glass in the spray of Niagara, and the
third moistening his ink-horn with the scum of the
beach at Long Branch. But let them quiet
themselves
;
John Timon is no necromancer; and
instead
of startling them with any narrative too
improbable
for belief, he will be far more apt to shock
them with the very homely truth of his stories. At
any rate, he is content to have his matter judged
by its agreement with fact; and when he throws
away his allegiance to truth, he will lease his pen
to the  newspaper. Or, should he wish to
maintain an appearance of gentility, though truth
is discarded, he will devote his mornings to politics,
his evenings to fashionable society, and relieve his
noons with a study of the portraits at the National
Academy.
MAY MOVINGS.
`If there be any such thing as destiny in the world, I know nothing
man is so predestinated to as to be eternally turning round.'
De Foe
.
I have
looked in vain, my dear Fritz, through the
chronicles of the city, from that of the venerable
Diedrich, to those of Mr. Dogget, Jr., to find any
historical account of the origin of the May
festivities
of this town. Almost every people has its way
of welcoming this most cheerful of months; and
you will remember how, in the remote districts of
England, the children, in their best dresses and
with happy faces, will crowd about one, with
pleasantly
1 *
spoken petitions, to loan a penny for the
May-pole
.
The festivities of our town are of a different
order
;
they do not smack at all of the old dance and
garlands. The population of children, in virtue,
as I am told, of an old custom, are upon May-day
homeless, and are wandering in a state of sad
vagabondage, up and down our streets, earnestly
petitioning the charitable passers-bynot for a
penny, but for a house.
The public roads are filled with a long procession
of spring vans, carrying immense piles of shabby
furniture; the walks are encumbered with
nursery-maids
in very dusty bonnets, carrying
thin-plated
mirrors tied up in a scurvy counterpane;
small boys groan along under the weight of
enormous
China vases, or Griffins; and family
portraits
,
never intended, surely, for any but the
indulgent
eyes of kindred, are carried modestly and
discreetly along the side streets. The parlors of
reception are given over to the possession of burly
and capless carmen, who spit tobacco juice upon
the polished grate, and whose heads are adorned,
in place of May garlands, with scattered flecks of
down. The hall-doors are flung hospitably open,
into which walk very distressed-looking women,
who are on that day anything but Queens of May.
Here and there, too, you may see a quiet
journeyman
cabinet-maker, in green baize jacket, passing
in at the hall door and gliding swiftly up the
stairway
to his May festivity, with a small tin pail of
varnish, or haply, an iron bed-key!
As for the town-lady, a month ago so courtly,
her empire is now dividednot alone with
extortionate
porters and tasteless upholsterers, but, what
is worsewith some new incoming mistress. You
have been rocked long enough, my dear Fritz, in
this rickety cradle of a world, to know what a
delightful
provocative to the festivities of the season
must be this joint lady-rule under a single roof!
Character, as you may well suppose, develops
very swiftly under this May ordeal; one poor
woman
,
in a frenzy of fear, may be seen hunting after
some dear little vase which has escaped notice in
the general onset, and which will, by-and-by,
perhaps
(to humor her good-nature), be found crushed
under some ponderous
armoire
. Another, with
cap-strings flying wide, and with faded shawl
pinned
in very dirk-like fashion, will general the whole
May movement with an air and gesture very
strongly
calculated to keep aloof any nervous husband,
or weak-limbed sons-in-law. A third will go into
husterics at the crash of some cherished bowl and
ewer, and between vexation and fatigue, will
persist
in imagining, notwithstanding the repeated
assurances
of the chamber-maid to the contrary, that
the world is near destruction, and that all
terrestrial
things are then and there, on that May-day,
rapidly passing into oblivion.
Out of respect to the season, meals at home, are
for the most part taken standing. A few Boston
crackers, with a delicate cut from a cold ham, and
a small bottle of London stout, are recommended.
At a late hour in the afternoon it is discovered
that the carmen have left something they should
have borne off in procession, and that they have taken
away still more that they should have left. Meantime
the scant, cool dinner humors the fatigue of being
much a-foot, and more provoked; and the evening
closes upon our blooming May queen, installed with
May festivity, in a May palace. This last is
curiously
set off with beds huddled into corners; and
the stewpans, and tea-kettles, are unfortunately, if
not irreparably lost, in the depths of some
subterrancan
vault.
Such, my dear Fritz, are a few hints thrown out,
to serve you as coloring matter, with which you
can work up at your leisure an imaginative
painting
of our town May-day. I think you will agree
that it is an odd way of celebration, and will scarce
wonder at my curiosity in searching the records for
its origin.
If it would not be immodest, I would
respectfully
suggest the topic to the New York Historical
Society, confident that it is one that will afford full
scope to those abilities for thorough and profound
investigation, which are possessed in so ample a
degree by nearly all the regularnot to mention
the honorary and correspondingmembers of that
distinguished Society. I might safely predict,
indeed
,
I think it could be affirmed with the utmost
confidence, that a paper upon the topic alluded to,
prepared in the usual form of the Historical
Society
papers, and read with characteristic
enunciation
,
could not fail to keep at least one-half of the
members of that association awake up to the end
of the recitation. And with an equal degree of
certitude it might be affirmed, that the author,
whoever he might be, would be unanimously
thanked
for his `very able paper,' and a copy be placed
in the archives of the association: and furthermore,
a report of the resolutions might be reasonably
expected
in the Express of the next morning,
provided
no `extraordinary disclosures' supervened.
Since, however, the Society above referred to has
failed thus far to throw light on this important
subject
,
I must even venture myself, Fritz, to try and
get at the causes of these strange movements of
May. Why they should occur at this particular
epoch of the year, is a matter of minor importance,
and may be safely left in the hands of the
Historical
gossips; why such movements should occur at
all is a more interesting inquiry, and one which in
my view, can only be settled by a reference to the
condition and character of our social progress.
In our town, the house, in common with the
coach and the coat, is a type, and a bold type, of
social position. As position is gained, or hoped to
be gained, the types must correspond. People
must not only get on in reputation, wealth, and in
society, but they must give ocular proof of their
progress, made palpable by houses, and publicly
demonstrated
at the fte of May. Furniture good
enough for a quiet housewife who cooks a small
grocer's dinner, and who, with the aid of a stout
Irish wench, is her own laundress, will never do,
when her grocer husband, by dint of shrewdness
and industry, is making a stir on 'Change; and if
new furniture is to be had, then there must be a
new house; and if a new house, then there must
be a move; and if a move, why thena May-day
fte!
Some small mechanic comes in to fill up the place
of the promoted grocer; and the grocer, perhaps,
fills the place of some advancing importer. Thus
wave upon wave is rolling along the drift-wood that
floats upon the sea of the town; and on May-day
the tide is at the flood. And it is a remarkable
fact, and one well worthy of the attention of
public
economists, that the movement is almost
invariably
from small quarters to large ones. This is
certainly most flattering to the enterprise of the
town; perhaps more flattering to our enterprise
than to our honesty. For I have observed that even
bankruptcies, or defalcations, do by no means create
exceptions to our general rule of progress, but on
the contrary, seem to have a manifest tendency to
aceclerate the advance. Indeed, from a careful
series of observations, I am almost persuaded to
believe
that a brilliant bankruptcy, well fastened, and
clipper-built, is one of the best craft on which to
scud over our waves of progress, into such elegant
harborage as Union Place, or Grammercy Park.
It does not yet appear to be settled upon any
Malthusian basis, what space is exigent to the
necessities of a family of a given size, or even of
given states: let the social rank be given, and the
calculation is easier. Though even here, the inquiry
is beset with difficulties; swift progress, contrary
to the law in mechanics, being understood to
require
more space than the slow, old-fashioned
advance
.
Thus, if a man rise fast, and by some
principle of progression which is not very patent,
he must needs have a big house; if he rise slowly,
and by healthful stages, a small one is quite
adequate
to his wants.
No plan, that I can learn of, has yet been laid
downnot even by the architect of the late
Bowling
Green fountain,as the
ne plus ultra
of a
town house. Vistas of constantly extending
parlors
,
and multiplying suites of rooms, mock the
judgment, and leave the inquirer, in this part of
the subject, in a state of sad perplexity. No limit,
indeed, can be safely predicated of our town houses,
except the length of a city square; and it would
not be very surprising, if some new aspirant after
position, with the requisite California credentials,
should presently build a modest mansion for
himself
and a small family, reaching from street to
street. The middle rooms (though my
architectural
observations are reserved for another paper),
might be lighted with wells sunk through the roof at
convenient distances, which would make pleasing
mementoes of the gold-pits, and would furthermore
serve the younger members of the family for
telescopic
purposes, and for prosecuting, in a domestic
way, sidereal observations.
In most other parts of the civilized world, a
certain
modicum of room, and of interior appliances,
are reckoned essential, and
complete
. A
well-defined
supply satisfies; and the social character is
based, not on such supply, but upon certain trivial
contingencies of private character,such as worth,
family, or even wealth. Many a man of fortune,
as you know, Fritz, who can command respect in
various ways, is at this very time occupying a suite
of rooms upon a single floor in the
Rue de Bac
,
who would disdain the dashing palaces of the
Chausse d'Antin
, or the Place St. George. A
cultivated
dignity is satisfied; a refined taste finds
space enough for its wants; and the home is
complete
.
You will recall, too, in this connection, (or
your memory misgives you) the rough brick walls
of many a modest mansion of London, not to be
named beside our free-stone palaces, and yet these
walls cover the gatherings of a delicate and
accomplished
judgment; they embrace the solution of
the most difficult of social problemsthat of
content
;
and they make the quadrature of the whole
circle of the home-pleasures complete.
But with the scions of our social nursing there
is no brick and mortar terminus, except superiority
to one's neighbor. And at the end, perhaps, our
discomfited aspirant, mortified with being
overshadowed
by some new house-builder, must fly
2
abroad, to escape that ennui which a position based
on houses and display would very naturally
create. In Europe, however, there is relief; the
harasses of change are no longer felt. His palaces
will not make for him position, and lack of them
will not make its forfeit. A quiet suite in the
Rue
Lavoisier
will be
enough:
and enough, even in the
city of fashion and of form, has its meaning. Good
sense has assigned to it limits, and prudence has
given it a reception. The man is relieved from
strife; and any vulgar show, whatever crowds it
may bring to his dinners, or whatever jewels it may
scatter over his evening receptions, will not
magnify
his repute with those who guage his character
with a knowing eye. For even French politesse,
though it may allow itself to drink applaudingly of
his
Volney
and
Latour
, cannot so far forget its sense
of truth, as to suppress a chuckle, and a
murmured
`
quelle sottise!
'
The sad conclusion which I am led to from this,
my dear Fritz, is the fact, that in our town, even
the comforts of a home are thoroughly conventional.
The acme of display may have been reached; but
what house-owner, or housewife, in ignorance of what
their neighbors may build, or an impending,
brilliant
bankruptcy may bestow, will say that they
have arrived at true comfort?
The man who holds, or has ever held fair social
position, and yet contents himself with a modest
house, must either be possessed of great moral
courage, or he must wear a conscience in his
bankruptcy
;
and these are two qualities, which in the
given connection, must be sought for in our town
as Diognes hunted for a manwith a lantern.
It would be pleasant, Fritz, to take you to the
auctions that belong to our May festival, and which
may be met with at every half dozen steps,
showing the last trace of the old May-pole,
decorated
with a little banner of red bunting. But the
girls who throng to this part of our festival are
mostly old girls, of a buxom race, who may be
found either seated about the apartments, or
diligently
feeling of the plush; and they are the most
indefatigable `snappers up' of shabby furniture
that can possibly be imagined. In what quarter
of the city they live, has never been satisfactorily
ascertained; it is conjectured, however, from the
style of their purchases, that they must be the
occupants
of some of the old Dutch houses with lofty
gables. They eye you very sharply if you bid
against them; they know to a dime the value of a
broken-legged table; and they are on very familiar
terms with chatty cabinet-makers. They wear
dingy bombazine, and faded shawls, and judging
from action and manner, (and this is not to
discredit
their husbands, who are too good subjects of
pity for anybody's sneers) probably `rule the
roast' at home.
There are some few meek ones, who are no
match for the
habitues
, and are restlessly nervous.
They are extremely anxious lest some particular
article should escape them; they are very sure to
show their anxiety to the penetrating auctioneer;
and astonishingly apt to raise their own bids.
Here and there, among the crowd of furniture
dealers, you will catch sight of some poor fellow,
who by his hang-dog walk, has evidently been
driven
to the auction by his wife's command, and who
is very fearful lest some of her strolling neighbors
should report his delinquencies at the bidding.
I have reported thus, Fritz, in very homely style
the peculiar show which we make of our May
festivities
.
Brush up now your recollections, and
compare these new-world sketches, these creaking
furniture vans, this change, bustle, and brooms,
with the sunny May-day that you have passed on
the bank of the Obye, under the gray ruin of
Chepstow
;or
with that luxuriousness of air and
action
,
which wrapped you round like a garment, as
you floated on a May-day, in your gleaming caque,
along the plashing waters of the Brazen Horn.
From all this, my dear Fritz, you will fish out
the moral, that change belongs eminently to our
American life;that the settled quietude of a ripe
civilization has not yet been reached;that we
have not yet learned well enough how to live, to
be sure when we are contented with the modes of
living; and that even the comforts of a home are
measured by space, material, and talk. And the
whole drift of these observations will go to
confirm
the remark of that sage historian, Diedrich
Knickerbocker, who says, in the third chapter of
that renowned work, which by German suffrage
has been put upon the same plane with that of
Thucydides,  `Our ancestors, like their
descendants
,
were very much given to outward show, and
noted for putting the best leg foremost.'
A WORD ABOUT THE POLKA AND POLKISTS.
`The gods have bestowed fortitude upon some men, and on others a
disposition for dancing.'
Hesiod
.
`
Si on ne valsait que pour valser, qui valserait
?'
Stahl
.
Steele
was the elegant apologist for dancing, in
his day; and a certain Mr. Jno. Weaver, who so
far worked himself into the good graces of the
Spectator
,
as to secure a puff for his book, was the
historian
of the dance. But in that time, with all
2*
their kissing cotillions, and Sir Roger de
Coverleys
,
they were not advanced enough for a
Polka.
This triumph of Terpsichorean art was reserved
for a more enlightened age, and has yet to secure
its classic historian, and its moral advocate. It is
surprising, indeed, that while we are in the
possession
of such poets as the author of Liberty's
Triumph, its evolutions are not moulded into an
epic; and there are moral and classic essayists about
the town, who would add hugely to their fame, by
letting slip their didactic periods upon a topic so
level to their qualities. And a book, of whatever
character, would only need a
bravura
from every
polkist, to make a din that would deafen the whole
town into acquiescence.
The rage, indeed, for the whole family of polkas
is most infectious; and not only has it taken
educational
possession of Misses who have not cast their
nursery strings, but it has smitten men grown
gouty; and ladies, who can scarce maintain their
hold upon the charitable side of forty, in the
intoxicating
eccentricity of the polka, revive their youth,
and in its pleasant delirium, cheerfully forget their
years. It has even made its appearance in the
streets, and at the circus; and the polkas made up,
for a long time, the musical stock of the performers
at the Anatomical Museum. Traces of the polka
movement may be seen even on the public walk,
and in the periodic and luxurious oscillations of the
figures of our belles at the Opera, and Grace
Church; the springy, elastic, and long-continued
salute of a lady seems to have its accomplishment
under the influence of a certain volatile, polka
element, which pervades the system, and gives a
well-timed, though highly-eccentric vibratory action
to the nerves. I cannot well say, but think it
highly probable, that the movement may have
found its way into domestic arrangements, and the
baby be lulled, the dumb waiter rise and fall, and
the cook stove rotatepolka-wise.
One or two strolling Italians have taught the
polka action, with great effect, to tame monkeys;
the hint should not be lost upon such young
gentlemen
as find, now that the ball season is over, their
occupation gone. And from not a little careful
observation, I am disposed to think that they would
meet with far greater success in the ring, than they
have ever found at the bar.
A new polka has latterly engrossed the attention
and study of our town ladies; and though some of
the old women, who are not apt to learn, are
condemning
it as a little too free in its movement, it is
all the more admired by the established belles. It
must be confessed, however, that a little prudery
is just now spreading among the young ladies;
gentlemen are absolutely required to withdraw
their arms from the waists of their partners within
three minutes after the close of the music; and
this upon penaltyof having to dance the next
set. Several of my acquaintances, in an access of
virtuous resolve, have sworn off from polking with
gentlemen they do not know, for the rest of the
season: this is not understood, however, to embrace
the watering-place campaign.
What the old gentlemen will do in time, I can
hardly imagine. A jig, or a cotillion, was not so
difficult a matter for them as to forbid their
wearing
a creditable air of agility. The polkas are too
eccentric; the whist-tables are scouted; and as for
standing about the walls, in imminent danger from
the dripping candles, and with corns cruelly
jammed
by those fellows who give effect to the music,
by an occasional thump with their heels, it is not
to be thought of.
Unfortunately for them, too, the Polkas are
rapidly multiplying; as much in eccentricity, as
in number. And after the success of the `Tip-top'
Polka, we shall look with interest for the
introduction
of a `How d'ye do' and a `Kiss me if you
can' Polka. There's nothing like novelty in an
accomplishment of this sort; and after dancing
one's breath out to an old tune, it is quite
surprising
how some fresh air will set a body going.
A little modest dance has been thrown in on
occasions
,
for
entracte
at the new Opera; but it
quite shies the matter; the man is too coy, and the
woman wears too many flounces, to make the affair
taking.
Touching the matter of polking, I have received
this
bijou
of a letter:
Mr. Timon
:I have read all you have written,
and like it very much. My mamma (for a wonder)
likes it too: so does Aunt Sophy. But they have
forbid my polking with strange gentlemen, at least
those who are introduced to me at the balls. Is
not this ridiculous?one meets such nice young
men at the balls, and nowhere else! I wish you
would persuade mamma so; if you could, you
would greatly oblige your true friend,
Terry
.
As I neither know the church, or the `set' of
my good-natured correspondent, I shall fling out a
few opinions of various complexion, by which her
mamma can help herself toward forming a
healthful
judgment, and fixing the line of duty beyond
all possible cavil.
The Presbyterian Elder abhors the Polka from
his soul, and thinks it a device of Satan, to carry
off souls in a whirl-a-gig. He has almost as bad
an idea of polka dancers, as of the polka itself.
He thinks dancing-masters emissaries of Belial,
who are supported by stated contributions from
the world of darkness. In short, he thinks nothing
more demoralizing in its tendency, unless it be the
fancies of the Ecclesiologists, or a cross upon a
church gable.
A mother of six daughters, and of easy
Religious
faith, encourages the polka, as she believes it
cultivates grace of limb, and brings young people
together into a proper degree of familiarity, which
may ripen into matrimonywhich is the true and
natural state of the human family, as there is no
denying.
A young lady of retiring habits is opposed to
the polka from principle, though she does not
object
to a stray turn with Cousin Harry. As she
doesn't take lessons, she is rather out of step,
which has a tendency to confirm her principle.
A stiff prigg, who smells of book-covers, sneers
at the polka as an absurdity, which no sensible
man would abandon himself to; and which puts a
person in a very ridiculous, not to say awkward
and embarrassing position.
The
debutante
is delighted with it, as one of the
most fascinating pursuits in life; and looks
forward
to a brilliant stretch of years, made bright
with thousands of interesting polkas.
A high church Divine looks upon the dance, as
scripturally emblematic of joy, and by natural
reasoning, regards the polka as ecclesiologically
emblematic
of ecstasy. He does not believe in
reducing
proprieties to abstract forms, without any of
the pleasing graces of typical attachments, and
well-ordered ceremonial. The white robes of the
dancers are clearly emblematic of innocence; and
as such will have efficacy, by virtue of association,
in screening the polkists from any impure thoughts
or desires; at least they ought to have such
efficacy
,
and perhaps do. Let the form, and the
coloring
be right, and the accessories will take care of
themselves. `Heaven has made us, and not we
ourselves.'
And now, Fritz, John Timon takes the liberty of
asking the pert and homely questionif the free
and careless handling of our town-ladies, by every
booby who can boast a boot, or a fringed cravat, is
not in the minds of many sensible ones, weakening
the delicacy and the beauty of that respect, which
every gentleman desires to feel for the other sex?
Is it not making common, what is most valued
when uncommon?
It is an undeniable fact that there is a freedom
in the approach to unmarried ladies at our balls,
which cannot be found elsewhere in the civilized
world, except indeed at the public gardens of Paris,
or the Assembly-rooms of the German Spa. The
world is on the gain I know; and we affect to lead;
the waltz was stoutly combated on its
introduction
to the salons of Paris, by no less a person than
Madame de Genlis; and Byron even uses strong
language in disgust for,
`hands promiscuously applied
Round the slight waist, or down the glowing side.'
But is it not worth inquiry, if we are not
rounding
our habit into too much wantonness in this
thing? One would suppose indeed, that brothers,
if not fathers, would place some limit to this luxury
of indiscriminate intimacy.
Do not suppose, Fritz, that with the canker of
years upon me, I am enjoying a fling at an
accomplishment
which can no longer be mine. It is not
the dance, nor even the polka that is condemned;
for both are accomplishments of grace; it is only
the license that is growing out of their abuse. I
would fain cherish, even in the decline of life, a
tender and delicate respect for that sex, whose
highest charm is modesty, and whose richest glory
is a spotless virtue.
Timon
.
3
THE LORGNETTE.
MAY 25, 1850. NEW-YORK. SECOND SERIESNO. 2.
. . . . that numerous piece of monstrosity, which taken
asunder, seem men, and the reasonable creatures of God; but confused
together, make one great beast, and a monstrosity more prodigious than
Hydra: it is no breach of charity to call these fools.'
Sir T. Browne
.
I like
, Fritz, in my quiet way, to moisten my
pen in the dribblings from any butts of ridicule,
even though they stand upon the floor of our
Tabernacle
.
Our towns-people are a very Christian
people, and, of course, a very civilized people; but
they also have an odd rotatory sort of way of
serving
God and the Devil by turns, as best chimes
with their humor. They get up a comfortable
charity, and the next day will hatch us a mob.
We have anniversaries of missionary movement,
which are damned with faint praise of the
journals
;
and we have anniversaries of mob-movement,
which are zealously defended. We keep our
Chatham
well sustained, and our Churchman in lusty
health. We point the dullness of our Lenten fasts
with Opera critiques; and many good Presbyterian
Elders take off the scandalous edge of their
Sunday's
Herald with the pious causticity of the
Independent
,
or the mild magniloquence of the
Observer
.
Our police arrangements, since the introduction
of the Star and cigars, and since the election of our
new Aldermanic Council, are said to be highly
perfect
;
and our journals are most consistent and
order-loving journals, actuated naturally by the
most conscientious intent: And yet, Fritz, the
week past we have had a demonstration of order,
philanthropy, Christian intent, police perfectibility
and newspaper independence, which must carry
the weight of a counter opinion as far as the
cracked dome of that temple of St. Peter's, which
the Christian Union and Dr. Adams are trying hard
to crack wider.
The anatomical argumentation of Dr. Grant, very
cogent as it seemed to his abettors, would have
been worse than useless, if any such infernal
bickering
had disgraced a company of negroes, as
belonged
to either the first or the second session of
our American Anti-Slavery Society. As for
municipal
perfection, it is quite lost in the shadow of the
heavier clouds; and let them put the disturbances
at whose door they may, they reflect very badly on
town-civilization, and still worse on human
dignity
.
Don't understand me, Fritz, to endorse any of
the crazy fulminations of our Garrison zealots,
while I point out the barbarity and usurpations of
our Bowery demagogues. Whatever may be
monkeys
or negroeswhatever may be Rhynderses or
hyenas, and whatever geese or Garrisons, order is
one thing, and disorder is another. City
tranquillity
is manifestly one affair, and city turbulence,
setting its accursed heel on the altar of our churches,
is quite another. The distinction needs no Grant
anatomy for its exposition, and none of the electric
flashes from any dark Ward, to light it. It does not
even need a tea-sitting of the Aldermen, or a
consultation
of his Honor the Mayor, with his other
Honor, the District Attorney, for its elucidation.
You know, Fritz, that we have been gathering
in our town, for a week past, a corps of workers,
variously equipped with white cravats, broad brims,
black coats, petticoats, and carefully-committed
discourses, to help forward the heathen and black
men a stage or two in Christian civilization; and
so vigorous has been the endeavor, that we have
recoiled with the shock into the ditch of barbarity.
Journals have been found, which, though they
pointed their eulogiums with exclamation marks at
the shooting down of the Astor mob, could yet
sketch a yielding veil of sympathy over the better
paid and better drilled mob which choked the
cackle of the Garrisonites.
We have been showing the Philadelphians
latterly
,
that the title of their city to the metropolis
of misrule is in danger; and we have weakened
the strong and steady influence of a great city by
a little eruption of bile, which has already grown
putrid in the eye of sense. What a story to carry
to our angust plotters at the seat of Government
that a few conscientious and Bible-reading fanatics
could not compare notes, and quietly exorcise all
the demons in Christendom, without drawing out
a rush, and a howl from Bowery freebooters, to prove
man an assto stretch their pewter panoply over
our General President, and to defend the insulted
dignity of the nation! It makes a modest man
blush for his patronymic when the national dignity
is in such keeping.
Senator Foote, indeed, might accept the defence
3*
as refreshing and germane; but the conqueror of
Buena Vista, used, as he is, to the bad smells of a
camp, one would think might turn up his nose in
disgust at the brimstone odors of such Bragg
artillery
.
The Disunionists will, perhaps, take heart
from this town flurry, since all disorganizing
tendencies
are kindred: moreover, they have much
need to take heart, and they will find few sources
of capital so abundant and so well adapted.
But do not let me spoil the freshness of your
spring air with such nauseous memories. We
will return to topics which belong to the every-day
life of the town, and which rise at every hand,
`sueing to be pressed.'
A CHAPTER ON BELLES.
`The impositions now to be set on foot are upon bare-necked ladies,
patches, moleskins, Spanish paper, and all the
Mundus Muliebris
more
than what is necessary and decent.'
Visions of Don Quevedo
, (
made
English by
Sir Roger L'Estrange
.)
Our
winter belles, my dear Fritz, having now
fairly clipped the shell of the ball-room, and having
begun to fledge in a spring array, give me good
occasion
to take their figures on my canvas, before
they shall have sailed away on the full wing of the
summer passage.
Altering, for the nonce, the systematic
nomenclature
of my philosophic friend, Tophanes, I shall
divide the race into
Belles by Exclusion
,
Belles by Inclusion
, and
Belles by Delusion
.
While we are in the possession of such erudite and
delectable expounders of language and proprieties
as Mr. T, and the Editor of the Mirror, it will
hardly be necessary to tell you what is meant by a
town belle. At least, I shall choose to be simple,
though at the expense of seeming shallow, and
shall only advise you, that we understand by a
belle, any lady not over sixty, nor under sixteen,
who is either talked about because she is admired,
or admired because she is talked about. And if
our fashionable essayists of the lady magazines,
from Morton McMichael down, can give a better
definition, which shall cover the ground with fewer
words, and less of metaphor, they will do more
than they are in the habit of doing.
Exclusiveness is a happy way of arriving at a
triumph, and of winning a place under the first
category of belles. There are various ways, I
find, of effecting this in our town, some of which
are worth your attention.
A carriage has its merits; and an attachment to
it, if rigorously persisted in, is quite effective.
Vast numbers are disposed to admire what is far
away from them; and there are certain styles of
face, which appear much better at a little remove
say as far as the walk, from the middle of the
street; graces, too, which might suffer on a close
inspection, are multiplied by a ready imagination,
when they pass us at a sharp trot.
Even some venerable ladies, by properly
darkening
the back seats, and by due circumspection in
appearing afoot, maintain a considerable stock of
admiration, and are fairly entitled to enrollment
upon our list of old belles. Such ladies will, of
course, recognize the propriety of doing their
shopping
at an early hour, or upon lowery days; nor
will they expose themselves to such an exhibition
as an open carriage entails, unless (and this device
sometimes succeeds capitally) they screen
themselves
with a defensive sun-shade, for which, the
fashion with elderly belles, is a lining of rose-tinted
silk.
In younger aspirants, a slight irregularity of
feature
,
if only lit up by passably good color, will
fairly escape observation under the shadow of a
coach-top; and a reputation for a considerable
share of beauty can be successfully maintained for
a long period of time. No better per centage on
investment in equipage can well be imagined.
Such ladies, too, if possessed of creditable forms,
with the requisite degree of fullness, (although our
French mantua-makers will be able to supply any
small lack in that way) will benefit their
reputation
by an occasional ride. Horsemanship is not
altogether essential; at least I infer not, from a
comparison of the styles. The rides should not
only embrace the Bloomingdale thoroughfare, but
may be extended, in the case of a gallant-looking
esquire, through the Fifth Avenue, or even upon
Broadway, with excellent effect. Hats
l'homme
are the best, and really invest their wearers in some
instances with a dignity which could hardly be
predicated of them in a simple lady coiffure.
But belles by exclusion do not stop here. A
name, or a family will not unfrequently prove the
basis of a notoriety, which will entitle a claimant
to enrollment among the town belles. Nothing,
indeed
,
is requisite but a proper degree of caution,
an avoidance of simple, unpretending people, and
an assiduously cultivated intercourse with those of
distinction. Personal attractions even are hardly
of enough moment to demand the alleviating
dressings
of our very worthy Martel; and I have seen
faces, which, aside from the name, I should have
stupidly thought plain, pointed out to me by my
friend, Tophanes, as belonging to accredited belles.
Exclusiveness seems to me a very safe way of
guarding such distinction, as I should think that
common observation would sadly weaken its force.
At our balls, such belles delight in an
exceedingly
haughty habit; they are observed to dance with
few gentlemen, and those only who are currently
known; they meet a new acquaintance with a look
by which they seem to honor him; they look
superciliously
on prettily-dressed girls who are not of
their acquaintance; they are exceedingly affable
with the hostess (if of good family), in order to throw
more force into their coldness with others. They
dance with remarkable absence of
abandon
, as if
they had something to depend on for salvation,
besides
mere grace.
Their topics are discussed with prettily-fledged
hints, gleaned from Papa's dinner parties; the
current waves of talk are curiously avoided; even
the paragraphs of the Home Journal are kindly
tossed over to contempt, and our
Lorgnette
, my
country Fritz, is sneered at, as the crude melange
of a literary adventurer. I have, however, with
the help of Providence, smiled as I have listened to
such prating; and I have possibly seemed to admire
the dignity of such ladies; but in reality, have
pitied the pretence which deprives them of
prudence
,
and sighed over the affectations which are too
transparent to conceal their weakness.
But if you meet such belle under the favor of
some kind recommendation, or with some name for
gentlemanly character, or have the benefit of being
espied by her, in close conversation with Madame
Blank, who is distinguished, then, no matter what
may be your real worth, the tactics change. How
quick is the flow of her remark; how earnest, and
yet seemingly careless, is her effort to convince
you, that you are in the sunshine of distinction;
what an array of pertinent authorities, taken from
the upper lists! For one remark she will fling you
two; and will spice them all with an air of triumph,
that makes you then, and there, perhaps, seem to
rejoice in so delightful an acquaintance; but
afterward
,
and soberly, regret that so much enthusiasm
should be lost on such poor confirmation of her
superiority.
Occasionally a literary lady of uncertain age,
takes rank in this scale of belles; and by the
studious wit, and cultivated modesty of her talk,
builds a wall of exclusion about her, which none
but the most hardy, and infatuated of admirers can
overleap. I would not mean to say, however,
Fritz, that such ladies are common, or that literary
attainments are generally high enough, with any
class of our belles, to make their learning an
insurmountable
obstacle to an approach; and if one
cannot fairly scale the rampart of their literary
acquisitions, he can, generally, with high-heeled
boots, see over to the flat surface that lies beyond.
Our literary ladies proper, are deserving of a
separate sketch; but such of them as class with
belles are usually measurable by a French Journal,
an Italian Phrase Book, and the Literary World.
And they do not, at the worst, possess so great a
knowledge of the occult sciences, as to damage
what little housewifery they possess, or to spoil
their eye for worsteds.
I do not justly know if I ought to include in this
galaxy of our goddesses the married belles of the
town. Our Venus is no less a Venus, though the
mother of a half a score of Cupids; Proserpine has
wooers, though princely theft has been made of her
person and her dower; and we have Penelopes, by
half less constant, and with twice as many suitors,
as paid their court to the consort of the wandering
Ulysses.
The exclusiveness of this class is not limited
even by the rights of the husband; and he is apt
to feel the weight of her claims to this species of
belleship, in a way as significant, as it is successful.
The extent, and character of his means of
consolation
,
will come under my pen, when I give you,
as I intend to do, a study of our clubmen, and of
our connoisseurs.
Among all the French arts which have become
acclimated with us, none is so decided in its
manifestations
,
and seemingly so easy of adoption, as
that of conjugal indifference; and I feel quite
satisfied that our trottoir and Opera-house would
show samples in this way, which would not do
discredit to the best studied
navet
, and most
artless intrigue of the Bois de Boulogne, or of the
summer evenings, in the Pitti gardens at Florence.
It is needless to say that this action is essential to
the state of a married belle; but she must beware
how she perils her reputation by a delectable
intimacy with any but a man of note. Literary
reputation, or a foreign air, are either of them good
outfits in a wooer, and will, if well managed,
perfect
the married belle, who is the object of their
address, in those more exquisite Paris
accomplishments
,
which serve to distinguish the tame and
spiritless wife, from the agreeable and fascinating
femme du monde.
The education of our belles by exclusion, is
necessarily
exclusive. It is naturally, too, somewhat
capricious. It does not feed on popular
accomplishments
;
4
it is on the search for extraordinary
attainments
.
The belle by exclusion, will be coy of
passing French compliments in the presence of the
grocer's daughter, who has learned them as well as
she, but will prefer to twist her lip into a practiced
enunciation of German terms. She will not boast
her proficiency upon the piano, which is vulgar;
but upon the harp, or guitar. She will not sing
the music that is in every shop window, but will
painfully elaborate some bit that has reached her
through the courtesy of a friend in Paris.
She withdraws herself as much as possible from
the current of the town, whether in speech or in
dress; she will flourish a `Marie Stuart' when
others are rejoicing in a simple cottage hat; or,
sustained by the authority of a Parisian friend, she
will trim her hood or her cloak with marten, when
the street-world is all given to laces.
It is grateful to approach now, Fritz, the second
class of our bellesby inclusion. These gain
position
unwittingly. The town determines on their
belleship, and the belleship is accepted.
Prominent among them are the belles by
good-nature
;
they are lively, chatty, rarely out of
humor, always ready for a polka, and not objecting
seriously to a waltz; they are familiarly kind, not
always pretty, but have compromised with nature
for a little gracefulness. They are good dancers,
careless diners-out, capital companions, and always
ready for service. Their dress is easy without
being
outr;
they are up with the times without
being before the times. They make acquaintances
without condescension, and they keep them
without
other bait than the sallies of unshaken
goodhumor
.
They talk of their neighbors without
cultivating
sarcasm, and they meet acquaintances on
the street without fearing infection. They are
favorites without being hated, and are admired
without being immoderately calumniated.
Yet their position is not without its dangers; to
be a favorite of the public is always dangerous.
Popular favor is as capricious as a woman, and
whoso seeks to fill his canvas with its breath, has
need to secure quick running blocks, and ready
hands for the trimming of his yards. The man or
the woman, whose opinion or whose action is
always flattered by the public, is very certain to
have no opinion and no action which is integral, or
which is not rather an off-shoot of the public fancy.
If such a woman could marry the world, the
marriage
might be happy, and the domestic life be
passably tranquil; but if she marries a man, there
is sad danger that her old suitor will continue to
pay his court, and the memory of her first love will
fill up the marriage bliss. The public is a sturdy
wooer, and if it can win favors, it will be sure to
keep its hold on a woman's vanity by being
querulous
for more.
Others, among the belles by inclusion, are modest
and beautifultwo qualities so rarely associated,
that I have great fear of periling my name for
accurate observation, and of being condemned, as
one who makes up his statements from hearsay.
Yet they are to be seen, here and there, in retired
corners, and in modest attire, not taking a
conspicuous
place either at the church or the opera.
They will not talk brazenly of their distinguished
acquaintances, nor make a boast of a word dropped
from a great man, or a great lady; yet something
of air or of manner may unfortunately give them
rank with our belles.
The first season of the rank may sit with a pretty
impudence upon such award; but the second, if
she be not guarded by some Cerberus of propriety,
prudence, and principle (a trio as rare as any
three-headed
dog), will break her down into the
hackneyed
caste of the town belles, popularly admired
and popularly sought after. From having made
her walks at discretionary intervals, she will
become
a show of the trottoir; she will cultivate
showy acquaintances; she will achieve showy
accomplishments
;
she will become an attendant of a
showy church, subscribe to a showy loge at the
Opera, and be showy of everything, but a soul.
Again, belles by inclusion, here and there,
embrace
some member of a noted family, who will be
cherished with cordial pertinacity, until age breaks
up all excuse for her charms, when she is consigned
over to the galaxy of distinguished elderly ladies.
Death, too, will solder its golden links to the chain
of town admiration, and sweep it around the ugliest
of figures, bringing them into the herd that the
town will worship for a winter. From time to
time some stray country beauty, albeit a
Bostonienne
,
will come within the charmed cycle, and
reign for her day the queen of a score of salons. A
lady of foreign birth, or name, if a stranger, and
if her qualities are dexterously quoted by her
guiding
chaperones, will succeed to the caste, and
become
a belle by inclusion.
Some little marriageable damsel, who is half
coquette and half honest, who is respectably pretty,
not a little pert, and gifted with a modicum of
esprit
, will frequently become a belle by a mere
fantasy of the town; and yet the town would be
puzzled to say why she gained her position. Her
belleship is sustained by persistence of mention;
once let the name pass into the boudoir catalogue,
4*
and force its way into the brain of our male
devotees
,
who are not over-apt at processes of memory,
and it will form an oily and easy hinge for chat.
And the poor stranger, twisting his moustache,
[1]
[1]
`Filant les moustaches de sa barbe.' C'est la contenance d'un
homme qui s'ennuye dans la compagnic ou il se trouve
.
Rabelais
.
will be overwhelmed with such inquiries as, `,
have you seen Miss B?' or, `Was Miss B at
the Opera?' or, `What did Miss B wear at the
ball?' or, `Do you think Miss B is really pretty?'
or, `How painfully Miss B laces;' or, `They
say Miss B is an heiress.' These inquiries,
successfully
pushed, will insure most young ladies a
very successful, or, what is the same thing, a very
noisy reign.
Such belles, however, require nurses; and these
may be found in the persons of indolent (not
indigent
)
respectable and aged females, who, perhaps,
without any daughters of their own, are fond of
matronizing young ladies of yielding disposition;
and who by dint of incessant talk, will cram the
candidate for belleship with requisite instructions,
and cram the gentler half of the public, both male
and female, with a catalogue
raisonn
of her
charms.
Belles by delusion remain; nor are they very
difficult of handling. On the contrary, not a few
of them are inveterate and familiar in their polkas,
to an extent that renders them the most tangible
and accessible of any whose virtues I have
attempted
to describe. They are belles more by
sufferance
than by election; yet they wear their
honors more proudly than any. They are loud,
and think loudness the best tone for a belle; there
is much brass in the metal from which they are
moulded. They are much in sight, and are always
conspicuous.
They compare with belles by inclusion very
much as the fire-bells compare with those of
churches. They ring, not unfrequently, false
alarms, which startle a great many unsuspecting
ones into amazement and inquiry; and even when
they herald a conflagration, they are sure to furnish
the means of its speedy extinguishment. They
are not dangerous, although they show the way to
danger; nor are they remarkably sweetened,
although
well constructed and well lodged.
They are at every ball, and the chances are that
they dance in every cotillion; our young fry they
bewilder into attentions, the middle-aged they coax,
and our old beaux they flatter. They are earnest
in the polka, gay at supper, intense in
conversation
,
religious at church, demure at a funeral, and
serious on birth-days.
There are others who are deluded by their
position
into assumption of our third rank: a little
accidental
elevation either through our political
fermentations
,
or by sudden accumulation of
property
,
or perhaps by marriage with a millionaire,
will create a title, which, unlike most titles, is
sound, in proportion as it is wordy and pretentious.
As is quite natural, and true indeed to the
kindliness
of the sex, these belles are held in cordial
detestation by all our belles of exclusion.
A dashing return from abroad, with the
accompaniments
of new-fangled hair-dressings,
familiarity
with French conversation, a tidy
femme de
chambre
,
and well-studied talk about the Louvre
and
Versahye
, will prove excellent capital with this
class for a winter. Occupation of some new palace
of a house will also beget a coy disposition to
appear
at pretty intervals in the places of
belle
resort,
and to flatter one's self into a nominal registry upon
the scroll of notoriety. Occasionally, a beauty of
a provincial city, or suburban village, will strangely
enough fancy that a winter translation to the air
of our town will only confirm her standing, and
that she will be reckoned among the admired ones.
In given instances, where the traces of maidenly
modesty are discretely dashed, it may be true;
but very many too fondly count upon their
gifts, and are utterly lost in the flood of belles,
which sets up its hybernal eddies in our bays of
fashion.
Eccentricity, either real or assumed, is a
current
source of delusion; and it is mortifying to
think how many of our town ladies, whothough
destitute of any personal attractions, would make
charming housewives and most respectable
companions
do,
in the sad hope of winning attentions
and establishing reputation as a belle, cultivate
the most extraordinary and unfortunate
eccentricities
of conduct.
Their infatuation will even get the better of their
prudence; and in the effort to surpass their rivals,
they lose all appreciation of delicacy. De they not
perceive that they might offer as striking a contrast,
by an assumption of modesty? But this is a
quality
,
which, it is greatly to be feared, does not
belong to belles of whatever class; at least the
assumption
should be apparent, to make its color
good.
Our eccentric belles are most wayward in their
movements, and unintelligible in their fancies:
they walk the streets at unheard-of hours; they
dress in most unheard-of colors; the fashion of
their hats is absolutely startling; and their walk
is as far removed from the grace of a belle, as it is
from the dignity of a woman. Their dance will
draw the eyes of a whole salon: modest old ladies
who stand in corners, and who carry neatly-folded
pocket-handkerchiefs, with narrow edging, will
possibly be shocked by it; but it will afford most
marked delight to our
fast
fellows, who linger over
the supper-table, for a talk about mademoiselle's
action.
Their talk might be
fine
, if it were not too rude;
and its prettiness is all of foul complexion. Their
satire might be biting, if it were not too noxious of
odor; and their playfulness sits as uneasily upon
them, as gambols upon full-grown kine. They may
possibly say clever things, which show acute
observation
,
or a ready wit; but they will spoil it in the
next breath by a
rudesse
that finds no apology
either in custom, or kindness. They may be
cultivated
;
but the cultivation only makes more
striking
their barbarities;`a compost on the weeds,
to make them ranker.'
They perhaps affect a great disregard for
towngentlemen
;
in which, indeed, their eccentricity
shows a tincture of diseretion: but they pursue the
notion oftentimes with an intensity that makes
one doubt its sincerity. And in this, as in most
kindred matters, the very noisiness with which
predilections are discarded, tempt one to believe
that the secret heart, or sense, is yearning toward
the objects of so angry disavowal.
In the country, or at the watering-places, our
eccentric belle has full scope, and is not cooped by
any of the burdensome proprieties, which, for the
sake of public decency, do hedge her in the town
Her action is most impressive in its effects upon
country bumpkins, and will win for her a name,
which even the din of a city cannot wholly drown.
In achieving publicity her pride is satisfied; and
in cherishing it with honesty, her modesty is
uncorrupted
.
Had she been pretty, perhaps her tactics would
have been comparatively peaceful; as it is, she
makes up for crudeness of weapon, by the assiduity
of her assaults. She scales the heights of town
admiration
by the vigor of her action,which lacks
only a little energy, a little foresight, and a little
modesty, to make itmanly.
Such, Fritz, are some of our town belles; but,
thank God, all town-ladies are not belles, though
all belles are not ladies. And those who carry the
title, and carry the talk, bear the same relation to
the unpretending ones, that our Fancy Stocks bear
to the comfortable sixes and sevens of regular
dividends
.
The first do admirably for speculation;
they will excite hopes, and create anxiety; and
will from time to time loom up gigantic; but the
others are true, orderly, and satisfying.
And let me, as an old man, drop a caution to
such as are cleaving the bonds of nursery and
school life, against two indefatigable efforts to win
position as a belle: even beauty and modesty will
be very apt to fall in the pursuit; and the prettiest
native graces, when acted upon by the acidity of
the extreme life of fashion, will be very sure to
corrodeleaving, if I may so speak, the merest
oxide, or protoxide of a soul.
If, however, our ladies will study to be belles, as
there is abundant reason to anticipate, let me throw
out a few hints, which will help their progress.
They must gain a running knowledge of most of
the topics afloat; and names of things will be far
less odious than opinions. They must cultivate
the Opera music, whatever may be the obstinacy
of their taste; and they must be small eaters in
public, whatever they may be in the pantry. Too
many brothers and sisters are not advisable; nor
any considerable swarm of country cousins. They
must guard their seriousness for privacy; and not
fail to appear devout, however bitter the trial, at
Grace Church. They must be familiar with belles
of the past generation; and must look with
contempt
on upstarts, and (if married) on their
husbands
.
They must wear their eccentricities, if lack of
charms drives them to such
dernier
resort, with
aplomb, and dignified unconsciousness. They
must admire with enthusiasm, and condemn with
vigor. They must be coy of respectable old ladies,
confiding, and liberal with their
femme de chambre
,
and affable with their neighbor's husband.
From much careful observation of the town-life,
I feel quite sure that these hints faithfully followed,
offer chances to the most disconsolate, and
apparently
,
most hopeless cases. And even the plainest
pretender, may come to chant with the swimming
grisettes at the open baths of the Seine,
C'est ainsi qu'on descend gaiement
Le fleuve de la vie!
And now, Fritz, having nicked another from my
Studies of the Town; and wishing you all manner
of goodness, n this bursting spring season,a
world of blossoms to your parterre, and a deep
green to your sprouting corn,a light handling to
your rod, and a plethora to your creel,a rich
dressing to your early salad, and a charity for us
all,I remain,
Timon
.
5
THE LORGNETTE.
JUNE 10, 1850. NEW-YORK. SECOND SERIESNo. 3.
Ex nihilo nil fit.
Lucretius
.
Pardon
me, Fritz, one word of prolegomenon, as
rebutter to the assurance of those who whisper in
the ears of my publisher, the name of your
correspondent
.
To say that on no occasion had the right
one been hit upon, would be only to say, that out
of fifty guesses, all were wrong. But this much
may be safely averred,that not three inhabitants
of the town are cognizant of the authorship. Even
my excellent friend, Mr. Kernot, who for keenness,
will yield to very few of the town wits, is
profoundly
ignorant in the matter. Perplexed as he
has been by pertinacious lady questionings, and by
no gentleman, more than by John Timon himself,
his conjectures at this moment are as wide of the
mark, as those of so shrewd a man can well be.
No one, indeed, connected with the publication,
from printer to proof-reader, has ever had personal
interviews, so far as his knowledge goes, with the
real writer. The MS. has been copied; the letters
have been mailed in different towns and states; and
not the greatest
expert
of the Boston writing
academies
,
could find in them sufficiency of evidence,
to convict any single individualexcept before a
Boston jury.
I must be allowed also to put on their guard
those young gentlemen, who by conscious looks,
put in an ill-defined claim to authorship; and
although
in personal intercourse their winks have
been credited, and pressing inquiries have been
courteously forborne, yet truth will compel me to
an open and decided denial. Those, too, who have
been eager enough to revolve the propriety of
calling
upon my printer, are known to me, and would
do well to forbear their pertinacity. A dollar to a
printer's devil may be very acceptable; but even
printers' boys are more tenacious of their honor,
and better guardians of their dignity, than those
who seek to corrupt them, with such knavish
artifice
.
A SALON PICTURE.
`But for our meer gallants, who live in no settled course of life, but
spend half the day in sleeping and half the night in
dancing;
as if
they were born for nothing else but to eat and drink, and snort and
sport;let them know there is not the poorest contemptible creature,
that crieth oysters and kitchen-stuff in the streets, but deserveth his
bread better than they.'
Sanderson's Sermons
, IV.
Ad Populum;
Sec. 19.
Now that the Academy, with its babies,
Governors
,
Popes, and asses, is drawing the town-taste
after
it, and is warping the mental habit of our ladies
into an easy connoisseurship, I do not know how I
can better fill up my paper, than by sketching a
scene or two, which will revive recollections of the
winter, and which, though they have but a small
amount of likelihood to commend them, will at
least be as fair candidates for charity, as one half
of the portraits upon the walls of `Design.'
`Mrs. Diggs' compliments to J. T., and requests
the pleasure of his company on Thursdayat 9,
P. M.' (Bon-ton Place, No. 1.)
I hate humbug, Fritz; and fourteen letters now
under your hand, which have gone to combat it in
every shape, and to defend what is earnest and
manly, will confirm, if there be need, my assertion.
I am not, therefore, going to assume that I have
been honored with any such invitation as is written
above. Were it so, it would be an abuse of
courtesy
to record it; and were it not so, it would be
an abuse of truth to avow it. In this dilemma, I
have only to assure you that it is a purely
hypothetical
invitation. Mrs. Diggs never wrote it;
John Timon never received it.
But, as in our recent political, as well as natural
philosophy, an hypothesis may sometimes be safely,
if not profitably pursued to its probable results, so
in our town studies, I deem it philosophic to run
out to certain hypothetical issues, the invitation
recorded
above.
In virtue of a modest R. S. V. P.
au coin
, an
acceptance
is returned; and this, whatever may be
the real intention, or though in the crowd of
engagements
which
it would be well for a man
solicitous
for fashionable reputation to pleadthe
time may escape attention. But we will suppose
the acceptant fairly accoutred, and in his carriage
at the proper hour, upon the evening designated.
He takes his place in the queue, that stretches the
length of a block; or, if unfashionably early, his
arrival will be announced by a shrill whistle of the
superintendent of affairs, serving as a signal to the
footman in white Berlin gloves, who is on the alert
within the lobby, at No. 1, Bon-ton Place.
He hurries through the brilliantly-lighted hall,
with the merest side-glance into the parlors, to see
5*
how he is standing for time; and enters, upon the
second or third floor,as the assemblage may be
for size, and the mansion for room,the apartment
appropriated to gentlemen. And here, I shall be
opening to the eyes of the ladies themselves a little
budget that is fairly behind the scenes, and
nothing
but the fact of its being purely hypothetical,
could possibly excuse my indiscretion.
In a corner, with his back quite accidentally
turned to the few persons who are present, the
novice cautiously unrolls a brown paper wrapper,
and sets himself to the task of drawing on a very
shoppy-smelling pair of gloves, with all the
earnestness
of a man bent on some important pursuit.
The old stager of the balls, our town beau, on the
contrary, applies himself carelessly to a pair of kids,
which by cautious usage, and a little application of a
wheaten crust, may possibly do as effective service at
to-morrow's opera, as they did yesterday. He
prefaces
this, however, by dusting his boots with a silk
handkerchief, brought for the purpose in the pocket
of his `coachman.' As he adjusts his gloves, he
moves back and forth  more from force of habit
than real intentbefore the mirror, and casts
casual
glances at himself, which return the interest of
a quiet and sober satisfaction. He dresses his hair
or moustache with an air of a connoisseur, and
drops his remarks here and there to acquaintances,
between touches of the brush, with a most
delectable
softness, and pliancy of tongue.
The boy, in the very stiff collar and
broad-armed
cravat, who by his movement and downward
glances, seems not quite sure whether his boots
pinch him or not,takes off as much as possible
from the verdancy of his years by a noisy hilarity,
and an abandon, which give show of intimate
previous acquaintance not so much with
fashionable
circles, as with a fashionable glass of brandy
and water. He talks in amazingly flippant style
of Miss so and so, using the first names in a very
audible
under tone, and impressing timid adventurers,
such as John Timon, with an enlarged idea of his
attractions and importance. He gives still farther
proof of his ease, and (as Mr. Willis would say) his
at-home-ativeness, by great constancy at the
dressing-table
,
and a very diligent and assiduous use of
the brush.
The married gentleman, whose wife is
arranging
fixtures in an adjoining room, moves about
uneasily  glances at his watch, and wonders when
Dolly
will
be ready; and consoles himself with
adjusting
a pair of gloves that need very little coax
ing to the hand. His special delight is to sit down
in the corner with some fellow-martyr, and talk
over the day's sales at the `board.'
The spruce foreigner bustles about with a very
dignified
and ceremonious air, and perhaps patronizes
some of the young gentlemen
du monde
, with a
word or two of French, venturing an inquiry
possibly
,
in regard to the lady of the house.
`
Ah, ouioui, monsieur
,' responds our hero of
fashion.
The foreign gentleman, if not yet schooled enough
to know that such response is the limit of much of
the French talk of the salon, will perhaps throw
his interrogatory into some simpler form, in the
hope of gaining more valuable information.
`
Ah, ouioui, monsieur
.'
Mais, que diable
,' says the embarrassed
questioner
,
`
qu'est-ce que c'est doncque oui
.'
`
Ah, ouioui, monsieur
.'
[2]
[2]
I wish it were possible to render by type the pronunciation of our
continental English by Hoffmann on the boards of the
Varietes
.
Whoever
has seen
Les Anglais en Voyage
, will be indebted to me for a hearty
laugh by the mere mention of the play.
Here and there a middle-aged bachelor, not used
to balls, and who has been seduced into this affair
by a sudden and strong fancy for one of the
habitues
,
will ply vigorously the ladle of the
punch-bowl
,
and in his nervous trepidation, will seek by
poorly feigned study of the others' action, the
proper period for a descent upon the terrors below.
With him, poor man, it is evidently one of those
horrors of social life which must, like marriage,
some time be encountered, and for which he has
been screwing up his courage by a series of fainting
resolutions, for a week past.
It would be very immodest in me, Fritz, to take
you into the adjoining room, and show you the
fitting-on
of satin slippers, drawn out of oil-silk bags,
or worked reticules,the auxiliary lacings done
at the hands of some stout friend, or the
readjustment
of Martel's wreaths. I could never reconcile
it to my conscience to tell you of the laments over
some broken japonica,or of the dexterous flirt of
the fingers, by which a crushed brocade skirt is
restored to its original rotundity,or of the anxious
look of the novice, who is not quite sure but her
bosom is packed a trifle too low,or of the indignant
scorn of some town belle who is waiting for a study
of the mirror, engrossed by some fussy old dowager
in diamonds. All this, gallantry compels me to leave
to the imagination; and the escapade to the
rooms below, will be as fortunate for us, as for
them.
You are received, let us suppose, by the lady of
the mansion, in a dress of modest character, for
this rule of etiquette is now punctiliously observed,
that a hostess should not outshine her guests;
you are welcomed and commended to the mercies
of the throng. She, so far from having leisure to
drop a hint as to how you may get a foot-hold in
the socialities of the night, is belabored with
unceasing
receptions, and finds it a hard task to
command
breath and composure enough to welcome at
the door the crowd of new-comers.
Of course, she must not be expected to
remember
names, and may possibly at supper address you
as the Reverend Doctor, while you are nothing
more than a tidy vestry-man. No such mistake
need, however, be corrected: first, because the
title is not an unfashionable one; and second,
because
it will serve to embarrass the hostess, whose
fancy is as easily humored, for the time, by your
playing the Divine, as by your playing the
Rou.
Having espied a lady acquaintance, it is worth
while to consider whether she will pay the tax of a
corner, for a talk, or whether you will pay the tax
of a dance, for such fragmentary critiques on the
Opera, and complimentary sallies, as can be
hazarded in the pauses of the music. With doubt
on either point, it would be discreet to ignore her
presence.
A little caution is needful that the mother be not
mistaken for the daughter; an error, which between
jewelry, bare arms, and strong lights, it is quite
possible, and eminently pardonable, to fall into.
Should a mistake occur the other way, and a
stranger inadvertently ask a young lady of five and
twenty if her daughter is present, he has committed
an offence for which he can only forget his blushes
by a candid explanation with the mother.
The style of our salon conversation, as you would
naturally suppose, my dear Fritz, is more vivacious
than entertaining, and between the incessant
scraping
of fiddles, and the
toot
of clarionets, there is
hardly room for any delicate balancing of those
repartes or prettinesses of speech, which give a
charm to the legitimate soire. Custom too has
strangely hedged us in, even in the matter of
subject
for talk; and though the lady purveyors of
the intellectual wardrobe, have deftly chosen for our
wear, such short-made garments, as will not in the
using embarrass the dance, they have stripped us
of all the old-fashioned, comfortable robes, and set
us up to starve under the scanty furnishings of the
ball-room topics.
Upon the Opera one may launch out safely; and
it would be interesting to meet with a young
gentleman
of the town, who had not used this
conversational
laxative, in the opening of his fashionable
acquaintance. The Dusseldorf gallery has proved a
most happy aperient, and has helped out more cases
of obstinate constipation of speech, than can be found
under the Sarsaparilla advertisements. If a
certain
degree of intimacy exists between the parties,
talk may turn upon the last ball, or a recent
marriage
;
and under extraordinary circumstances it may
take a playful flight to a late book, or settle down
upon a popular author. In this event, a proper
degree
of dignity will be sustained among the
high-bred
,
by strong praise of what is English, and by a
nave ignorance of what is American.
The theatre, unless a star is upon the stage, is
not reckoned a legitimate subject;with the
exception
,
however, of Burton's, and the new play of
Mrs. Kemble. Churches and architecture are
admissible
and fertile. These give a moral tinge,
moreover;and notwithstanding the loss of this,
I am free to say, that it would be quite refreshing
to meet with a lady chatterer, who was not
possessed
of an arranged opinion about the spiral
proportions
of Trinity, the gaudy windows of Grace, and
the rural simplicity (church building, and not
church offices) of the Holy Communion.
Dress is a nice topic, but reckoned too personal,
and in many instances, too low, for pertinent
discussion
.
A clandestine marriage, or a divorce case,
are Sacramento gold pits, from which will be drawn
out rich ingots of conversational metal, that will
need only the assaying of a leader of the ton, to
become fashionable `tender' for a twelvemonth.
An unexpected, or a conventional match, such as
that of an old roue with a modest beauty, or of an
old belle with a weak young man, is an admirable
furnisher of salon eloquence, and of such
epigrammatic
hits as can be let off in the
piano
of an
orchestra
.
It is worth while that you be advised, however,
that the topics change with the advance of a
season
;
and that they have as regular an ebb and flow
as the Cuba news, or the morals of the church.
In early winter the tide is well up, bearing the
scum and froth of the beach: Some delightful
watering-place or fancy ball will be uppermost,
and a little, rank tid-bit of scandal, serve as a
pate
de foie gras
to the dinner of the talk. Then will
follow a discussion of the acceding belles, or of an
acceding family, which now entering upon the third
winter of a palace home, is game for chat, and
admissible
to town circles. Next in progression, will
appear the opening flirtations, the Art-Union
Collection
,
the fashion for furs, the new opera, and the
length of the Indian summer. New Years and
6
Christmas are killing baits, that will decoy the
most shy of conversational finsters; and will fill
up wide gaps of talk, until the current of opera
remark
shall have settled into a well-considered code
of condemnations and approvals.
The lions of the time will have a lion's share: and
true to Peter Parley and Buffon, whoever will pull
a thorn from their foot, will be meted their rude
caresses. As the season advances toward the blush
of spring, the current of chat will again flow out
toward the prospective charms of the
watering-places
,
where it is now setting, very strong, and
very turbid.
But to return to our salon;supposing yourself
a stranger, and anxious to relieve the monotony of
staring stupidly about you, and to carry as genial a
humor as possible through the crush of the throng,
you address yourself to a lady-friend, for
presentation
;
since there is little hope in the crowd, of
finding
your hostess.
And here it is worth while to remark a sometime
peculiarity of our salons: although, upon the barest
subterfuge of acquaintance, familiarity may run to
most riotous limit, yet without such previous or
supposed
acquaintance, distance is extreme; and the
offer of even the most trifling assistance or remark, to
a stranger lady, might give a serious wound to her
social dignity. It does not seem to be an axiom of
our laws of hospitality, that the character of a
hostess is a guaranty for the character or social
level of the invited; and we present in our
Republican
City the strange spectacle of well-defined
castes revolving in a single salon, under common
invitation, yet each one retaining its social
individuality
.
This solecism is, I fancy, hard to be found in
any other Christian country; nor is it often left
out of civilized codes,that scorn of a guest, is
an insult to the host. The truth is, the
generality
of invitations forbids coalition of sets; and
so long as fashionable position is based on
notoriety
,
and notoriety is sustained by the number
of proteges, we see no present help for the
absurdities
remarked. We invited more freely than the
European caste-men; but we maintain our castes
under the invitation. In word only, we are
democratic; and in spirit, full of aristocratic
cravings.
Note again, Fritz, that I am not arguing for
any full and free intermingling of breeding and
vulgarity; this would be to argue against natural
lawsto create combinations without chemical
affinities; and at best, in the ungenial mixture,
crude precipitates would be thrown down, that
would not and could not re-combine. But, I am
arguing against pretence, against an assumed
mingling which is but mockery,against a boasted
social evenness which shows in the most offensive
lights (offensive as well to humanity as to
goodbreeding
)
our unevennesses. We are making the
veil of an invitation the shield of our disproportions;
and yet it is a glass shield,a paltry lens, that reveals
and distorts all that it covers!
The assemblage of different persons under one
roof, by one invitation, and in honor of the inviter,
should be, and by all reasonable laws of society is,
a virtual recognition of the social equality of those
persons
for the time
. It is an insult to a host to
suppose otherwise; it is a dishonor to one's self to
act otherwise. But if for the time, there may
be danger of its continuance; and here comes
up another town peculiarity which is worth its
mark.
Socialities with us, running as they do to routs,
and having their measure and culmination in
polkas and at the Opera, are not acted upon by
old-fashioned quiet gatherings, and the unaffected
easiness of familiar visiting. The consequence is,
acquaintances are formed and refined in the crush
of a ball; they are of public origin, and public
execution. Hence, a little coyness must be used
in the densely-packed salon of a friendly host, and
bonhommie
must be thrown aside for seasonable
manuvre. The social line might receive
infringement
,
which could not easily be made good; and
the admitted truth at the soires of European cities,
that the intercourse of an evening, under favor of
an inviting host, is no ground for future
familiarity
,
modifies in no degree the action or the politesse
of our salons.
But to return again: you are presented to a
lady, a polkist, one of the 's. Every one
talks of the 's. Even the Home Journal
indulges
in conjectures as to where the 's will
spend the summer. The public is interested to
know; fashion is at a comparative stand-still; the
railway stocks are fluctuating, and will probably
continue to fluctuate until it is ascertained where
the 's are going. Even Tophanes has been
heard to express a wonder, as to where the 's
are
going?
The conversation of the 's is, of course,
what it should be, full, rich, academic, and
's-y. I had hoped, Fritz, and have made two
or three well-intentioned efforts, to give you a
sketch of the salon-talk; but it is useless; its
gases are too volatile; the heat of the pen-point
rarefies and disperses them altogether. With the
6*
staple you have already been supplied, three pages
back; turn it in kalaidescope, and you will have
the various phases,rich in colors, rectangular and
methodic in proportions, always changing, but
eternally kalaidescopic. And its variety may be
reckoned up in the witty line of the old French
comedy,
Que de nouvelles ardeurs, et des ardeurs nouvelles!
(
Double Veuvage
.)
But, lest you in the country, Fritz, who are used
to base your agricultural action upon a careful
analysis of the guanos, and sulphates of
fertilization
,
should object that this is not a very specific
account of the ball-room conversation, I will even
give you a prescription, after the way of our town
doctors; and I am sure that any accomplished
druggist may easily prepare from it, a dose.
R. Academy of Design 3j.
Opera.. 3vii.
Watering Places
Dress... aa. f. 3iii
Scandal vel Ipecacuanh 3j.
Common Sense, pulv..gr. ss.
M. et cum equa (q.s) ft. mass in pil. vig. div.
And I might safely go on to add, in the way of
the schools,an excellent carminative, and much
employed in cases of flatulence.
By varying the prescription in one or two
unimportant
particulars, I have no doubt that a
patent might be obtained; and should any
enterprising
individual be desirous of rivaling the fame,
and success of Moffat or Sherman, by a wholesale
manufacture, John Timon could confidently
recommend
to him one or two young gentlemen as
excellent canvassers.
In the interval of talk, let us take occasion to look
about us; the Frenchman, never not easy, is
making
himself charming, by calling it all
magnifique!
while he flatters his hostess with a considerate
gazetimed to the word. A little later, he will
rub his hands unctiously over the supper, and utter
a feeling
superbe!
The distinguished German
gentleman, stains his beard with the wines, and
gives the best possible compliment, by keeping his
stand at the table, and by a subdued and choky
`ver goot!' Our little hero, who has forgotten
his Livy and his polka for the time, is pulling off a
partridge leg with a thumb and forefinger, and
diligently attudinizing, while he eats.
A poor dowager, who is unfortunately crowded
in the front ranks, is looking a very feeling lament
over a drop or two of
creme
, that has been
decanted
upon her powdered head, and her
protege
is talking very gayly, and is apparently very
forgetful
of a torn skirt, which is hidden by her discreet
position in a corner. Married ladies, such as are
done (for the evening) with their polka partners, are
discussing Charlotte Russe, or the scarcity of wild
fowl. A connoisseur in spectacles, is holding a
blue glass to the light, and thinks, loud enough to
be heard, that he has rarely drank better on the
Rhine. A candy, or a bon-mot is stolen by a
feint from the central pyramid, and straightway
the whole fabric goes down under the onset of
those who accept the printed mottoes as a gospel
of wit, and to whom the pastry-shop is a
missionhouse
.
In the next room, an old gentleman is brushing
about uneasily, casting irregular and not very
amiable glances at his wife, who is polking with
a `love of a man,' and who is evidently
enjoying
the ball very much more than the husband.
At every gap in the music the old gentleman,
by a series of very earnest nods, and pretty
conjugal
pantomime, endeavors to suggest a
leave-taking
,
but the wife has a conscience in the matter,
which she does not like to offend.
Le mari trouve
que le bal est degotant;Sa femme trouve que
non
. Old gentlemen, and irascible young gentlemen
should stipulate about the number of polkas to
an evening, before marriage.
With the German cotillion, and three of the
morning, the
bougies
grow dim, and the carriages
roll away. Heads are slightly heavy with the
close air, and the champagne; but hopes are
built upon the evening's attentions which will
doubtless ripen into a very dreamy sleep.
Madame has not only paid off at a brush a
score of civilities; but she has won honor,
perhaps
,
by having given `one of the finest parties
of the season.' Hospitality is satisfied, and pride
is delighted. Calls of acknowledgment and
gratulation should be cautiously deferred until
the glassmen have resumed their wares, and the
scavengers cleared the wreck. Then will come
the true ovation of our hostess, in a long line of
calling equipages. Talk will be brilliant and
investigation
earnestas to where the 's are
going? Even the delicate lady who sickened on
the Charlotte Russe and the punch, writes a
delicate
note of gratulation, and thanks;trusts she
shall be out in a few days, hopes it will be
delightful
weather, and says (in a postscript)`pray can
you tell me where the 's
are
going?'
It would be very odious to show such divergence
from the town-taste as to question the propriety,
the charms, or the value of such a winter jam.
The town is its own guide; and the town relishes
and renews these proofs of its refinement and
civilization
.
The old-school dinner-table, well rounded,
and with a little generous wine to mollify the wit
of the after-talk, is almost forgotten; and even the
busy
soiree
, with its earnest groups of talks, and
playful reparte, is swallowed up in the maw of the
balls.
There is little hope for any of the old-fashioned
ideas of comfort, good cheer, and moderation;
railways have scoured the country of cosy
stagecoaching
;
and a species of wiry, magnetic sociality
is stretched across the town, to shock us with its
reports, and to electrify us into smiles. These are
dangerous elements to contend against; and a plain
man would be apt to fare as hardly in the combat,
as did Quixote thwacking at his mills.
But at the risk of discomfiture, I offer to suggest
for the benefit of a few aged, sensible, and
respectable
people, that some measurable limit be set,
even to the extravagances of a town-ball;that
at least enough room be guaranteed to ensure
feeble folk against bruises, or broken shins, and the
belles against being stripped of their flounces, or,
what is more terrible, their skirts.
Furthermore, John Timon, in behalf of the
petitioners, would most respectfully pray, that the
cream be handed in suitable dishes,that the
punch be generously iced, and thatin view of
certain mishaps of the winterwritten notice be
given, as on the walls of the Massachusetts
groceries
,
to this effect,`not to be drunk on the
premises.' It is moreover humbly suggested, that
according to the opinion of all practiced hunters,
leo-hunters among the resta small ball is as
effective
as a large one, and not half so apt to tear or
damage the game. And it is specially prayed, that
if people will continue to pack, some safe
retiring-place
be reserved for feeble ladies and for married
gentlemen;and that a corner be railed off for
whist or talk, by substantial fixtures, under the
direction of the sexton.
And it is furthermore asked, that a hall of
sufficient
size be set apart for those of our
Ephebi
,
[3]
[3]
Term for the Greek youth who had arrived at the age of eighteen.
In Sparta they were enjoined to wrestle and dance with the girls in the
Gmnasia; and he who could not vanquish his partner, was considered
unfit for marriage. It is fortunate for our
Ephebi
, that the Mayor
Woodhull is not Lycurgus!
who wish to make trial by the Polka or wrestling,
as in the Spartan Gymnasia, with the women;
and finally, that a surgeon and mantua-maker be
always in readiness, near the punch-bowl, or such
accessible locality, as may seem fitting, to splint
broken bones, and to repair drooping skirts.
Humanity
and modesty alike demand the attention.
And for all these and the like privileges, the
petitioners
do humbly pray, and, as in duty bound,
will ever pray.
AN EAR AT THE CAPITOL.
` nous transportames au lieu o c'estait, et veismes ung petit
vielliard
bossu, contrefaict et monstreux, on le nommoit
Ou-dire
: il avoit la
gueule fendue jusques aulx aureilles  et aultant d'aureilles comme
jadis eut Argus d'yeulx: au reste estait aveugle, et paralyticque des
jambes
.'
Pantagruel
,
Liv. v., Cap. xxviii.
The
little old man
Ou-Dire
, as Rabelais goes on
to say, was surrounded with a crowd of men and
women, eager to know what he had `heard say.'
I am disposed to believe, Fritz, that there are a vast
many
Ou-Dires
in our city of Washington,not
only old men, but old women too, who are better
found in the matter of legs, and eyes, than the
vielliard
of Pantagruel; and who can ramble
easily from the lobby to the gallery, and can see
much more than is to be seen. Nor are they
reduced
like Rabelais' man to squat upon their
haunches, in the street, to secure hearers, but are,
on the contrary, of a dignified, and important
class, entirely above street-singers, and hand-or
ganists; and if we may trust their own accounts,
are on the best of terms with our eminent men,
and think no more of tossing off a punch with Mr.
Webster, or of a hand at `old sledge' with Harry
Clay, than of taking tea with Mrs. Swisshelm, or
of singing a psalm with Giddings.
They have not only a great many ears, but they
have wonderfully long ears, and can hear at great
distances. They not unfrequently surprise us with
accounts of occurrences in our town, and manifest
such intimate knowledge of our own affairs, as can
hardly be due to anything but their extreme length
of ears. Very many such
Ou-Dires
are to be
found in various parts of the country, but nowhere
do they thrive so well as at Washington. That
city seems to possess a climate highly favorable to
the species; and to tell the truth, there is not a
little of the stock in our town, who are the first to
catch and Herald the accounts that come to us from
the pleasant old chatter-boxes of the capital.
At one time we are startled into a shudder by a
pathetic story about poor Bodisco, gone to the mines
of Siberia; another time, Mexico or some
neighbor
country is in a flame of war, or M. Calderon
has received his papers; and as for the
announcement
of `changes in cabinet,' it has gone into
the political calendar, and is as much a part of
public faith and rule, as the `expect rain about
this time' of the Christian Almanac.
Another remarkable circumstance, and one which
cannot have failed to strike the acute and
sagacious
observer, is the extraordinary variety of
coloring
which is given to the different reports; thus,
one individual of a dignified style, and hopeful
7
spirit, expresses himself thus:`It is now, I am
happy to inform you, currently reported that the
slavery and territorial question will be settled the
present week; and I have it on the best authority,
that Mr. Clay is to withdraw his opposition to the
Presidential plan, and to lend the resources of his
indomitable energy to the aid of the masterly
inaction
of the administration.'
Another of a prompt and business order, writes:
`I have the great pleasure of assuring you on
the most unimpeachable authority, that Mr. Clay
and his friends have at length won over the
cabinet
to a participation in their views, and I shall
therefore be able to announce to you definitively
the issue of the great question before the
country
,
by the last of this week.'
A man of progress, and of high though
ambiguous
morals, indulges in the following tender
reflections
:`There
is little to be hoped, I fear,
from our public men; they lack that afflatus of a
divine humanity which lights up the true
philanthropist
.
This cursed slavery is binding their
souls, as it were, with shackles. It is a mild
Sunday as I write this, and I cannot but think as
I sit in my window, quietly smoking my cigar,
and looking out upon the hypocritical
church-goers
,
of the blessed time that is coming, when there
will be no need of churches, and no need of slaves,
for every man will be his own teacher, and his
own head-waiter!'
One of the racy, and cheap-novel school, writes:
`Look out for a tornado; a tempest is brewing
in the tea-pot. If, before the end of the week,
there is not such a hullabaloo among certain
prominent
individuals I might name, as will make a
devil of a stir, then my name 's not
Humbug
.'
Even the same correspondent not unfrequently
corrects his telegraphic report by letter, and his
letter
by telegraph: with such assiduity in making
corrections, the town is ensured, as you will
readily
suppose, reports of exceeding accuracy.
I am just now, Fritz, in the receipt of a
Washington
letter, which, as it brings to light some
things which are not in the papers, may interest
you. I will not vouch for the truth of the roports,
nor for the character of my correspondent; such a
course would be as unsafe for me as for the town
journals. All I can say is, he has the air of
being
an honest fellow; and his statements, if not
true, are at least highly probable.
Mr. Timon
,
Sir:I can't say that I like altogether the tone
of your remarks about Washingtonians. You
seem to have looked only at such stray
individuals
as have lost character at home, (which it is
possible to do,) and gone to your city to set up.
As for the members, I shall not defend them, as
they are at best but a shabby set of fellows, who
bother us amazingly in the winter-time, and have
no more gratitude for favors, personal or domestic,
than so many office-holders.
It occurs to me that you may be a disappointed
office-seeker yourself; if so, you are not the first
who has vented his spleen on Washington in
general
.
But I beg you would use discretion, and let
your wrath lie where it belongs; we do not boast
any consanguinity with the successive cabinets,
and only show them favor as they are liberal with
their wines, and ices. The Galphin affair was a
fat thing for them; and if the stupid louts of
your town had held their tongues, would have been
paid back in dinners, before the end of the session.
The Whig party is believed to be a very intelligent
party, and I trust it is so; but their family
management
strikes us as a little queer. General
Taylor is an honest old gentleman, and it is
fortunate
he is soto keep up the executive
reputation
to a fair average.
Cuba made us a little stir and fright the other
day; and M. Calderon (who serves capital mulled
wine) was in a sad fidget. Bucaneer stock seems
to be on the gain, and Savannah has led off with a
handsome figure; it is hinted that proposals are
afoot to erect a monument in the neighborhood of
the Pulaski House, to that intrepid adventurer, the
late Mr. Kidd. My friend, Mr. Foote, with whom
I strolled down the Avenue yesterday, is rather
disappointed
at the turn things have taken; he has
his doubts about Lopez's bravery, and says of him,
(he talks Spanish)
No est tan bravo il leon, como se
pinta;
which means, I suppose, that he is not so
brave in the shade, as in the `Sun.'
As for Daniel, he is hearty, and feels quite set
up by that snug dinner at the Revre. He thinks
Mr. Mann is better at `hints to young men,' than
hints to old ones; and that all good schoolmasters
are not, in virtue of the ferrule, good politicians.
As the mail is near closing, I can only give you a
sketch of the proceedings at a late Southern
caucus.
Mr. Clemens being called to the chair, and Mr.
Yulee appointed secretary, the committee, named
for that purpose, reported the following preamble
and resolutions:Whereas, the United States of
America are just now perplexed by sundry
embarrassing
questions, which, from the nature of the
government, devolve upon Congress for settlement;
and whereas, that Congress is not the most efficient
that can be imagined, and is made up in a great
measure of hot-headed Northern fanatics; and
whereas, the questions alluded to are vital,
involving
the dearest interests of a great many gentlemen
of the South, and collaterally of the North; and
whereas, the session of Congress is fast passing
away without any security being effected for a
continued, peaceable, and orderly possession of
privileges
at present guaranteed by the Constitution;
and whereas, California as a State, has repudiated
slavery in a most hasty, injudicious, and ill-advised
manner,therefore be it
Resolved
, 1st: That active measures ought to
be set on foot to turn the current of the world's
opinion, and to effect as far as possible, a revival of
those ancient and most respectable authorities
which sanctioned slavery, while they admitted the
duties and charities of our Christian Religion.
Resolved
, 2nd: That Henry Clay, in his proposed
arrangement of the points at issue, has flagrantly
overlooked the true interests and the rights of the
South, and has seriously compromised his character
both as an orator, and as a man.
Resolved
, 3rd: That the admission of California
as a State, in view of its action on the subject of
slavery, would be a crying injustice to Southern
opinion, and such a breach of our favored
institutions
,
as no Southern man of honest principles, and
no Northern man of Southern principles, could for a
moment consent to.
Resolved
, 4th: That the special thanks of this
assemblage are due to the New York Herald, the
Globe, and the Journal of Commerce, for their
dignified
and unflinching advocacy of principles dear
to the heart of every freeman.
Resolved
, 5th: That Mr. , the eminent
civilian, has taken a noble stand in defence of
institutions
which have been illustrated by his pen;
and that a subscription be set on foot for the
purchase
and circulation of his works, and that in
addition
,
the freedom of the South be presented to
him, in atobacco-box.
Resolved
, 6th: That in Dr. Grant, the advocate
of the Tabernacle, we recognize one of those
brilliant
intelligences which are in advance of their
age; and whose merit is only the greater, because
it is popularly denied.
Resolved
, 7th: That the noble State of
Mississippi
,
never recreant to her principles, and always
ready to Foote her debts, is doing yeoman service
for those institutions that have supplied her
coffers
;and
that her martial governor is applauded
in his sympathies, and encouraged in his devotion
to the progress of liberty, and the triumph of
arms.
Resolved
, 8th: That we cherish the
Constitution
,
though it was made in Philadelphia; and
that we are ready to stand by the Union, though at
the cost of association with the crazy zealots and
fanatics of the North. But patience has its limit,
and forbearance is only human; and if provocation
be renewed, the South will rise in her strength,
shatter the bonds of a corrupt and corrupting
connection
,
trample to the dust the fetters of modern
opinion and enlightened philanthropy, and place
her hope and strength upon the immutable basis of
freedom and humanity, as understood by Southern
jurists, and as illustrated by Southern chivalry!
P. S.If Mr. Timon wants further accounts, I
can only say facilities are not wanting. I have an
old friend in Mr. Clayton's household (head-waiter)
who is all right: I may further mention that I
have opened negotiations with one of the
chamber-maids
at the White House, from which I am led to
hope a great deal.
Yours to command,
Themistocles
.
8
THE LORGNETTE.
JUNE 24, 1850. NEW-YORK. SECOND SERIESNO. 4.
`Critics must excuse me, if I compare them to certain animals called
asses, who, by gnawing vines, originally taught the great advantage of
pruning them.'
Shenstone
.
`I have writ me here a letter to her; and here another to Page's wife;
who even now gave me good eyes too, examined my parts with most
judicious eyelids.'
Falstaff
.
Among
the noticeable things of the epoch, Fritz,
as worthy of my hap-hazard chronicle as the
conquest
of Cuba, which was no conquest, or the
unrolling
of a Boston princess, who proved only a dry
bituminous man, is the climacteric of negation;
viz., a spring, that has been no spring.
The saucy winter, which we in town were
making
faces at, as no winter at all, has taken our
contempt in dudgeon,has bridged over all that
time that used to be spring with clouds, and has
landed us plump in sultry summer, having taken
toll in catarrhs. And as the town ladies are now
making out their balance sheets of the winter's
strategy, and `laying their course' for the
summer
,
let me too trespass on your patience in filing
away my papers, and in making an easy
conscience
anent my correspondents. It is good now
and then, as Webster says, to take a squint at the
chart, and the compass, and to make sure that
good steerage-way can be gained.
The first letter for my file, appears to be from
a lady, and is filled with eloquent regrets over the
present conventional arrangement of the town
marriages. It is feelingly written, and possesses
a pathos of expression, which altogether redeems
its carelessness of style. But I must beg leave to
forego its publication; the griefs enumerated are
too common, and too real, to be ventured on
lightly
;
beside which, there is an air of likelihood in
my complainant's story, that I greatly fear, would
subject me to the imputation of personality.
Moreover, in such cases, I am led to understand,
as well by common report, as by much personal
observation, that the private consolation of a friend
is much more effective than any amount of public
sympathy: and I am credibly informed that not a
few young wives, who have bargained themselves
away after the marriage price-current, have
forgotten
all the odium of the contract, in the caresses
of a sympathetic companion. It is delightful to
contemplate the sweet offices of friendship, coming
to the relief of an enslaved woman, and redeeming
an affectionate heart from the legal tyranny of a
husband, by the dalliance of private and
disinterested
attentions. My warm-hearted correspondent
can therefore hardly be reckoned without hope;
and if she feels grievously the bonds of an
enslaving
wedlock, I commend to her two sufficient and
ripe sources of consolation,a religious endurance,
or a town-lover. It is a hard case, surely, when a
young woman of tender feelings (and who ever
heard of any other?) finds herself, by virtue of our
conventional rules of property and position, forced
upon a husband, with whom she can have no
feelings
in common; but the town, with a most
reasonable
compassion, takes pity on such, and yields
to them the free enjoyment of those delightsome
intrigues, which though exotic of origin, are found
to have wonderful ease of acclimation. I dare say
that with a little furbishing of my own pen, the
plaintive letter of my correspondent might be
turned into a very pathetic tale, which would draw
tears from the eyes of more than one of my
readers
;
and if a cool afternoon should be mercifully
vouchsafed us in the city, the coming month, you
may possibly hear farther from
Arabella
.
A snarling correspondent has addressed me quite
a long letter, in a dashing style, prefacing very
much verbal criticism, with a few generous
compliments
.
Speaking in general praise of the pure
English of my papers, he declaims lustily against
some lapses in my orthography; but keeps up my
good temper, by sneering in the same breath, at
Dr. Webster. Now I am no apologist for the
innovations
of our great lexicographer, and do not rest
my quickness in reform, upon spelling traveler
with a single I; but if one is to be condemned, it
is pleasant to be condemned in respectable
company
.
If I were to hazard a guess as to the character
of this correspondent, I should set him down for
some punctilious old bachelor, mightily critical in
small matters, and a deep student of his lexicon;
and who withal, is as much of a connoisseur in
brandies and pronunciation, as he is in dress or in
grammar. Such pleasant old gentlemen take
excessive
pleasure in being annoyed, and in finding
matter for condemnation; they are nothing if not
8*
critical; yet they are pleasant-witted fellows,
harboring
no ill-will; and the man who will never
impugn their authority, and never refuse them `a
choice in the packs,' will be sure of their
good-nature
.
It is difficult so far to watch both printer, and
proof-reader, as to give to all my papers accuracy
of orthography, or infallibility of language. The
most I can hope for, is to carry my meaning straight,
and pointedly; and this, with due respect for Mr.
Snarl, seems to me a higher object, than punctilious
observance of the dicta of grammarians. Our
language is one of progress, and is in the constant
receipt of new accessions from the phraseology of
science, and the introduction of foreign habit; and
the art of its use now-a-days, seems to me to
consist
,
not so much in strict observance of old
formularies
,
as in such a management of its material,
as shall enable it to keep pace with the growth of
modern inquiry, without impairing the force and
integrity of the old English idiom. I know no
reason why the social inquirer should be debarred
from the use of occasional descriptive terms, not to
be found in the dictionaries, any more than the
chemist, or the geologist. But the privilege, if
used, must be used with daintiness, and in the
conviction that the term employed is the most full,
and best possible presentment of the given idea,
that could be found.
Words, it is said, follow upon the sense, and play
the lacquey to the thought. `
Verba non invita
sequentur
.' This I should think eminently true of
the many elegant writers who are now swarming
on the town; and words do play such queer antics
to keep up with their notions, that a plain man is
lost in the pursuit of their meaning; and in a short
time, there can be little doubt of a demand for an
elegant dictionary as interpreter, edited by an
elegant
compiler. It is needless to say that I have
scrupulously endeavored to avoid interference with
our elegant men, who belong to the newspapers and
monthly magazines; and whatever may be said
against me by my enemies, I shall try hard to
avoid the odium of being condemned for an `elegant
writer.'
As for my correspondent, I will do him the credit
of saying, that his letter is well put together, and
that he has shown himself a critic of smart capacity.
He will very likely quarrel with so homely
language
;
but I want he should understand that I
have a sneaking fondness for homeliness, (not of
women, but of words.) And it is no little object
with me, in the prosecution of these Studies of the
Town, to catch hold of the strong, old-fashioned
English, and to see how it will bear contrast with
the cultivated delicacy of modern paragraphing.
I want to bring back to daylight some of those
homely, Saxon utterances, which, though they are
not tricked off with the furbelows of modern
haberdashery, carry on their backs such a burden
of strong sense, and such width of meaning, as
would split the muslin, and crack the corsets of
our
belle
language. And I must say that it has
been with a happy surprise that I have seen the
public welcome, and commend the homeliness of
my words; and accept as good coin, the
old-fashioned
,
plain speaking, which does not dodge
the matter at issue with rhetorical prettinesses, but
plants a right-down, honest, fisticuff blow, in the
very face and eyes of the matter.
A third correspondent thinks I should make a far
better preacher than clown; and advises me to
forego
all attempts at pleasantry, and content myself
with giving sober advice to the town. I strongly
suspect the fellow of being a bit of a buffoon
himself
;
and if I might judge from his letter, think
the bells would become him, much better than the
surplice. With due credit, however, to his
sagacity
,
I shall be sober, as I find subjects demanding
soberness, and not kill my pleasantry (as I fear my
correspondent sometimes does,) by giving it too
vigorous
a chase. I shall not set myself up, either
for a laughing Democritus of Abdera, or a sighing
Heraclitus of Ephesus; and with regard to giving
rules of action, and laying down a plan, as the
same correspondent proposes, I may refer to
Socrates'
reply to Cleander, in Lord Hardwicke's
Athenian
Letters; he was not confident, he said,
as yet, of the best course to be pursued; but he
was
quite confident that what he condemned was
wrong; and he chose rather to go where certainty
led him, than to lose himself in the mists of doubt
and difficulty.
I cannot in a better connection, allude to a
graceful
letter which has been sent me in a late number
of the Literary World. The kind writer has given
me much more praise than was deserved, but has
unfortunately dampened it with a very odious
objection
to my sincerity. The flattery I could have
forborne, better than I can bear the disapproval.
If the lady-writer (for she appears no less,) has
formed her opinion upon any fancied knowledge of
personal action, independent of the papers, she has
reasoned upon most false premises; and has no
right to allege that John Timon is not doing as
much as lies in the power of an humble man to do,
for arrest of the follies that are condemned, as well
by voice, and action, as by his pen. For with all
the apparent cognizance of the true authorship, I
must take the liberty of saying that she is in error;
and I only hope that the individual in her thought,
may wear the honor of fair words from a spirited
lady, with the grateful pride that becomes a
gentleman.
Nor can she suppose, if she be the sensible woman
that she seems, that any scorn of lady
indiscretions
,
is mark of disrespect for her sex; or that it
is not rather dictated by a higher regard, and a
more loving consideration, than animates the herd
who push their vain flatteries into the ear, and who,
in paying to our town-ladies, the tribute of stale and
unmeaning compliment, reduce them to the level of
their own perverted nature. A fair-minded woman,
who is what God made her, adorned with modesty,
and sublimated by purity, is as inaccessible to
praise, as crystal to lightning. Herself is the best
story of her worth.
And you, Fritz, will have grossly misread these
pages, if you have not caught glimpses of an
underlying
reverence for what is reverence-worthy in
the sex, which will have more than balanced any
harshness of expression, or lightness of remark.
There is something too devotional in the esteem felt
by every gentleman for a deserving and beautiful
woman, to permit careless mention, or to provoke
publicity. To say that such women are not to be
found in our town, would be to reduce us at once
to a state of barbarism, too dreadful to think
upon.
`What are these gentlemen censors doing, to
better
the social condition, they lament?' says our
fair querist, with an air of triumph, and with her
hand upon Miss McIntosh's Woman in America.
John Timon presumes to answeronly for himself,
that he is drawing attention to questions and
issues
which have been slept, and dreamed upon,
until
they were forgotten; that he is probing an old
ulcer, that so the foul matter may discharge itself,
and nature have a chance for a healthy healing.
He is venturing to test the propriety of what has
been accepted; and to call out defence, where no
defence was thought needful. Believing as he does
that social forms and fashions have much to do
with the spirit, and health of humanity, he has
endeavored
to call attention to vices and follies, which
even their lady patrons in their private moods have
long thought over, and deplored. He is kindling
their consciousness of something nobler and better,
that irks with the inaction that weighs it down.
He is hoping to light an impulse to reform, and to
reduce to the actual, the half-uttered regrets over
what is unreal and factitious.
But perhaps it is objected, that the whims of the
time are humored by gentlemen censors, that
vapidity
is met by vapidity, and that even men of sense
are apt students if need be, in the artificiality of
converse, and the most stupid of social formalism.
But surely it does not need the penetration of a
woman to perceive, that in this, the man is the
subject, and not the monarch. He must conform
to the ritual: and to maintain his place as a man
of the world, he must bend to the fashion of the
world. As Goldoni wisely says in his comedy, (
Le
Smanie`Chi vuol figurare nel mondo, conviene
che faccia quello che fanno gli altri
.'
But as I have more than once hinted in the
progress
of these papers,in social life, woman is the
mistress and man the slave. And yet, as is true
of many principalities, it is not the subject alone,
who suffers. It is the giver of the rule who laments
over wasted time, or wasted words: it is
she
who
deplores that long array of calls, and counter-calls,
those hideous jams and that education of the dance,
which though well enough in its way, bids fair to
overtop what grace of mind, or play of wit, she
possesses. It is she who shudders over the routine
of that fashion which compels her hours and her
thought; it is she who inwardly detests that
omnipotence
of position or caste, which makes her body
and soul the barter to a marriage contract, that
fastens her to the ever-revolving wheel of torture.
It is she who finds her thought, and deeper
sentiment
,
and irrepressible longings nothing, and worse
than nothing, because they are ever tantalized, and
never enjoyed.
The man is of a vagabond order, who can seek
solace in very many ways where the lynx-eye of
propriety cannot see him, nor the claw of morality
catch him; he can live, and enjoy life by stealth,
and reputable disorder; but the woman is hung in
the trammels that she herself has made.
The kind Boston friend who has favored me with
his commentary, will find a range given to his
observations
before he shall have smoked through the
present paper: and the gentleman of Wall-street,
who has so pertinently commended some study of
the morals of that portion of the town, shall not
long remain a neglected suitor.
A long letter, which wears a strangely clerical
air, takes occasion to commend some of my
religious
observations, and proffers most excellent
advice
,
for which I would express myself even more
grateful than I am needful. The letter gives me
good occasion to drop a word or two upon the topic
generally; and to declare at the outset against the
justice of an evening paper, which has condemned
9
what is called a `fling at the anniversaries.' It
must not be supposed for a moment, that John
Timon intended to throw contempt either on
Religion
or Religious teachers; self-respect, if no
worthier
motive, would utterly forbid. He is not one
of those leveling philosophers who seek to drag
down great things, by treating them as if they were
little; nor has he any wish, like some overfond,
intellective Doctors, to strand the mysteries of the
Godhead, upon the low beach of Humanity. Nor,
on the other hand, has he any squamishness in
broaching the topic; nor does he believe that either
church officers or offices, in white or black, looking
east or west, are too sacred for an honest and
homely handling in the types of the times. I see
no very good reason for thinking, that absurdity is
any the less absurdity because it slips from a
pulpit
,
or that extravagance is the more tolerable or
worshipful, because it is hung with a surplice, or
kept afloat with a fish-bladder.
Whatever may be the rights or the duties of
Doctors
,
I would venture to suggest, as I would suggest
to any sort of men, that they be careful to understand
what they write about, or what they talk about. It
is scarcely to be supposed that any man, not familiar
with the Rochester spirits, should be very effective in
condemnation of the drama, who does not know a
farce from a ballet, or a drop-scene from a foot-light.
Nor is it reasonably to be hoped, that a person
should be very pointed in his condemnation of
Rousseau, who has never read a line of Emile.
The Swiss writer was bad enough it is true; but he
had one or two capital qualities; he generally knew
precisely what he was attempting to deny, and did
not affect to know, that of which he was palpably
ignorant.
Although conservative in the main points, John
Timon would not like to avow himself a special
friend to the Calvinistic rack, whereby Christian
opinions are stretched into good pastoral form, and
a host of us condemned in a twinkling, to the great
discredit of the final Judgment. Nor am I one of
those who think that ceremonial is a very good
substitute for earnestness, or that all of genuine
devotion
can be slipped out of the soul on
Wordsworth's
lyrics, warmed with a watery-eyed
sensibility
.
Least of all, would I be disposed to join
forces with those intensely religious ones, who go
about, to dress the bruises that the Devil inflicts on
our poor sinning nature, with bulky bandages of
Hope, and plenty of the hard, dry lint of Faith, but
who are very apt to leave at home, the healing oil
of Charity.
I much rather would side with old Dr. South,
who says somewhere, that `a good man is
three-quarters
of his way toward the being a good
Christian
,
wheresoever he lives, or whatsoever he is
called
.'
But lest you be weary with my sermonizing,
Fritz, of which you shall have no more, until your
early apples are ripe, I shall sum up with a little line
of admonition from St. Austin; which will suit both
the High Doctors and the Low, and the
Westminster
catechizers, as well as the creed-men:
Ubi
charitas, ibi humilitas; ubi humilitas, ibi pax!
A BOOST FOR BOSTONIANS.
`Boost;to lift, or raise by pushing; to push up. [A common vulgar
word in New England.']
Dr. Webster
.
`Voyez un peu l'habile homme, avec son bent d'Aristote.'
Le
Medecin Malgre Lui
.
It
is pleasant to have within a radius of two or
three hundred miles of our town, such a sampler
of manners, morals and politics as the city of
Boston
.
There, conversation is an art of life, instinct
is refined by birth, religion is sublimed by
intellect
;
the Opera is cultivated with extravagance,
French pretence is confined to the kitchen,
education
supplies nerve to the feeble, dignity conceals
weakness, yellow flannel covers the babe, genius
riots at the Town and Country Club, and
Egyptian
princesses are unwrapped for the delight and
instruction of the learned. It is pleasant to leave
from time to time the brick and dust of New York,
its stifling heat, and crimson fronts, its sad foolery
of Perrine pavements, and everlasting omnibuses,
to stroll through the clean and Sunday-like streets
of our sister city, to lose one's self under the shadow
of Faneuil Hall, or to snuff the air (by permission)
of Beacon, or Mt. Vernonthose Pisgah heights,
from whose houses Puritan infancy looks forth
exultingly
upon its land of promisethe Boston
Common. Say what we will, Fritz, of that tidy
Eastern sea-port, Boston is altogether a nice place;
its weather is nice; its laws nice; its Juries nice;
its churches nice; its gentlemen nice; its literature
is nice; its taste is nice, and they have a nice
Religion.
More than all, its ladies are eminently nice. Far
be it from me, Fritz, a merely humble Republican,
to assume any intimate knowledge of the habits,
or private peculiarities of those whose birth,
accomplishments
,
air, and dignity, place them beyond
an ordinary man's observation. Boston princesses
are not easily laid hold of, and when unwrapped,
may turn out only a swaddled man. But even
station
does not forbid a certain knowledge of
excellencies
,
and they must console themselves, as they
9*
best can, for the afflictive dishonor of popular
mention.
Boston ladies are not so remarkable for beauty,
as for accomplishments; nor do the graces of their
persons often outshadow the attractions of their
mind. All those minor arts for the cultivation of
natural grace, which are so assiduously cultivated
by New Yorkers, are entirely discarded by
Bostonians
.
They talk better than they smile; they ride
better than they dance, and they walk better than
they waltz. French coiffeurs and
modistes
are not
receivable; and will not make polka partners, even
at the most retired of watering-places. The
Boston
lady is not much upon the public
thoroughfares
;
she may venture into Washington street,
but it is only for her shopping, and her morning
stroll upon the heights above the Common, is
simply hygienic; her luxury of display will be in
a ride to Roxbury, or a pretty `straw' at the
church.
The Boston lady talks always like a connoisseur
about paintings; and though her opinions of the
new Athenum gallery, are modulated somewhat
by the names, and reputations of the owners, they
are nevertheless, curt,
recherchs
, and decisive.
She is not given to any of the prettinesses of
Puseyism
,
reckoning them among such vanities as
small waists, and gaiter-boots; yet she is an
uncontrollable
admirer of Holy Families, of which
she finds a full supply in the newly-opened stock.
She is much more tenacious of head-dress, than of
foot-dress; and though not especially coy in the
matter of ankles, she studies very little the graces
of a
chaussure  son pied
.
The Boston lady is intellectual; and with all
her ruddiness of cheek, and robustness of form, she
is not a stranger to libraries, or to lectures, and her
opinions are far more apt to show the aplomb of a
woman, than the delicacy of a girl. She is a lover
of mystics, and a good patroness of Boston genius.
She occasionally dabbles herself in the ink, and
here and there, a touchy, testy letter in the Boston
Transcript, shows traces of a feminine hand, joined
to a masculine judgment. As her age ripens (and
even Boston fogs cannot always preserve freshness)
she may turn her faculties to the elaboration of a
stately paper, for that stateliest of Journals, the
North American Review. And there are those, as
I am informed on good authority, whose energy and
literary perseverance, are sometimes equal to a
perusal
of that extraordinary Paper.
The Boston lady has friends at Cambridge;
either a nephew who is a rising man in the
University
,
or a cousin who is making a stir in
Divinity
,
or an uncle who is a man of vast erudition,
or an acquaintance, or
quasi
lover, who is a pattern
of a scholar, or a Pindar of a poet. She
encourages
the Opera, more particularly if the piece has
been applauded in the Cambridge circles, and
echoed
by the Transcript. Nothing in her view, could
be more exquisite than the performance on the
night of the late high prices. Commendation was
general; and telegraphic, finger announcements of
the price of seats, ran around the house as so many
proofs of the genial and characteristic appreciation.
The Boston lady does not affect French; or,
rather
,
she reckons it a school-day accomplishment,
with which she does not often sully her lip in
society
.
The English lady is her pattern of
breeding
,
as she is her sampler of grace. Her ideas of
free dressing never go beyond Sir Peter Lely, and
would stop far short of his voluptuous beauties,
were they not hallowed by her recollections, or her
reading of Hampton Court. The lusts of the eye,
and the pride of life, are not so much among her
sins, as the sufficiency of the Pharisee. She is no
poor Publican, but by Heaven's bounty a Bostonian.
Her religion is intellectual to a fault, and her
Christian ingenuity revels in theologic conceits.
Between Messrs. Parker and Emerson, a divinity
radiates from every corner of Boston; a mystic
intellectism
pervades their fog of belief, from which
an occasional scintillation of genius breaks out, as
a signal for a shout, and as a new `star in the
East.'
Following close upon the Opera, the Egyptian
Princess has created one of the periodic fevers of
Boston. It was not allowed to the people of our
town to be the patrons of such a learned, and
antiquarian
exposition, as belonged to the unwrapping
of a mummy. The enthusiasm of our sister city
amounted even to romance, and poets made
anticipatory
sonnets to the Theban princess. Boston
prudery forgot its blushes in the presence of so old
and august a belle, and came prepared to witness
the unclothing of the high-priestess, without a veil.
The company was worthy of the interest of the
subject. Scientific men, the erudite Agassiz, and
the accomplished Bigelow, with a host of others,
were proud to lend their aid to the unfolding of
that mystery, which, for the time, was to throw
into the shade the lectures of a Hudson, and the
antitheses of a Parker. Day after day, the
enlightened
assemblage gazed upon the rapidly
diminishing
envelopes, occasionally forgetting their
dignity
in an operatic bravura, and only restraining a
shower of bouquets upon both lecturer and
princess
,
when it was discovered that the mummy was
a man! Dr. Bigelow blushed, and Professor Agassiz
put his hands in his pockets.
But the Bostonians are too well taught, and too
erudite to be surprised: the metamorphose
astonished
no one; and the old, withered, bituminous
Theban was as much a thing of course in the
progress
of their inquiry, as a north-easter to their
summer, or a mystery to their faith. Had it been
even a dipped, bituminous crocodile, there would
have been those present, who would have foreseen
it from the beginning, and who would have taught
Mr. Gliddon his hieroglyphics.
Upon the whole, the result was effective; it has
given an admirable topic for disquisition on
mysteries
in general, by the Town and Country Club.
The theologians are put upon the alert; and they
will lack their accustomed ingenuity, if they do
not draw from the contradiction of the mummy
case, to the mummy included, a new argument
against the authenticity of the Gospels. The
metaphysicians
,
too, possessed of the bare fact, that an
undoubted Egyptian princess, bore every appearance
of a man, will easily base upon it some new theory
of objective philosophy, for publication in Mr.
Brownson's
Review. The Historical Society of our town
will, without my suggestion, see the propriety of
putting in a claim for the scattered leaves of
papyrus
,
and the leathern belt strapped around the old
Theban. A paper should, of course, be prepared,
to be read at the next monthly meeting, showing
with historical accuracy, and with the acumen
characteristic of the Society, what might have been
on the papyrus if it had been longer, as well as
indulging in a few moral reflections upon leathern
belts and bitumen.
But, Boston is our fit rival; as fit as Sparta to
Athens; they will show us a Lycurgus for our
Solon,a Lysander for our Pericles, and (to their
honor be it spoken) a Spartan mother, for our
Aspasia
.
Even in the matter of associations, they
can fully match our Historical, with their
Horticultural
.
Our learned men of the University Hall
are not more zealous, philanthropic, and devotional
in their search after inscriptions, musty pamphlets,
and Dutch breeches, than the old, white cravatted
gentlemen of School street, in their pursuit of
vegetable
enormities, and their inquiries concerning
grub-worms and cabbages. Indeed, the assiduity
and earnestness of these vegetable philosophers of
Boston, would quite throw into the shade the
chocolate
and stale jokes of our historical doctors.
Boston bugs are classified, and not a chrysalis
can break upon the Common, but the size and color
of the escaping fly will be reported to the
Board-As
for carrots and mangel-wurzel, they are ticketed,
dressed, and exhibited as the triumphs of Boston
science, acting upon Boston soil.
The Boston Clubs are perhaps worth a note;
there is the Old Suffolk, coming near to our
`Union,' with its lazy, corpulent, dinner-loving
men, who talk slowly, and easily, and who are
always
sure their own opinion is the best possible
opinion; who look upon New York with
complacency
,
and who think it a rising town, and that it
will come, in time, to be a respectable city. There
is the Town and Country Club, once quite
promising
,
but now given over chiefly to Dial-men, who
rival each other in throwing shadows upon what is
light to other people; and in casting the electric
flashes of their words upon what is made darker for
such lightning.
The Temble, in their new building, numbers the
budding hopes of the Boston nobility;
distinguishable
,
in their case, by such exquisiteness of dress
as a Boston man can wear, and by much prattle
about the Traveler's Club, and the Reform
Kitchens
of London. They adore Britain, and turn up
their noses at the cholera, because it had no
English
run. Their learning is measurable by the
syntax of the Cambridge course, spiced with a
nominal knowledge of Porson's critiques; and their
taste in Art, is predicated on that British standard,
which governed the construction of the
pepper-boxes
on the Royal Academy, and which tolerates
the chalky extravagances of Turner.
As for the Tremont, it would show badly even
beside the New York Club; its evenings are lighted
up with rich talk of horses; and its heroes are they
who have triumphed over the virtue of an actress.
In a town like Boston, where an air of sobriety is
fastened upon the houses, and the streets, the
extravagances
of lust are loathsome. Splendor seems
in a measure to legitimate license; but a debauchee
who wears yellow gaiters, and a short-waisted
coat, is even more pitiable, than he is polluted.
But after all, Fritz, this neighbor town of ours,
is a strong town. It has an air of permanence and
civilization which does not belong to our tottling
splendor. In Boston, houses are built, not for sale,
or show, or balls, but for comfortable habitations,
and for homes. Streets are paved, not by
demagogue
jobbery, but by authority;not for fat
contracts
,
but for service. Municipal laws are made,
not for political capital, but for order; and police
regulations are enforced, not by accident, and
spasms of efficiency, but regularly, and for the
public
security.
Their education is not for the display of an
evening
,
10
nor for the getting of a marriage,but for
life. Their plans are not laid for the next week,
but for twenty years to come. Even their
coachmen
take their fares, not for a full dinner to-day,
but for a good reputation to their stand.
And the analogy obtains even in their literature;
books are written more for soberness, than brilliancy.
They are the result of study, more than of fervid
enthusiasm. Their Sparks, Prescott, and Ticknor,
labor, not so much for pretty complimentary
periods
in the Literary Journals, as for a name on
the catalogues of libraries. Boston men have the
power and the giftto wait. Boston belles (be it
said in parenthesis) have a little of the same.
The New Yorkers may temper their
condemnation
,
and their sneers by what I have set down;
for it shames them; and yet it is true. It will not
do to throw sarcasm lightly upon the compact and
vigorous manhood of the Massachusetts province.
There belongs to Bostonians a granitic hardness,
that will stand shocks; and that does not lack
either the felspar of Puritanic morality, the sharp,
translucent quartz of education, or the scattered
mica spangles of various accomplishment.
You and I, Fritz, have rambled enough about
the world, to set our opinion free of any
town-barriers
;
and where worth is to be found, in God's
name, let us be bold enough to say it. They may
acknowledge it with a kind grimace, or with a
sneer; with, or without either, I shall hope to
survive
.
It is said that when Theban Pindar was fined in
a large sum, for abuse of his native city, Athens in
consideration of certain complimentary terms which
the poet had bestowed, discharged the debt. If the
New Yorkers should ostracise John Timon for his
abuse, I trust that the Bostonians will be generous
enough, in view of his praises, to show him
Athenian
justice.
And now, my dear Fritz, hoping that this city
sultriness does not reach you,that your new milk
is not soured with thunder, and that your oat-fields
are fast feathering into blossom, I bid you, for a
fortnight more,Adieu.
Timon
.
11
THE LORGNETTE.
JULY 8, 1850. NEW-YORK. SECOND SERIESNO. 5.
Id arbitror
Ad prim in vita esse utile, ne quid nimis
.
Terence
.
Too
much of anything is worth very little; and
least of all, Fritz, in this sultry weather, will you
be able to bear a constant succession of city
pictures
.
There is a heat in the very words (I wish
it was my own) which carry a reflection of the
town atmosphere and habits. In winter, a poker
warmed by courageous stir of the combustible
material
about me, might pleasantly temper the flip
of your thoughts; but with the thermometer at 90,
and musquitoes come, you will need the cooler of a
country punch, or, at least, the prickly flatness of
the Saratoga water.
Even our town ladies are hot subjects at this
season, except they be put into the bath robes of
the Newport beach, or hung in the muslin
deshabille
of Judge Marvin's galleries. Your own cold,
grimalkin eye will, I am sure, reckon them the
more attractive in these new guises; and toward
their summer life and equipments I shall therefore
henceforward turn my
Lorgnette
. But, as a noon
ramble through your growing corn quickens your
appetite for a crisp salad and an iced pint of
Lafitte
,
let me throw in for contrast with the cool
gauze that is to flutter in my wake, one of the
hottest
pictures of our July Town.
THE WALL STREET BROKER.
`I went next down a pair of stairs into a huge cellar, where I saw
men burning in unquenchable fire, and one of them roaring, cried out,
I never over-sold; I never sold but at conscionable rates; why am I
punished thus? I durst have sworn it had been Judas; but going
nearer to him to see if he had a red head, I found him to be a
Broker
of
my acquaintance that dy'd not long since.'
Quevedo's
Vision of Hell. VI.
The
faces of Wall street are stretchy. Scarce
one turns of a morning from under the cool
shoulder
of Trinity, which does not wear as many
changes in the progress of the day, as a Gutta
Percha Jenny Lind in the fingers of the most
indefatigable
infant. The morals of Wall street are
as stretchy as the faces. Our hero, Paine, is
purposing
to convert water into fuel (a very
intemperate
purpose); if he matures his discovery, and is
desirous of something new for his fancy to work
upon, I would commend to him the conversion of
Wall street morals into some sort of Caoutchouc;
and feel confident, that if the conversion can be
wrought, a substance will be secured that will
make most elastic fishing boots, or money belts,
and very excellent suspenders, equal to sustain (if
desired) a man's weight, conscience and all.
As for the bench, the bankers, and the bar, such
of them as turn down the Wall street avenue, are
reserved for future notice; I wish now, Fritz, to
give you only a playful sketch of our stock-broker,
whose nature affords capital commentary on what
has been noted about elasticity.
The stock-broker is, professionally, nothing more
than a stock-broker. Lawyers are not
stock-brokers
,
nor physicians, unless retired from practice;
nor is the stock-broker a calico importer, or a grain
speculator, notwithstanding he sometimes deals in
`shorts.' But morally, and to outward
appearance
,
he may be something more or less than a
stock-broker. Sometimes he is prim, clean-shirted,
and may even venture upon a broad brim, and all
the outward sobriety of Quakerdom. He may be
sly, with heavy whiskers, twinkling eye, flaring
shirt-bosom, almost a swell in appearance, one
whom you would take for a cavalier at the
Minerva
balls; and yet, perhaps, he will hatch out
such a rise in figures, upon some small stock, as
will entitle him to immense respect at the
restaurant
where he dines. He may be of plethoric
habit, sometimes indulging in a white cravat
possibly a vestryman, or at any rate, very
thoughtful
at class-meetings, and with religious interest in
some younger brother, will give a nudge of advice
in favor of some
short
sale, while he stands by, in
the person of a friend, to buy up
long
. Money
changers in the Temple, is an old story; and to
sweep them out, would in our time be as serious a
work, as that told of concerning Hercules and the
Augean stables.
Most town morals are understood to vary with
the coat, sometimes with the season, and in very
many cases, with the demand. But stock morals
are quite uniform; and after no little observation,
I know not whether they are more `stiff' between
straight coat-collars, or under the embroidery of a
flash waistcoat.
11*
The stock-broker's capital is as elastic as his
morality; it is even more ethereal, and less
susceptible
of a practical, and easy working. In
ordinary
parlance, the sale of a house implies
ownership
,
and even the purchase of a mummy, whether
by tickets, or on credit, supposes property in, at
least, some sort of mummy. With the stock-broker
it is different; capital and tangible property are at
best mere
locum tenentes
; and our pompous
member
of the craft will knock you off five hundred, or
a thousand shares, without so much as the shade
of one in hand, or in pocket. And I use these
terms, inasmuch as what is in the hand or pocket
of the stock-broker is as effectively and practically
his own, whatever may be the delusions of his
church friends, or of any residuary legatees, as
anything that he eats or drinks.
Trifling sales, or purchase of half a million, leave
him in excellent good humor for his evening cigar;
though he knows not if to-morrow will rise on him
a broken man, or simply a man of broken faith.
His purse, like his soul, is a sort of Toricellian
vacuum
,
tube-shaped, into which solid matter rises,
as the Wall street atmosphere is, either heavy or
light. Now and then some querulous ones will
make a stir about some queer absorption of funds,
once called their own,quite indescribable, and
even less easily traceable by unpracticed eyes than
the rise of the mercury in the barometer; but the
stir, like atmospheric stir, will only serve to make
the silver mount in the pocket of our broker.
The stock-broker is dexterous at dodges.
Nothing
in a sporting way is prettier than his manner
of slipping out of a
combination
, just as it
approaches
a crisis; and nothing affords better game.
You have seen coursing, Fritz, if I mistake not,
upon the downs of Hampshire; and have been
delighted
with the way in which some veteran puss
will double
short
upon the hounds, just as they are
upon her; and will leave them to shoot their long
carcasses crazily in advance, while she gathers
breath and courage for a new run. There is
capital
coursing of that sort in our town, and prodigious
sweats
, this hot weather, in consequence. The
game is served up, as you know, in style. And
such hares, when caught, are, as Charles Lamb
advises, `done brown.'
The solicitation of a friend's money on deposit,
or the receipt of a patron's funds a day or two
previous
to a `break up,' are modes of treating Wall
street depletion, which, though not set down in the
rules of practice, are occasionally like homeopathic
ventures, eminently successful. Any but Wall
street morality would hardly recover a healthful
shape after such serious stretch; but the nature
of the material is proof, even against so violent
practice.
The broker, in his purchase of stocks for a friend,
is considerate. He assures him (with a finger in
his button-hole,) that though the price given was
the highest on the list, he had fears of a rise;
stock was stiff,might have fallen off a trifle at
the second call, but he had the friend's interest at
heart, and hopes he will gratify Madame ,
(the broker's wife,) by dining with them the next
Sunday.
It is not a little mortifying to one's pride, to find
our friend's superior sagacitythe friend of Wall
streetcommuting our dull dollars into very active
ones, on his own behalf; and to find our funds
rapidly sinking, while our friend is flourishing in
an opera-box, or sporting with his wife at the
Springs. Not only is it mortifying, but most
singular
,
and hard to be accounted for, except by
reason
of that peculiar elasticity already commented
on.
The broker is a man of taste, and chooses his
moneyed acquaintances as he chooses his wine
by color. Green is his favorite in the first, and
claret in the wine. He has an eye for pictures,
too, and prefers single figures to groups; and, in a
general way, does not much affect a crowded
background
.
Strong lights he abhors, and the
atmosphere
,
to his liking, is hazy and subdued. He
follows
the clergyman closely in his headings, and
will consider the chances of a rise in Harlaem
stock up to the `seventhly,'will turn the `
improvement'
into a lucky venture, and throughout
the closing prayer will cast about, as eagerly as
any, for a `new hope.'
The broker endeavors to preserve a uniformly
serene air, and is never hurried, except when in
search, at a late hour of the morning, of a brother
broker, who has a `few thousands over.' His
language
at the board is short and crisp, and never
wearies the thought, except of the uninitiate; it is
full of ellipses; his accusatives are governed by
Synechdoche
, and his mood, after a similar Greek
standard, is usually
optative
. He will sell you `a
hundred Harlaem at sixty, seller twentyfive to ten
up,' or `take 'em at fifty-seven at the opening, ten
or twenty up.'
He is fond of seducing some successful Pearl
street man, of ambitious views, into the
neighborhood
of the board; and, after an evening or two
over Delmonico's Chambertin, may bring him into
a healthful state for an `operation.' Its issue
will be apt so far to disgust our simple merchant
with Wall street, that he will ever after go to the
Fulton, or to the Bowery Banks for his discounts.
As for the legality of our broker's action, it is a
small affair, scarce cognizable even from the second
story windows of the Wall street offices. His field
standard is honor, which is as steady as his
morality
,
or as the politics of the Herald.
He has a bowing acquaintance with the writers
of `money articles;' and is on easy terms with
telegraph operators. He has even been known to
invite them to dine, and to supply gratuitous
advice
about the prospective value of stocks. He
also cultivates occasional acquaintance with such
literary gentlemen as write letters of general
intelligence
for the newspapers; and he has been known
at times, himself to furbish up racy sketches of
railway accidents, and very sympathetic appeals
against the wanton disregard of human life,
manifested
by the Norwich and Worcester Railroad.
[4]
[4]
The Wall street gentlemen are informed that John Timon,
having already invested the sum accruing from the sale of the
first volume of the
Lorgnette
, is not looking out for any of the
Norwich Stock.
Some engine, too, of extraordinary speed, will
sometimes
keep him to a pretty period or two about
mechanism in general, accompanied with the
information
(quite accidentally thrown in,) that the
extraordinary engines in question, have been
secured
for that admirably conducted road, from
New York to Albany.
The broker, as he advances in life, stretches from
some down-town lodging-house, to a fashionable
hotel, or to a reputable square. He becomes a
patron of benevolent enterprises, particularly in his
own house. He surprises his wife with a Cashmere,
the poor box with a pistareen, and his friend, the
country capitalist, with a balance against him, and
an invitation to dine. He grows bland, and
habile
of featurelike the gutta percha headswith
twisting; he pays more heed to his shirts, to the
opera and to the church, diverting his elasticity
into up-town channels. His coach may, in time,
drive to Wall street to take him up, and the great
elasticities of his career, whose memory still lingers
in some sorely pinched pockets, are sheltered with
strongly welded ribs of brick and gold. He is a
lover of dinners, and rarely, however he may be
cramped, dines short He becomes a pillar of our
town society, and by dint of a fat subscription, a
manager of some artistic union.
Yet the heated air of Wall street is as necessary
to his health, as hot places are always, to hot
natures
.
Beelzebub out of Pandemonium would be
as ill-placed, as our broker away from the board.
And if he goes up into a high mountain, where air
is fresh, he goes like the brimstone tempter of old;
and from some prospective coal-field, he will point
out the shining tracks of water, and the bright
mineral beds for future combustion, which, if
grasped, or longed for, will consume his victim.
God grant you, Fritz, nerve and firmness to
withstand
the Tempter, whether he be broker, or be
Baal. May your conscience keep firm, and not
lose shape under pinching and pulling; and
whatever
you may do in the sultry air of our Wall street
summer, keep yourself free from a Wall street
initiative to that hotter place, where the `fancies'
are in active demand, and toward which elastic
morality is very apt to rebound. Our brokers hold
large stock in the inclined plane that leads thither;
and remember, before you take shares,that
facilis
descensus Averni
pray look up your hexameters
yourself; and forget this Dantean measure of our
broker, in a
puis
spondee, and
nean
dactyl.
A TASTE OF THE SPRINGS.
cum tamen in confesso sit, Thermas illas et fontes,
virtutes suas
, ex
venis mineralium, per quas permeant, nancisci. Hane igitur partem,
de
imitatione natur
in balneis artificialibus, desiderari censemus
.
Bacon
.
De Augment. Scient. Liv. IV.
Lord Bacon
laments that science, in his day,
after all its study of poisons, could not make up a
good mineral spring, or, as we should say, a good
watering-place. The venerable Chancellor had
never taken a Seidlitz powder, nor `put up' at
Congress
Hall. Were this old lord Verulam upon his
legs now, and equal to a summer divided between
Sharon and Saratoga, he would find abundant topic,
not only for
Augmentis Scientiarum
, but, if I do
not greatly misjudge, for an entirely new series of
the
Interiora Rerum
.
It hurts my modesty grievously, Fritz, to drop
an
ego
so near the name of the great philosopher; but
the truth is, that this system of periodic
paragrahing
does so dull one's diffidence, and so deprave his
native sense of decency, that unless I use great
forbearance, I shall soon find myself expressing
opinions, with all the assurance of Mr. Bennett, or
of the Boston Post.
Our towns-people are not a rural people, my
dear Fritz,scamper as they will, to
watering-places
,
of a summer. The love of country is no
way infectious with New Yorkers. Were there
only some Hyde Park convenient to the city, for
evening drives, or some Prater with its brilliant
Cafs
, or some
Bois de Boulogne
with its retired
and unfrequented copses, I question very much if
the infirmities of our belles would demand the
sulphurous
12
treatment (of Sharon), or even the
carbonated
action of Saratoga.
Here and there, it is true, some old gentleman,
who has been, on a visit abroad, hospitably
entertained
at Hampstead, or Twickenham; and who
is anxious to follow out the English ideas of
comfort
,
will buy himself a magnificent country seat,
hire, upon Thorburn's recommendation, a Scotch
gardener, and go out for three months in the
summer
to amuse himself with astonishing the
neighbors
,
cursing the musquitoes, reading the
newspapers
,
and feigning content with his larder. But in
nine cases out of ten, he will be very ready and
very anxious to hurry back to his `brick-house' on
Washington Square, and enjoy his cigar in the
basement.
We have got very few of that class of men, who,
like hundreds along Lombard, or Thread and
Needle
street, have their little suburban places, flanked
by a pet of a garden,as far off from the city as
Clapton, or Stamford hill from the Bank,where
they go each night, at five, to enjoy a luxurious
dinner
,
a pint of London-dock Port, a quiet smoke
under the trees, and a talk with John, the gardener,
about the dahlias, and the honeysuckles. Our
suburban men have got no ruddy-looking
daughters
to run down to the green gate, to meet them,
and no substantial wife in the bow window, to
smile a home-sort of welcome, as the city man
moves up the gravel walk, at a pace which says,
as plainly as words could say it,that he has a
capital appetite for his dinner. I doubt very much
whether one Pearl street man in twenty, could
distinguish
the Camelia from the Azalia; or say
which was native, or which exotic. Such native
taste as may come to the town with him, is
scorched
off by the harrowing years of his trade travail.
There are no Regent's Parks, or
Jardins d'hiver
to
keep it alive.
Thus it happens, Fritz, that no country place is
secured, in the majority of instances, until the
wife, or the position, demand it for talk or show.
And then, unless our townsman be fortunate in his
gardener, and architect, the country seat will offer
a sad spectacle of God's work, at the mercy of a
taste refined in Pearl street, or cultivated by
assiduous
study of the South street wharves.
This matter, however, of city cottages, suburban
taste, and cockney ruralities, is a good subject for
a full chapter: and you may be assured that it
shall have my early attention. Meantime we must
follow our city families to those resorts, which
receive
them, in lieu of country seats. And these
resorts
show the temper of our town; they are not
quiet; not, in many instances, even rural; but
they are bustling, overflowing, noisy, showing a
sort of city festivity, transplanted to the fields, or
the shore.
Occasionally, it is true, some town family will
find quarters in a country village, where the air is
good, and the society respectable; but ten to one,
the family is encumbered with a short string of
town infants, to whom it is necessary to give good
breathing room, and liberal toilettes. But once let
the little misses twist their nursery tails under a
comb, and drop the broad hem in their dresses, and
they will pine for the pungent waters of Saratoga,
and sigh for the salty saturations of Newport.
Our watering-places, like our town routs, have
their scales and grades,not of hygienic properties,
merely, but of caste and respectability. And, as
in the town, it is worth while to foist one's self upon
the set, where Madame Goodstyle is received, so it is
well to become the familiar visitant of such springs
as help the gout of somebody's Excellency, or as
cure some distinguished dyspepsia. Indeed,
watering-places
might easily be divided into
First class watering-places,
Second class watering-places, and
Third class watering-places.
The first group, to give the matter philosophic
classification, might be arranged in two
sub-divisions
;to
wit, the easily accessible, and the not
easily accessible.
The easily accessible will be honored with the
presence of a vast many fashionable persons, of
known worth and position, spiced with a
considerable
number of ambitious and deserving people,
desirous
of being `genteel,' and assiduously
studying
how to be. There will also be suddenly-rich
people, following in brilliant wake, and an
incredible
number of barbers, gamblers, pleasant young
gentlemen in moustache, and nankeen pantaloons,
male dancers, and other Epicene persons, who, like
the camp-women, pick up a tolerable living by
doing
small services for the rank and file.
Those places, difficult of access, are not overrun
by givers of concerts, or by men of uncertain tone
in any calling. Being well protected, they are in
high favor; they are much sought after by
Bostonians
,
and by `old families' generally. They are
attended, however, by an annoying mixture of the
newly rich, who have the shrewdness not to
husband
their pennies, when dignity and refined
intellectual
intercourse are in the market, at so very
cheap a rate.
The second class watering-places, are either first
class a little gone by, or they are growing places,
12*
which by respectable city representation, will
shortly
come to the first rank. They are generally towns
possessing really valuable springs, where you will
see a great many honest-looking old people hobbling
with a rheumatism, which they call the gout; and
a great many stout, red-faced ladies, who are `very
delicate.' This very seriousness is utterly
antagonistic
to the spirit of the first class; and a
genuine
invalid at Sharon, or Newport, is almost as
rare as a thoroughly well-man at Lebanon, or at the
unctuous springs of Avon.
As for the third class, they are quiet little
country
spots, where many a man of sense will go for
undisturbed enjoyment of the country, and whose
worst visitants will be some rough, honest country
people, whose yellow silk handkerchiefs and
promiscuous
use of napkin, would serve as the
nucleus
for a capital period in one of Mr. Cooper's
American novels.
Of all these classes, my dear Fritz, you shall have
from time to time a report, and shall bear me
company
in type, now to Newport or the Mountain House,
and again to Nahant or Crawford's,or as you have
already borne me company in person, at the Vier
Jahreszeitzen
of Wiesbaden,on Frascati's beach, in
Frascati's bathing robes, or stretched through the
livelong
night upon the hard floor of that little highland
inn, which lies midway between Lochs Garry and
Oich.
I shall entertain you now with a letter, which,
like a great many books now-a-days, `was never
intended for publication.' It has come to me
through the hands of my friend Tophanes, who is
on intimate terms with the parties. He says it is
characteristic; I should think it very likely. I
suspect it must describe the young lady's first visit.
U. S.
Hotel, Saratoga Springs
.
My Dear Kitty
:
Here we are at length, and what a charming
place!such trees, and dinners, and then the
bowling alley; (do you ever bowl?) if you do, get
a pair of those pretty gaiters at
what-d'ye-call-him's
.
Papa has taken two rooms for us in the
east wing, and Marie sleeps in a little alcove just
out of mine. The galleries stretch around inside
the wing, and several gentlemenmarried
gentlemen
,
ma says(but very handsome) pass very
often. You don't know how pleasant it is to sit in
the window, in that
deshabille
you said was so
becoming
.
Ma begins to think so too, for Miss
Figgins
has got one just like it.
They say the company is not very good yet, so,
of course it isn't; but you don't know how many
elegant gentlemen there are lounging in the gallery
down by the office. I can see them now and then
through the trees. I think there is rather too
much shade; it looks gloomy, you know.
Ma don't know a great many people yet; and
she says I am too backward; I am backward; but
then it is very awkward always to come up and
interrupt mamma, when she is talking with a
strange gentleman. She says it's very proper; do
you think so? There are some foreign-looking
gentlemen (don't you like a moustache?) who
somehow manage to talk without being introduced.
I like that; there is something so romantic in it;
and then beside, you don't know but you may be
talking to some foreign prince. I walked for an
hour last night, under the front colonnade with
such a dear man! I shall be quite ashamed of
cousin Dick when I get back to the city.
Papa tries to make us go to the Springs early
every morning, but ma and I don't wish to. One's
eyes look so heavy after sitting up till twelve.
Besides, none but old gentlemen go to the Springs
in the morning, and some of them are vulgar
acquaintances
of ma's; and they are so abominably
familiar, that I will not bear it. Marie says it is
vulgar to go to breakfast in bare arms; but the
Fidges do; and there's a gentleman nearly
opposite
me, who I know admires them; he looked so
hard at them, he scarce eat anything.
I wish papa would keep a man-servant to stand
behind us at table; a great many do who are not
half so rich as pa; who, he says, owe him; but
he can't get it. Droll, isn't it? The bareges are
all the fashion; so are those dear little charms; I
wish I had bought more of them. If you are down
at Black's buy me a little dagger, a coral dog, a
hand with a ring, and a cornelian heart, and
anything
else that's sweet, and send them up by
express
.
You know I walk well, at least Marie says so,
and it's a great thing here; such everlasting
promenades
in the galleries; if you mean to come, you
had better practice. In the morning I write
letters
,
up by my window, in the white muslin, with
a flower or two in my hair. Then I dress for
dinner
,
which takes about three hours. I wish papa
loved hock; to be sure it's sour stuff; but then it
looks so distinguished to have the green glasses;
the Figginses do. I don't eat much at table; you
know one is so watched; and then, I don't know
why it is, but I never have an appetite. Marie,
good soul, brings me up a nice plate of cold beef
and pickles, every night.
Pa eats just as he does at home, and Ma can't
prevent it. It's very mortifying only to think of
the way he eats spinage and salads! I overheard
a gentleman who was looking at him the other
day, whisper something about
dejeuner  la fourche
,
at which the lady next hima perked-up sort of
thinglaughed very hard. What does it mean?
I always thought it was
fourchette
. Isn't it?
After dinner we go into the parlor, where it is
very dull, until the gentlemen have finished
smoking
.
Sometimes, though, we go out to ride. Ma
and I went yesterday with Mr. Templeton, out to
somebody's lake,one of the wildest places. Mr.
Templeton repeated some of Willis's lines. He
said it reminded him (the lake, not the lines,) of
Salvating Rosa. He is a very talented young man,
and I will introduce you when you come up. I
believe he knows French; at any rate, he
pronounces
soire
and
amour
beautifully. Before
teatime
we are all walking, and, perhaps, go down to
the Spring, or stroll up to the railway upon the hill.
I like it; but there seems to be nobody but vulgar
people riding, so ma has forbidden it.
Do you think, Papa took boiled onions yesterday,
and then offered to help mamma, though she looked
the other way, and then he wanted to know if the
Springs had changed her taste? I thought mamma
would have gone off.
You have n't sent me the last number of the
Lorgnette
. They say John Timon is here, I think
I saw him yesterday; he is a thin, tallish man,
with sandy moustache, but not at all
distinguished-looking
.
I should say he was about forty-five;
and, would you believe it, he has got a wife and
baby. Who would have thought it?
Some of Pa's friends stopped at the Union, and
they wanted us to go there. But one don't see
half so much, or get into notice half so quick. To
be sure Uncle Dick says there are better men to
marry at the Union, but they are not half so good
to flirt with.
A handsome gentleman sitting under the trees,
is reading a newspaper (or pretending to,) and
looking
every little while up to my window. I am
getting
tired, Kitty, so I shall close.
Your true friend, &c.
P. S.The gentleman in the chair is the one I
walked with the other evening,a charming man;
he has just bowed to me.
2nd P. S.I will tell you more about him in my
next.
Adieu, Chre Amie
.
Now, my dear Fritz, do not knock the ashes from
your cigar with a petulant flip of the finger, and
say`this is all sad stuff.'
I like its
naive
variety, and brokenness of
utterance
;
it shows you, moreover, the habit of the hour,
and of the time. It is one of those gossamer
playing
shadows, which the sun of the summer life
throws upon the dial of American habit. It is a
small side-view, which goes to make up a part of
our social history, as we advance toward a
perfected
civilization.
Read considerately, then; sip composedly of
your port, in all charity; and I, when my letter
shall be sealed, will balance the kindness of your
thought in a wee-bit of iced Geissenheimer.
Timon
.
13
THE LORGNETTE.
JULY 20, 1850. NEW-YORK. SECOND SERIESNO. 6.
Mors sola fatetur,
quanta
sint
hominum corpora
.
Juvenal
(ad Fid.
Timonis
.)
Our
President is dead!
Fritz, God forbid that you should think me so
far gone with the frivolities of the town, or so much
engrossed by those phases of social interchange
which make up the chronicle of our summer
history
,
that I should either forbear, or hesitate to drop
both an encomium and a tear at our nation's loss.
You know me, Fritz, as an American; you know
that none of the lascivious luxury and attenuated
civilization of Europe, have been able to withdraw
my sympathies and soul from that country where I
was born, and to which shall always be credited
gratefully, whatever slight consideration may be
won. With this knowledge, you will have
anticipated
my poignant sorrow at the death of the man
who, from birth, education, habit, reputation and
success, was the man of all our public men, to
form, by his weight and probity, such
balance-wheel
to our eccentric, administrative machinery,
as should secure its regularity, and perfect its
issues
.
I do not at all envy the reputation or the
reflections
of that Congressional declaimer,
[5]
[5]
Mr. Thompson of Mississippi.
who so
recently
,
stirred by party animosity, moved the vote
of censure upon the language of our dead hero. I
doubt much if he has anybody's envy. Yet he has
won a singular distinction, worthy even of my
humble record; and by one marvelous stroke, he
has achieved a splendid notoriety, and covered his
name with a blasting renown. Let not the hope
of following our idlers to their summer recreations;
or our social studies, of whatever strangeness, make
you begrudge the half page on which I record my
sorrow, and a nation's grief.
Read my epigraph again; it is altered widely
from Juvenal:
Corpuscula
has become, to the
fault of the metre,
corpora
. The diminutives are
abandoned, and the positive is assumed. Death
has told us, not of how little worth was the man
called Zachary Taylor, but of how great worth.
God grant that the times and the men may fill
up well the gap that the Presidential grave has
opened! And may Providence, that has touched
us terribly, so order events and action, and so
control
and moderate the spirit of our newly-come
President, as that the altered epigraph may rest
properly upon his tomb-stone, and the world of
to-day
exclaim
Bene tanti fieri!
It is well to be
worth so much!
THE HABIT OF OUR AMUSEMENTS.
Cela se fait,cela ne se fait pas;voil la decision supreme
.
St. Preux a Julie
.
The
stranger who saw our town only in this
heated month of summer, would have very incorrect,
and unsatisfactory notions of the life and aspect of
the town year. We are pre-eminently a business
and a practical people, (without giving even the
Bostonians
the benefit of an aristocratic exclusion;)
and, at the same time, we are the most arrant, and
impetuous seekers of pleasure that are to be found
in the world. The foreigner coming among us at
any ordinary season, and finding few theatres
where action is an art,few operas where a
delicate
appreciation of music makes the charm,few
public balls where gayety is the impulse, and the
end,few hotels where daily enjoyment is the
pursuit
,
and not mere getting of food, and getting of
lodging; and few mansions where the proprietors
study a leisurely enjoyment of life's best comforts,
would decide that we were given over, body and
soul, to trade.
And he would be more than half right: with us
business is the habit,pleasure is an exception.
The hurry of enterprise, and commercial endeavor,
may be likened to the regular, leafy development
of a plant, in which the abounding succulence goes
only to supply foliage; while our paroxysms of
pleasure-hunting may be aptly compared to that
extraordinary action of the vegetable life, which
shows itself in flowers. Our female plant, to renew
the simile, blossoms twice a year,once in
mid-summer
,
and once in mid-winter. Our male plant
has but the single flowering period of mid-summer;
an exception, however, is to be noted, in favor of a
certain class of perennial beaux, who blossom
double
,
and who, like all double-blossoming trees, make
no fruit.
13*
In the cities of the Old World it is different.
There, pleasure is a part of life. It is incorporate
with the whole animal and mental being. It is an
element of their civilization. It is compacted with
the whole manhood; and it is the daily grace of the
life of woman. We, on the contrary, are in that
stage of civilization, where all hands and nearly all of
energy, are busy upon the crude, mechanical
framework
of society; and toward those cultivated
pleasures
which will fill up the interstices of a
perfected
civilization, we reach by spasms of desire, and
grapple them by piece-meal, and apart.
I do not know, Fritz, if I convey to you by such
language a fair idea of what I wish to express.
Let me give you, therefore, a practical illustration.
Our mid-summer, by habit and conventional usage,
is our pleasure vacation. Being such, it is a
business
to enjoy it. To enjoy it, the country must be
sought,no matter what may be the ties of
circumstances
,
or of employ,no matter how rough the
roads over which we are to travel,no matter how
shabby the hotels we are to visit,no matter what
may be our tastes, or habitual indulgences,no
matter what may be the fashionable shackles which
are to hamper us,the business in hand is pleasure,
and it must all be called pleasure.
The pursuit is entered upon as we enter upon a
commercial speculation; there is the same rapidity
of movement; the same bustle of progress, and the
same fears of failure. The hunt after enjoyment is
a venture, into which our anxieties enter as much
as into an investment in grain, or in stocks.
Pleasure is a marketable commodity; it is a
business
in hand, upon which valuation is set, by cost.
We bag it as we bag game; and estimate it, like
hunters, by the difficulties of the capture.
I put it to you, Fritz, if the European has not
more method in his madness? Are not his
recreations
more intimately blended with his life, and with
his daily habit? Are they not more a part of him,
and less hideously objective? Enjoyment with
him is not at the end of some rough journey, but
lies, on either hand, along his road. It is not
with him a matter of patent manufacture, whose
excellence is to be established by puffing, but it
is a thing of education, and of existence.
The Englishman quits London for his country
place, for Brighton, or for the Moors, not altogether
when the town chooses, but when he chooses
himself
.
He loves variety, in his way; but he
acknowledges
no high road, by which it is always to be
approached
,
and out of which no enjoyable variety is
to be found. He may love the Cliffs of
Scarborough
,
or the rural attractions of Leamington, or the
splendor and parade of Cheltenham, but he does not
like to admit that either one or the other, is
absolutely
essential to the attainment of a summer's
pleasure, or that talk of them is to make up the
only valid catalogue, and measure of his
enjoyments
.
The Parisian, tiring of the Sunday's talk in the
Passage de l' Opera
, or of the Sunday evenings in
the
Grand Balcon
, may run away to the terrace of
St. Germain, to the baths of Dieppe, or to the waters
of the Pyrenees. And this he doesif done at all
because he can afford it, and because he finds a
pleasure in every step of his progress; and not
because
crowds have gone before him, or because it
will be essential to the chat of the winter, to talk
either of Pau, or of Aix la Chapelle.
There is nothing conventional in his pursuit of
pleasure; it sits on him as easy as his coat; and
when it irks him, he throws it off as sudden as
his dressing-gown. Because the Champs Elysees
are without their equipages, he does not consider
himself debarred the pleasure of a drive; nor does
he repine because he cannot find rooms at the same
watering-place with her Grace the Duchess. Into
the whole web and woof of his life are twisted the
gilded threads, which give the blazon of
amusement
;
they are not arranged in bands, broad,
heavy, and cumbrous, but are fine, and evenly
distributed
.
Do not understand me, Fritz, to undervalue our
national characteristics of enterprise, and
commercial
vigor, or to admire more the easy, and life-long
indulgence, which belongs to a graceful, but a
frivolous
nation;and yet a nation which can well
instruct
us in the matter of those amusements which
adorn civilization. It is hardly worth while that
our summer pleasures be piled up in masses, and
be billeted, and appraised, like so much gauze
merchandise
:
they should be tempered by common
sense, and so worked into the cloth of life, that
they may decorate it and relieve it everywhere.
Nothing is to be feared, and much is to be gained
by a comparison of our recreative resources, with
those of a people, who have served a very long
apprenticeship
at the trade. The true art of rational
amusement is in so moderating, and multiplying
its characteristics, as that there may be no danger
from satiety, and no intemperate flush from undue
excitation.
I began, Fritz, with saying something about the
July aspect of our town; it is not like the winter
town. The streets still have their fullness; but
it is not the fullness of the spring-tide, or of the
hybernal flood. Even such of the winter belles as
remain have changed their air; they have become
moderate in dress, and less exacting in their
demands
.
They glide slily in the shadows of the
houses, as if their vacation had come, and as if
their need of city display had gone by. Some few
who were not noticeable in the fullness of the town,
and who have adroitly out-stayed their more
successful
rivals, are grown into objects of attraction,
and are reaping a harvest of favors from those who
possess the habit of bestowal. In the comparative
absence of equipages, too, not a few see the
possibility
of arresting attention; and will triumph in
a Brougham, that two months ago would have
given only the most tedious chance of success.
Middle-aged ladies, who, in the plethora of the
winter festivities, might have despaired of smiles,
can now win such adoration as finds no other
object
.
Neglig
dresses are both in rule, and in
worship
.
Etiquette is forborne; and belles may shop
at their grocer's without fear of observation, or of
remark. The town may be fairly reckoned in
deshabille
,
and a kind of easy looseness (I mean no
harm) belongs both to its dress, and to its habit.
The formality of receptions is passed away, and
people chat from balcony to balcony, as if they
belonged
to a common family.
As you will naturally suppose, there are long
lines of deserted houses which a month ago may
have been exceedingly gay. An old gentleman,
whose wife and daughters are at the Springs, reigns
for once in his own house, and over his own
household
,
and appears to enjoy exquisitely his freedom.
He may be seen peeping at dusk from between the
half-opened shutters, with an air of pride and
independence
,
which, though it does not sit upon him
naturally, will yet impose upon many the belief
that he is master of his own mansion. He may
even smoke in the balcony, with an audacious front,
that owes its character only to the distance that
lies between the town and his wife. In the ecstatic
enjoyment of his temporary supremacy, he may
even crack jokes with the maid, without fearing
the punishment of a wife's glance. He will take
advantage of the opportunity to cultivate a
neighborly
spirit with the ladies about him, and astonish
them by his courage. Whether his wife may not
be balancing the account, in her own way, at the
Springs, is a question I may broach later in the
season.
Pursy gentlemen, who are heads of families, and
who are allowing their wives and daughters a
week's shopping in the town, may be seen walking
at dusk with their domestic trains, flanked,
possibly
,
by some negro nurse or body servant. A
Southern influx gives its tone for a time to the
public parlors of the town, and the lions of the day
are strangers. Strange faces are in the public
shops, and the churches are sprinkled with
strangetrimmed
hats. Amusement has driven away the
absentees, and amusement has brought in the
new-comers
.
But while this summer rush for
amusements
makes the town bare of its old formalities,
it imposes its peculiar restraints upon character
and habit at the watering-places. Nor are these
restraints, for the most part, those either of morals
or of religion; (it being generally understood that
the winter education supplies a sufficient stock
of these useful and respectable matters). The
restraints
are of the making of that special tyrant
which we Americans delight to honorI mean
public opinion.
Even the arbitrary enactments of the town lose
their force, and rules of propriety languish. What
will be said, and what will be seen,give a turn to
our summer's choice, the color to a summer's
wardrobe
,
the moderation to our summer action, and a
zest to the summer amusement.
A little township of jealousies, sects, and
reputations
grows up in the heart of each of our
summer
resorts; and it forms no small part of the
amusement to keep them warm and active. We
amuse ourselves by cultivating assiduously a
happy
notoriety; and our poor belles, worn out with
the fatigues of a winter, restore their languishing
systems with such air, such dresses, such dances,
such hates, and such acquaintances, as fashion
declares
nutritious. If the bitter, nauseating waters
of Sharon have touched pleasantly the fancy, or the
palate of some town leader of the modes, it
becomes
part of the summer amusement to cultivate
the sulphurous taste. If riding is in vogue, or
Madame Such-an-one has given the cue, it is
capital
amusement to ride. If their graces, who
discipline
the hour and the modes, have set their
hearts on Newport, there will be crowds who will
get the first hint of their amusements, by following
in their wake. If Avon is vulgar, with its
strong-smelling
waters, and its rough, honest country
folk, it is a part of fashionable amusement, to stay
away.
If the society of a watering-place, by popular
mention, is reckoned good, it is part of our
amusement
to be amused with it; but if the society is
doubtful, or mixed, or lacks the quickening leaven
of well-known names, it is the part of our seeker
of amusement to be horribly
ennuy
.
In short, my dear Fritz, it will not do to be
amused without discretion. A reliance on one's
14
own appreciation of entertainment, is a very unsafe
reliance; and one may be subjected to the
mortifying
reflection of having found amusement in
what the amusement fanciers utterly condemn. A
schedule of the means and appliances might be
judiciously
,
and most charitably prepared, by which
the ignorant would be informed of all that would
be requisite for a summer's amusement. Into such
schedule might safely enter the details of some
given lady's management; as, for instance,her
choice of resort,the style of her morning dress,
the name of her coiffeur,a list of her tenpenny
novels,the intervals in her town correspondence,
the age of her partners in the polka,her
pronunciation
of
plaisir
, and of
liason
,her terms of
endearment, ordinary and extraordinary, and her
views on social education. With all these made
known, it would be a very dull pupil who did not
learn the art of a summer's amusement.
Am I not right, Fritz? Is there not a base
subserviency
to formalities, and to opinionated
dictation
,
in the very search for recreation? And do
not one half of those so eager in the pursuit of a
summer's pleasure, utterly lose sight of any
healthful, and natural promptings, in the chase of
what some notoriety has decreed?
But I am in too sober a vein for the sultriness of
the air, and must give over my sermonizing, until
autumn shall have fanned us, and the amusements
of a season lie under our eye.
WATERING-PLACE PEOPLE.
`
Rarus enim ferm sensus communis in ill Fortun
.'
There
exists a class of people in the country, who
seemed designed by Providence specially for
watering-places
.
They make their appearance summer
after summer at Newport, or Saratoga,adorn with
their presence the cycle of the season, and then pass
out of sight until the Springs and the summer
hotels revive their intermittent existence. They
seem gay, cheerful, and admirably calculated by
nature, for that species of enjoyment which belongs
to a heated atmosphere. Like the summer brood
of flies, they grow festive in the sunshine,
[6]
[6]
The comparison, Fritz, will lead you to recall an exquisite scrap of
the old Anthology. The songs and claws of the parties under notice,
will justify the citation, although it be too flattering to stick into my
text;
Two lines of Greek.
and lose
their grace and activity, if not their existence, as
the season advances.
With not a few of these, there is a particular
method of advance, which serves to variegate the
charms of their summer life. The closing days of
June will, perhaps, find them at Rockaway, or at
Fort Hamilton, from which they migrate in swarms
toward the sand plains of Saratoga; from thence
they swoop down in the heat of the season, and
settle
for a day or two upon the rocks by the
Mountain
House. At the striking of the tents, they will
revive their last year's flirtations with the
graycoated
cadets, or grow sentimental upon the walk
by the shore, or indulge in romance at Kosciusko's
tomb. Still later, they catch the breezes of
September
at the Ocean House; and having adorned with
their presence the closing ball of the season, they
fade away upon the water, and are lost to public
wonder for a winter.
In this species of people, may be enumerated
vagrant familiesnot without pretensions to
beauty
,
and other pretensions to matchwho are the
inhabitants of some quite traditionary locality,
the descendants of some traditionary ancestry,
the possessors of some traditionary fortune, and
the heirs to some traditionary renown.
They are the subjects of periodical doubts, and
annual discussion, as well as of July admiration.
They neither seem to disappear by marriage, or by
any other Providential dispensation. Year after
year they appear, without growing old, or growing
new. If some vague report has disposed of a single
number, there is some new member to fill up the
gap. If misfortune has overtaken them pecuniarily,
it does not, in the slightest degree, alter their periodic
migration, or the eccentricity of their movement.
In the winter season, nearly all trace of them is
lost; and though individuals have sometimes set on
foot reports, of their having been seen in January, at
the Assembly Balls of Washington,the testimony is
quite frail, and is scarce worthy of more credit
than that relating, in the colonial times, to the
appearance of Peter Rugg, and his daughter.
Another type of this species may be found in
some pleasant, old, gouty, red-nosed gentleman,
who may be found year after year seated in his
arm-chair upon the corridor of the United States,
or in the bar-room of our host at Avon. Everybody
knows him very well, though few know much of
him. Everybody knows his hours for bathing, if
he is by the sea, or at the sulphur baths; and
everybody
knows his hour for cheese, and brandy and
water, at either place. He is never fatigued, and
never in a perspiration; and wherever in the whole
range of watering-places your eye falls upon him,
you recognize the fitness of his position, and feel
quite sure you would be surprised to meet him
anywhere
else. If, by chance, you fall upon him of a
14*
winter, in the town, you are shocked by the
incongruity
,
and cannot fail to think that he is wandering
in his mind, and has strayed away unconsciously
from the galleries of Saratoga.
Of his origin and business, only vague rumors
are afloat; as for his years, none are so weak as to
hazard a guess at their number. In the memory
of the oldest habitu, he has neither changed the
color of his hair, nor of his nose; and he has been
overheard, by credible witnesses, to talk of Madison
and the elder Adams, as he now talks of Van Buren,
or Mr. Fillmore. He has been seen to talk
occasionally
with middle-aged ladies, and sometimes to
pat rosy-cheeked girls under the chin; but his name
has not, to anybody's knowledge, ever been in the
Herald, nor has he ever fought a duel. It is
uncertain
in what grave-yard he will be buried, if,
indeed, he should ever die.
Of a somewhat kindred stamp are certain
middle-aged
bachelors, who delight themselves, by talking of
each other, as young men. They dress in very
perfect style, and know vast numbers of people.
They are familiar and easy in their chat about
heiresses
,
and the belles of the hour. They are nice
judges of cigers and brandies, and the comparative
size of ladies' ankles. They pride themselves
specially
on some extraordinary personal
accomplishment
,such
as a delicate hand with a cue, or on
being a good horseman, or on their conquests of
pretty milliners. They never go to second-class
hotels, or to second-class watering-places, and are
exceedingly attentive to young ladies on the point
of coming out. They expect some day to be
married
,
and to be esteemed; and it is possible they
may be so.
There are not a few middle-aged ladies who
adorn, year after year, the tables of our summer
hotels, and who seem to have been spared the
possession
of their maidenly charms for their annual
attendance. But, much more noticeable than these,
is a class of married ladies of independent aim, and
fair exterior, whose town-life, if rumors may be
credited, is far less satisfactory than the summer
indulgence in sea breezes and bath dresses. They
have fairly worked up their social education to a
level with the freedom of country recreations.
They achieve easily, and maintain boldly, a
distinguished
notoriety; and while they adorn the
distinction
they enjoy, they give brilliant eclat to the
quietude of private life, and to the elegancies of
social action.
They give much of the burden to the talk of the
watering-place salons, and they study to make the
burden light. They have husbands, it is true; but
when these make their appearance, they do it with
considerate forbearance, and manifest an
insouciance
which is as creditable to their education, as
it is to their discretion. As to what their husbands
may be, rumor talks with a lagging tongue, as if
the topic were not worth a trouble; and it is only
on one or two points, not connected with their
profession, or their family, (perhaps not with their
happiness) that public judgment has ever ventured
a decision.
Such ladies are not usually to be found at Union
Hall, but favor sooner the cool corridors of the
United States. They are fond of rides; and will
make their reputations so brilliant, by the
character
and earnestness of their cavaliers, as that the
torpidity of a winter's exclusion will leave it
undimmed
.
They are not overcharged with the
fastidiousness
of a prurient modesty, nor have they
any absurd notion of covering their gayety with the
sombre veil of matrimony. Their views are of
public width, and they would adorn our American
life with that prettiness of freedom, which our laws
have left neglected.
There are young ladies, who maintain the title
wonderfully well, and to whom it sticks, from force
of habit, year after year; these are to be found,
with every revolving season, playing the belle and
the peasant. Their attractions multiply by
repetition
,
and grow by being made familiar. A shade
of scandal will only spice their reputations, and
make their services more desirable in the
perfecting
of our summer recreations.
The subject grows, Fritz, though the weather
is wilting. And I must give no farther
enumeration
until the quicksilver has gone down, and the
study is more complete.
I pray the patience of those correspondents who
have favored me with their letters. They shall all
be served in due time, and shall receive such
attention
as their merit demands.
My letter is short, Fritz, but if I may draw an
opinion from the trial of most of our book-writers
and pamphleteers, its brevity will be its best
ornament
.
Timon
.
Postscript
.A correspondent addresses me in
his letter as an old associate. Now I have no desire
of withdrawing claim, or any score of social position,
since, to the best of my knowledge, I have never
set eyes on him. And with the exception afforded
by his witty and most agreeable letter, I am as
ignorant
of his capacity and worth, as of that of any
inhabitant of Yang Chang, or Timbuctoo.
J. T.
15
THE LORGNETTE.
AUGUST 4, 1850. NEW-YORK. SECOND SERIESNO. 7.
Recorded honors shall gather round his monument, and thicken
over him.
Junius
of the Earl of Chatham
.
You
must remember, Fritz, how on a certain
evening
,
many years since, when we two were seated
together on the front bank of the Speaker's gallery,
in the British House of Commons, we listened
admiringly
to the terse and blazing castigation,
which was inflicted by an eminent historian, and
essayist, upon the first minister of England. You
will remember that after the orator had closed, with
one of those studied, and euphonious perorations,
which make the final periods of each chapter of his
history of England, ring upon the sense, like the
vibrations of a bell, there rose opposite to him, a
tall, and portly man, who commenced mildly, and
who wore at once a dignity, and an ease of
utterance
,
that forbade the idea of putting on their
possessor
either contempt, or condemnation.
You will recall, how, as he went on, his
mildness
gradually spread into a swift, rich river of
eloquence, and the mellifluence of his tones lent
itself to the closely welded links of an artful,
and splendid argumentation, until the reproach
that lay upon him was dissipated, like a mist be
fore the sun, and even the magniloquent talker,
Macaulay, grew small under the eye, and the
speech of the accomplished gentleman, and the
consummate debaterSir Robert Peel.
Remembering this, with a sentiment of
admiration
that can never escape, you will have felt a quick
rush of blood to the heart, at the mention of that
unhappy casualty which has befallen him, and
which has made the British nation as mournful as
ourselves. The most important man in our
national
crisis, and the most important man in the
crisis of English, affairs, have passed away, almost
together,carried into the Night by the same
ground swoop of the black-winged angel of Death!
I love to draw lessons from the events of the
time; and to make even the dark accidents that
overshadow us, give down the grateful coolness of
a moral.
Sir Robert Peel was a commoner; he was the
son of a cotton spinner; he was luxuriously rich;
he was the aptest statesman, and the most admired
man in England. These facts make up a very
good text for an American sermon; and the
elucidation
of the text, without any of my sixthlies, or
seventhlies, would go to show that nerve and
energy
can triumph over station,and what is more
to the purpose, can triumph over the indulgences of
wealth.
How many of our rich cotton spinners' sons are
in the road toward making Sir Robert Peels? How
many are counting it any part of their duty, to be
anything else than rich men's sons? How many
of them are laboring toward any nobler end, than a
pretty exhibition of that listless composure, and
that pride, which American wealth is teaching to
its children?
Our money is breeding an abundance of fine
dancers, neat moustaches, and excellently dressed
men; it is possibly refining such, with capital
judgment
about a polka, or an
aria;
but as for that
sort of masculine development, which makes the
will earnest, and the soul big with manly intent,
and with the purpose to make itself felt on mind,
and not merely on grooms, or tailors,it would be
troublesome to find specimens, who are heirs to
wealth.
Let our rich cotton spinners' sons, who are
rioting
in the indulgences that riches bestow, and
boasting the inertia that riches are too apt to
induce
,
reflect for a while (if their powers of
reflection
are not altogether withered up, and gone) on
that sort of nobilitythe only real sortwhich
takes its measures from the grief of a nation, which
secures its patent by the strength of personal
resolve
,
and which traces its escutcheon to the fiat of
God!
Let us pass on, Fritz: strong words add heat to
our summer: July sermons may be too long, though
they are rarely too strong. The work I have
sketched for myself needs not so much strength,
as variety of words.
THE COCKNEY IN THE COUNTRY.
Eh! in una villeggiatura non si sa quel che possa accadere. Sono
stato giovane anch'io; per grazia del cielo, pazzo non sono stato,
ma ho
veduto delle pazzie
.
Le Smanie per la Villeggiatura
. (Act III., Sc. 1.)
You
may possibly think, that I choose to convey
the idea, by this scrap from Goldoni, that I am no
cockney myself, although I have seen cockneyisms
in others. On this point, I shall make neither
15*
confession nor denial; indeed, it would little become
me, after being set down by a distinguished city
reviewer, as an `outsider' who gains all his
knowledge
of city life from `hearsay,' to put in any
claim to a share of his cockney character; and it
would as little become me to deny all relationship,
when I find myself credited by another penetrating
observer, an intimate knowledge of the town life,
and a thorough understanding of its vices. Thus
you see that circumstances confirm a resort to my
habitual modesty, and interest, as well as diffidence
commend to me, silence.
We may safely legitimate the title of cockney,
although we have got no Bow-bells, and no
Cheapside
.
But the American cockney, unlike the
London
cockney, travels. He does not always dine at
Damm & Francins, or next door to the Customs;
and in the heat of the season, even our Pearl street
man has been seen to drive a `buggy' to Saratoga
Lake, or perhaps to wet his wine at `White's' with
the ice of Niagara.
Nevertheless, we have a substantial race of
cockneys
;men
who measure everything by New
York;who compare the country clergy (when
they hear them) to their city doctors,who look
for Bowery girls among the milkmaids,who drink
at virgin springs with a sigh for the Croton, and
who, whether you meet them among the
wonderful
beauties of the Thousand Isles, or on the
wooden
pavements of Montreal, wear the unmistakable
air of New Yorkers. It is hard to describe this air
by words; it is not the coat, or the walk, or the
gesture, or the talk, or the set of the hat,but it is
something made up of all; and yet so sure in its
intimations, that a practiced observer would be as
much surprised to hear him converse, without
mention
of the Exchange, or of Wall street, or of the
Third Avenue, or Croton water, as to find a
Bostonian
admit by allusion, or by anything more than a
contemptuous flirt of his coat-tails, that such things
had any existence at all.
Yet in justice to them it must be said, that they
are more cosmopolitan than their brothers of
Boston
,who
travel with the habit of their city
sticking
to them, because persuaded that habit is not
only better than all discovered habits, but the best
of any possible habit, both as regards body, and
mind. The New Yorker, on the contrary, wears
his colors unconsciously; and not so much from
pride in his mode, as from his inability to leave it
behind him.
La mode domine les provinciam;
mais les
New Yorkers
dominent la mode
.
The Bostonian is eternally wrapped up in some
small portion of the Boston atmosphere, on which
he greatly plumes himself; and is very sure that so
long as he wears it, he must inevitably court
remark
,
and secure admiration. The New Yorker,
on the other hand, though clearly stamped with
the metropolitan mould, and in his secret heart
absolutely
certain that no city ever was, or ever can
be, like New York city, is yet comparatively
humble
under the weight of his honours, and is not so
anxious to be astonished, as to be satisfied. He is
not averse, on occasions, to venture his admiration
on excellencies, though not quite sure that they
grew up under the warming climate of his Opera,
or his Exchange; and he can bestow a gaze of
wonderment upon Niagara, although the half of it
is on the Canada side, and the other half, not in
`the Park.' But I have not the slightest doubt
that it would add vastly to the appreciation of the
Bostonian, in descending the famous staircase, if
the projector, Mr. Biddle, had been a Bostonian;
and it detracts wonderfully from the beauty of that
frail, gossamer structure which hangs over the
awful abyss, to think that suspension bridges were
neither contrived in Boston, nor are adapted to the
flats of Boston.
All cockneys are bad enough, (and Leigh Hunt
is my authority;) but a cockney who prides himself
on being a cockney, does seem to me to be the most
pitiable of all cockneys. The New York cockney
is green from habit; but the Boston cockney is
green from choice; and by nature, as well as by
`all sorts of paragraphs,' is
posted
in
cockneyisms
.
[7]
[7]
I take this occasion to return thanks for a recent complimentary
notice
in the Boston Post; of which the best point is the strong
conviction
,
on the part of the writer, that John Timon is as green as grass
about Boston notions. I fear, however, that it was unkindly said.
`Je crains toujours que sans y songer, il ne sacrifie la verite des choses a
l'eclat de son orgueil.'
But to return, Fritz; I am to show you
something
of our city cockneys; leaving provincialisms
for cooler periods.
Our cockney has great admiration for
watering-places
generally, and collaterally of the country
of which he talks very much, as Goldsmith's Lien
Chi Altanghi talks of the gayeties of London,
namely, with a great deal of apparent familiarity,
and a great deal more of real ignorance. However
straitened he may be in his purse, he is sure to
husband enough from his Opera and Olympic
diversions
,
and such like entertainments, for a run to
Newport, or for a Sunday at Cozzens'. On these
occasions he drinks wine, frequently to excess, and
appears of a morning in an old shooting jacket
(much more worn at the elbows than in the
armpits
,)
or possibly, if of good color, will dash in a
velvet coat. He plumes himself much on the cut
of his whiskers, and is very hilarious, and is
almost
always on intimate terms with bar-keepers,
with whom it is his infinite delight to crack jokes.
He also remarks freely and knowingly on all the
company; he cons the register with great
scrutiny
,
and makes graceful observations in a cheerful
mood, upon the presence of Sally such a one, or
Fanny such another, or Sue such a third,
without
,
however, enjoying any further acquaintance
with these ladies, than consists in a familiar
knowledge
of their names, and vague notions of their sex
and properties. He dresses fastidiously for his
dinner
;
and is very easy, though very arbitrary with
the servants; since he imagines it a proof of good
breeding to be very authoritative. He is
excessively
indignant at getting a wrong-colored glass
for his hock; and although he has little love for it,
he is a great guzzler of any claret which is sewed
with a label on the bottle.
He brings his own cigars with him, which were
imported by a friend; he is specially knowing about
the Cuba plantations, and boasts an acquaintance
with a Creole proprietor, with whom he has
sometimes
taken a glass of Madeira. He is very apt to
know all watering-place people; and has had
innumerable
flirtations measured by a promenade in
Cozzens' corridors; or a ride at Newport, with very
accessible young ladies. He is not partial to
fishing
,
as it blackens the hands, and the blue-fish do
sometimesbite.
If he should venture to the `Point,' he is sure to
have some acquaintance in the army, who happens
there at the same time, and who is distinguished
for having conducted some extraordinary
Anabasin
retreat, or for having been captured by a
distinguished
Mexican General. He is sure to make the
most of his epauletted acquaintance; and counts it
a good investment to ply him with porter, (
faute de
vin
) for the honor of the gilt shoulder pieces at his
elbow.
In parenthesis, let me say, Fritz, that the officers
of our army are with few exceptions, gentlemen, both
unassuming, and well-informed; and it behoves
them much, to thrust out of their social alliance
such recreants as will over-drink at a public table,
or carry their impudence with a beastly swagger.
No amount of battle glory, however falsely, or fairly
made up, and however currently reported, can atone
for impertinence and a braggart assumption, that
bespeak ignorance of those social amenities, which
distinguish a well-bred man from a brute.
And while alluding to this place of summer
festivity
,
let me remark upon the admirable, philo
sophic discretion of that discipline which refuses to
the host at the Point, all sale of wines, while it
permits
a retail of cordials.
[8]
[8]
With a tender regard for the morals of the cadets, no liquors are
allowed to be sold on the government grounds, saving ale, porter,
soda-water
,
and
cordials
.
I strongly suspect the
order must have been drawn up by some old
veteran
of the wars, and of the bottle, whose stomach
had become parched with the use of ordinary drinks,
and who could only titillate his toughened mucous
membrane, with the fiery qualities of Curaoa, or
of Kirschwasser. As it is, the visitant has to sigh
for his claret, and satisfy his cravings with most
villainous ales, or with the hellish broth of a
government
cordial. I feel quite sure that this
temperance
schedule could not have been drawn up
either by Mr. Hawkins or by Horace Mann.
To come back to our cockney;if amorously
disposed
,
West Point is hardly the place for his
triumphs
,except
a triumph over the bottle. Cadet
rank and military service are, if I may judge from
no little observation, extraordinary promoters of
gallantry; and judging from what meets the
stranger's eye, at the periodic government `hops,'
Mars is not the only divinity, that makes the Lares
of the barracks; for, to say nothing of Bacchus,
whom they have stripped of his vine-leaves, and
crowned with porter carbuncles, that would have
made the Greek god blush deeper than the reddest
of the Lesbian vats,they pay worshipful
obeisance
,
and an evening gun, to Venus.
I think, indeed, that it would be hard to name a
spot, where indifferent beauties, and middle-aged
women, are so sure of meeting with undisguised
admiration, and of finding their souls rekindled (if
ever kindled before) into a spirit of flirtation, as
among the comely boys, who love, by leave of the
orderly sergeants, and who cultivate their
temperance
,
with the commandant's cordials. The
Polytechnics
with their graceful
chapeaux
, and the St.
Cyr men, with their crimson stripes, are, you know,
`taking fellows' even in a Paris salon; but their
appetites are somewhat cloyed by that life of the
town, to which our cadets are strangers. The
rigidity
of the Spartan
Ephori
could not devise a
better
incentive to noble propensities, than their
mountain
air, their salted diet, and their comparative
winter isolation. These together, naturally create
an ardor for the greeting of their summer visitors,
which, if it breed a little wantonness in the women,
is surely no fault of the cadetswhatever may
belong
to the cordials.
At Saratoga, the cockney is as much at home as
at Pearl street, or upon Broadway. He knows,
perhaps
,
16
the wealth, family, and acquirements, of half
who are at the Springs. He drinks the water
for form's sake; and he dances, and goes to
the raftered chapel, for the same. His favorite
quarters are at the United States, and his favorite
position, a seat upon the back corridor of a
morning
,
and upon the front corridor of an afternoon, in
full view of the approaches to the parlor. He is on
intimate terms with the head waiter, who is
sure to greet him with a chuckle and with a tip of
his cap. He consults him privately about the
ladies
who are at the house, and forms his opinion of
their habits and character very much by the
confidential
revelations of the chief waiter, or the still
more confidential revelations of the chamber-maids.
He strolls by the Union with an air of proper
dignity
and superiority; and is never to be caught
listening to the morning music at the Springs. He
is not versed in agricultural matters, if indeed there
were any such in the neighborhood, to be versed in;
and he has as little appreciation of an improved
plough, as of an improved mind.
He is eager to get hold of the morning papers,
as if he had great interests at stake, in the state of
trade or in the sales at the board. He courts great
familiarity with the newspaper correspondents;
although
he professes to gentlemen not in that line,
(and with some show of justice) great contempt for
them. He is not especially literary, although he
reads Dumas' works, and an occasional number of
the Home Journal, or of the
Lorgnette
.
At a small watering-place, or country town, he
becomes, by the cut of his hair, and the tie of his
cravat, an Apollo; scarce less worshiped than the
marble divinity of the Vatican. You will find him
on occasions at such places as Stonington, or
Richfield
,
astonishing the plain townspeople, and
wearing
such airs toward humble visitors, as put him at
once beyond the pale of association. And at such
comparatively retired quarters as the Bellevue of
Newport, or the white palace of Montauk, I have
myself been put to the blush by the manifest
attainments
and superiority of a cockney, whose
education
would have been high, if it had been equal
to that of the Ward schools, and whose manners
were grafted upon a John street stock.
But this
genus
is but one of an exceedingly large
family, of a still larger class, and may with
propriety
come under the tribe of vagrant and unmarried
cockneys. Or, if I were to class him in the
manner
of the naturalists, (without strict Linnan
accuracy
)
it would beclass
mammalia
, order
bimana
,
family
pachydermata
, and tribe
vagrantes
.
Another tribe of the same family, is made up of such
cockneys as, with a little advance of years and
vigilance
in matrimonial speculation, conceive an
impulsive
and not extraordinary fondness for the
country. This eagerness frees them from all
ordinary restraints, and their ignorance from all
the ordinary proprieties. They indulge their
architectural
fancies either in a gaunt town-house of
flaming brick, looking warmly from the green fields;
or, with a pseudo taste, cultivated by as much
artistic
reading, and lie between the covers of Mr.
Downing's `Village Residences,' they order a Gothic
cottage, and stew in low chambers under sharp
roofs, exposed to a broiling sun, with exquisite
satisfaction.
Our Gothic friends do not seem to be aware, that
the English models, from which their style is
copied, are protected by a lower temperature, by a
moister climate, by thicker walls, and, in many
instances
,
by that best of non-conductors, a heavy
thatch.
Our city cockney does not ordinarily extend his
Gothic cultivation beyond architecture; and he
will plant his array of gables, crotchets, and finials,
upon a lawn as mathematically square, and as
geometrically
arranged, as the town lots, or as the
charming country seats of the Dearman estate.
Under his wife's tuition, he will perhaps enrage
with a frenzy for flowers; he will fill a green-house
with cactuses and japonicas, and spoil all the
sweet-briars
in the neighborhood, with his studies at
grafting. The ailanthus, and catalpa, are our
cockney's favorite trees; while anything like such
native magnificence as an old oak, with its
underlying
sod, half gray with the decaying acorn cups,
or an elm, whose limbs sway in the wind, like the
weird arms of a giant, are out of his fancy, and out
of his regard.
He has a passion for bow windows, which give
views `down the road;' and he adds effect to his
hall lamp, and his plaster statuary, with glass
stained blue and yellow. He puts a dovecote upon
a pole, by suggestion of his English gardener; and
buys a pair of Guinea fowl, that eat off his
tube-roses
.
He purchases Chaptal and Loudon for his
library, and reads the Herald and Eugene Sue.
He goes into town for relaxation, and comes to his
cottage to be miserable, upon a pretty lounge of
knotted grape-vines.
A letter which has come to my hand, Fritz, from
very much such a country liver, will perhaps
interest
you; and as it makes new developments
about the country life, and as it seems to have
been written by a shrewd fellow, who has an eye to
16*
trumps, I shall give it the dignity of an
independent
chapter.
LETTER FROM A COCKNEY.
I will the country see,
Where old Simplicity,
Though hid in gray,
Doth look more gay
Than foppery in plush, and scarlet clad.
Farewell you city wits, that are
Almost at civil war!
'Tis time that I grow wise, when all the world grows mad.
Randolph
.
My Dear Timon
:Though your paper has
rarely
reached me, yet I have seen enough of its spirit,
to believe that some little account of my country
life will serve your turn, and give you some hints,
that you may possibly work over to good account. I
had made in town, by dint of jobbing, what they
call hereabouts a fortune; and not having gained
much footing in genteel society,partly because
we didn't care about it, and partly because wife is
principled against low necks, and the opera, I
determined
to set up in the country.
So I bought me a place of ten acres, in a
handsome
square lot, cut down the scrub oaks, and
hired an architect to put up, what they call a
cottage
orne
. It's a pretty affair, I suppose, though
the chambers are uncommon hot, and though there's
not much room to stir about. But a traveled
friend tells us it's very English, so we bear it as
patiently as we can. Besides, the young girls in
the town, think it uncommon handsome; and the
boys have an eye for it, and amuse themselves in
the fall, with throwing potatoes at the turtles. Of
course, I set up a carriage, and built a barn in
pretty Greek style with pilasters, which many
mistake for the house.
Wife, who is romantic in her way, proposed to
call the place Sunny Dell; but as the grounds are
remarkably flat, with the exception of a rather
deep kitchen drain, we settled upon Gooseberry
Park;which, as we cultivate gooseberries, seems
quite appropriate.
A short time after coming here, I was waited
upon by two or three of the elders, to become a
committee-man at a temperance celebration; as we
keep our wines, and small stores in a private cellar,
and as wife has a little political ambition for me,
we thought it best to accept. And a very warm
July session we had of it, and I should have
suffered
exceedingly, hadn't my wife, who is a most
exemplary, and prudent housewife, had a cool
punch mixed for me, against my return. But
unfortunately
,
our `help,' whom we got in the country,
scented the punch, and even expostulated with my
wife. The next day, our `help' told it to the
neighbor's `help,' who of course told it to our
neighbor's
wife, who is a `sterling woman,' and who
put on her shawl and bonnet to run into the
Deacon's
,
and mourn with the Deacon's wife, who is a
highly respectable old lady. I have great fears, in
consequence, of losing my election to the next
Assembly.
Wife at first, had her dresses made in town; but
the old mantua-makers who have have been
established
these ten years in the village, set up such an
outcry about city-pride, that she was obliged to
give it up. Though between fitting-on, and
scandal
,
and eking out four or five days at the cottage,
during which I am obliged to give up my wine,
it's an infernal bore. These milliners, by-the-by,
are the quickest observers you can possibly
imagine
;
and will report, as I am told, with the
utmost
accuracy, how much mustard I eat to my
beef, and how many times I use my napkin.
As wife is anxious to give character to our
grounds, we have put up a Chinese pagoda, which
is recommended I believe by writers on Landscape;
and we are now thinking about a rustic alcove.
The pagoda we thought would be a nice place to
take our tea; but the musquitoes are very thick,
and wife can't abide spiders, so we were obliged to
give it up. The boys, too, about the village, though
very well brought up, are inclined to amuse
themselves
with drawing very awkward-looking figures
about the fences, and on the pagoda, so that I have
been obliged to paint them all, a dull brown. To
give a little rural air, I had the walk to the gate
laid out in a circle; which doesn't seem after all so
much in the rural taste, since the country people
are sure to tramp across the grass;whereupon the
gardener proposes to set out some briers as a sort of
defence, which seems to me a pretty idea, and very
practical. The hedge that I put out in front, has
been so cruelly cropped by the cows that run in the
road, that I fear it will never `come to.'
As I wanted to get some credit with the
farming
interest, I concluded to buy Liebig's
Chemistry
,
a few Berkshire pigs, and a Durham heifer.
The Chemistry I don't find of much service, as
some salts it recommended, nearly killed the
prettiest
spot of grass upon the lawn. The heifer,
between
cash paid out for rape-seed cake, and
provender
,
has proved a sorry venture; and the first
day, the pigs rooted up all my wife's auriculas and
hyacinths. As for the sub-soil plough, three yoke
of my neighbor's oxen were put to it early this
spring, and snapped the coulter at the second bout.
I am inclined to think the sub-soil plough is not
intended
for rocky land; do you think it is?
Being in the country, I have determined to
revive
a little, the rural literature, so to speak; and
as I had a good Academic education, I bought a
Virgil, to see what I could do with the Georgies. I
found them very hard reading; and could scarce
get farther than the
qu cura boum
,
which, as the
Durhams were not introduced about Mantua, is
probably without much applicability to the `
improved
stock.' Thomson's Seasons is pleasant in
its way, and so is Somerville's Farmer's Boy. Yet
after all, these writers, and Theocritus among them,
seem to me a little antiquated, and don't touch
much upon the pith of the times. Can't some of
your town writers give us a little country
literature
?
for it does seem to me that the books are full
of nothing but town gossip; even the papers are
puffed up with heathenish terms about the opera
and theatres. As the country-people generally are
not very particular about beauty of style, or
anything
that looks like superior education, I should
think some of your town writers might turn their
wits our way, without much danger of being
abused.
I make it a rule, as well as a virtue, to go twice
to the church on a Sunday, which, as our preacher
is an old-fashioned Calvinist, requires some
self-denial
.
But with all his frightening words, he is
over timid, and very much under the thumbs of
three or four of the elders, against whom I observe
none of his remarks are ever directed; I suspect
they lay down for him from time to time a sort of
platform of opinion, which, if it is not altogether of
the old Saybrook mechanism, is at least as steady,
and makes as good a stand-point. The poor man
I find is subject, not only to a sort of moral
direction
,
but a regimen of dress, and household action
is laid down for him, against which, as he loves his
place and pittance, he don't dare to offend.
Even the old ladies of the parish take a motherly
interest in him, and by their gossip, mould him,
even to the cut of his hair. In short, he is as much
the village property, as the hay-scales or the
sign-board
;
and though he points always in one
direction
,
it is only under favor of the elders, and of the
gossips, that he can safely point at all. Let me
recommend
his case through you, Mr. Timon, to some
of the town reformers, to see if they cannot relieve
him from his cooped condition, and set him fairly
on his own legs.
As for enjoyment of the country, wife is
beginning
to doubt about it; and Dorothy, who is just
turned of fourteen, is absolutely pining. If not up
for the Assembly the coming spring, I think of
abandoning Gooseberry Park forever.
Yours,
Rusticus
.
P. S.If you should stand in want of a picture
or two of our town characters, I think that with
wife's, and Dorothy's help, I could send you
something
handsome.
I quite like the manner of Rusticus, and shall be
charmed to receive the pictures he speaks of. I
must caution him, however, against too great
severity
;
a cockney is always an ill-tempered judge.
And I, as you know, Fritz, find my affections going
back too strongly to the old days, when the
homestead
was rich in blossoms, and the moonlight
shadows
playedfairy-likeupon the ancestral lawn,
to forget the generous remembrances that cling
there yet, or to throw the shadow of a single
wanton
sneer upon the simplicity of a country life.
As the years thicken upon a man, and the stifling
air of great cities, and the blaze of wide and swift
travel, furrow his brow, and sprinkle his head with
white, nothing can be more grateful to him than
the memories of that artless and wild rusticity
which lighted his boyhood with the smiles of
health, and which crowned his youth with strength
and gladness.
And as he looks forward toward that awful
bourne, from which none return, there is something
in the thought of lying at last under the trees that
grow old and die, and spring again; and beside the
brooks that murmur softly, as they did when he
was young, and as they will do, when his body is
dust,which reconciles him even to the grave; and
which carries his hope from the trees and the brooks
up to that Power, whose wisdom and strength they
adorn, and whose mercy and goodness they show
forth continually.
Timon
.
17
THE LORGNETTE.
AUGUST 18, 1850. NEW-YORK. SECOND SERIESNO. 8.
Mon matre est un vrai enrag d'aller se prsenter  un pril
qui ne le cherche pas.
Sganarelle
.
Mr. Timon
:
A year
ago I was married to a belle of the town,
and am beginning now fairly to sorrow over my
bargain: nor is this because she has lost her beauty;
for to tell the truth, I think she is more of a belle
now than ever; and is as complacent in her action
toward all the beaux, as I ever knew a woman in
my life. I can scarce come up a single day, from
my business in the city, but I meet her walking
with some spruce fellow of her acquaintance, with
whom she appears to be enjoying herself as well as
she ever did in my company.
This summer I have taken her to the Springs;
but there she is sure to be hedged about with a
troop of fellows, who will not so much as let me
help her into a carriage. And what is the worst
of it, she seems to enjoy the matter mightily,
much more than I do.
She has some property of her own, which I
regret
now, more than I ever chuckled over it before
we were married. If she was dependent on me, I
might hope to have a little control over her; as it is,
she pays her own way, and is as indifferent as you
can imagine. It was very pleasant at the first to
find her admired; but now, I must say, it is
growing
dullnot to say uncomfortable. I had half a
mind to take her abroad; and should have done so,
hadn't she been so delighted at the thought, and
insisted so strongly on a whole winter in Paris.
I assure you, sir, I am in a sad quandary; if I
forbid her humors about the young gentlemen,
she falls into a passion of tears, and talks about
her unprotected state, and her virtue, and all that:
and if I smile at her pranks, you will readily
imagine
that I am as uneasy as a man of honor can
well afford to be.
If you could give me a little advice, I should be
extraordinarily obliged; and remain your friend,
Senex
.
It is a hard case for Senex: but if he will look
at the lines taken out of the mouth of Sganarelle,
and put at the head of this paper, they may
suggest
to him some very suitable, though tardy,
reflections
.
I would fartehr recommend an attentive
perusal of that portion of the third chapter of
Burton's
treatise on melancholy, which regards
jealousy
;
where I think he will find some things set
down that may show him the way out of his
trouble.
[9]
[9]
I may refer Senex to a choice bit of French Philosophy, which may
be found in the play of
Tartuffe
,where Dorine in her counsels to
Orgon, says:
Il est bien difficile enfin d' tre fidle
A de certain maris faits d' un certain modle;
Et qui donne  sa fille un homme qu'elle hait,
Est responsable au ciel des fautes qu'elle fait.
In case he does not read French, I would not advise him to employ his
wife as interpreter.
He had best live upon short diet, give
close attention to business, and practice
resignation
.
A LADY REVELATION.
`Amare e tate si occiperint, multo insaniunt acrius.'
My Dear Mr. Timon
:
As you have taken upon yourself to be the
censor
of modes and proprieties, which office I must
say, you have filled quite respectably so far, I want
to draw your attention to the developments in a
recent work by a distinguished lady, called (I speak
of the book, and not the lady)Truth Stranger than
Fiction. Such barbarity as is disclosed in this
book, and such extraordinary defence as is made
of these barbarities, by the officers of a
time-honored
Institution, ought to meet with a strong
rebuke
from every humane person (as I think you
are) and to make every woman of maidenly
sentiments quiver with indignation and horror.
Trusting you will do the matter justice,
I remain,
expectingly,
Dorothy
.
If I remember rightly, there was an intimation
dropped in my first number, Fritz, to the effect
that tarts would be preferred to books. I meant
to use the words in their literal sense, and not to
express any special fondness for
tart
pamphlets.
It would seem that my meaning has been
mistaken
.
Truth stranger than Fiction, has been lying on
my table for some days; its revelations are
extraordinary
enough to be sure; but with a little
selfish
discretion, I have hardly ventured to join forces
with the authoress, in an attack upon what seemed
to me a substantial, old institution, that might
17*
prove as stubborn, and unyielding an adversary,
as the Spanish Windmills. I have even foreborne
to express my regrets, that the reverend Doctors,
who preside over its destinies, should have so far
forgotten their sense of decorum, as to throw
obloquy
(as the book alleges) upon defenceless maiden
ladies.
The truth is, I have entertained heretofore a very
respectable opinion of our literary institution of
New Haven, and a very pitiable regard for the
young gentlemen in long-tailed, black coats, who
are annually disgorged at that popular college.
This feeling has struggled with my gallantry
more especially, since I fear the ladies will have a
hard task to upset that venerable foundation.
Upon the whole, I am inclined to think that
such heartless swains as are mentioned in the book
of Miss Beecher, should be left to the stings of
conscience
.
Youth and innocence, it is true, are not
matters to be trampled down ignominiously; and
it is very natural that in affairs of the tender
passion
,
all woman's nature should be roused, to plead
the cause of violated affections. But, it must be
remembered that a warm and passionate heart
sometimes misleads the judgment; and it seems
to me far better to let the tenderness of such
womanly
lament, exhale silently, like the dew from
autumn flowers, rather than be sacrificed in the
pages of seventy-five cent books.
Youthful exuberance is prone to rashnessas
well in women as in men, and when the parties
shall have reached my maturity of years, they will
doubtless regard this publicationwhatever
duplicity
it may exposeas the careless offshoot of a
deplorable, girlish extravagance.
A TRIP TO SARATOGA.
And Beelzebub, Apollyon and Legion, perceiving by the path
that the pilgrims made, that their way lay through this town of Vanity,
they contrivd here to set up a fair, wherein should be sold all sorts of
Vanityas honors, preferments, lusts; and delights of all sorts, as
har-lots
,
bawds, wives, husbands, children, servants, blood, bodies, soul,
silver, pearls, precious stones, and what not!
The Pillgrim's Progress
.
Christian, journeying to Beulah, passed through
the town of Vanity Fair; so John Timon, in the
course of his pilgrimage, finds himself on this
August day, in the town of Saratoga.
I do not mean to flatter myself at the expense of
Saratoga; and still less is it a part of my intention
to flatter the town, at my own cost. I should
hate of all things to be recognized as a Christian
pilgrim, in such a place; it would be a dull
chance, if it did not fare as hard with me as with
Faithful, in the allegory; and I have no kind of
doubt, (and may safely challenge Dr. Cheever's
opinion in confirmation,) but that there are as many
Pick-thanks, and Love-lusts, and Carnal-delights,
and Lord Hate-goods, in this town of Saratoga, as
ever regaled themselves in the stark-mad city
which lay on the road to Bunyan's Beulah.
As I wished to see all that was to be seen, I have
taken rooms at the United States Hotel, and have
entered
my name as John Stubbs, of Stubbston. This
semi-titular device, at once practical and innocent,
gives me a little dignity with the bar-tenders and
newspaper men; and has served me, I frankly
believe, in way of retainer, for a better room than
I could otherwise have hoped to secure. At the
same time, being unknown to almost all the
company
,
I can enjoy my cigar quietly under the trees,
or upon the corridor, without any fear of remark
or of disturbance.
I am not a little amused by the air with which
many young gentlemen of our town, whom it has
been my fortune to see wearing humbler demeanor,
make their entree. It seems to be a part of their
traveling education, as it is unfortunately of very
many others, to make a stir. They bluster up to
the register desk, and twirl the leaves as if this
village of Vanity Fair was to be startled by so
small an event as their arrival. They are clearly
surprised to find the clerk of the establishment
preserving so admirably his composure at the
reading
of the important entry.
They take possession of their rooms with a loud
and testy joke with the stout Irish maidvery
much to her admiration, and very much to the
needless terror of some middle-aged lady of an
adjoining
chamber. When fairly equipped in their
watering place dress, they appear in the happiest
spirits upon the corridor, and go through their first
series of observations upon the company, with the
air of sportsmen reconnoitering a covey of
frightened
quail. They are not bewildered at the sight
of the most brilliant beauties, nor abashed by any
exhibitions of dignity; nothing, in short, but the
glimpse of some more successful rival in their own
sphere, gives them even a momentary
embarrassment
.
They are quite sure their cravat tie is
altogether the thing; and as sure, that they have
come over the direct road from the metropolis.
They order the cheapest of the showy wines at
dinner; and leer at the fragile country beauties
over the rims of their glasses. They smoke under
the trees, lolling in their arm-chairs, and laugh
with each other very heartily at jokes, which are
of course very capital, and very cutting on the
ladies.
Our town belle upon her advent to the Springs,
is accompanied by her mother,perhaps by a
servant
,
and possibly by a boy in his teens, just
graduated
from a first class school, who is
unexceptionable
in his shirt collars, and in the polka. Our
belle, in pretty traveling dress, and with face
shielded by a particularly becoming blue veil,
alights from the carriage with a languid step, as
if she were overcome with the stifling air of a great
city, and only seeking a restoration of her wasted
energies.
At her first day's dinner she appears in
uncommonly
slight dress for one so delicate, and hangs
languishingly upon the arm of a mamma, who is
conspicuous with brilliant head-dress. They eat
daintily; and are principally occupied in a quiet
study of the persons, family, and dress of the
visitors
;
in all which, the boy comes in with an
occasional startling observation, hazarded between
green corn and tomatoes.
Before the disappearance of the dinner service,
our belle will have formed her estimate of all who
are at the table; will have safely decided as to
who is
distingue
, who is vulgar, and will have
laid down in her own fancy, her future regimen
of dress and of action. If Madame, opposite, who
is common, and not of her set, is dashing in a very
low-necked dress, that threatens almost
instantaneous
exposure of a frightfully large person, she will
assume more modesty in her next day's attire, than
she had hoped to display. If, on the contrary, her
opposite neighbors are something timid, and
respectably
covered, she will astonish them at
evening
by such naked developments, as will greatly
delight the middle-aged gentlemen, and excessively
mortify the middle-aged ladies. Our languid belle,
but little refreshed by the wine she has drank,
retires languidly to the drawing room; but will
presently revive sufficiently for a short promenade
with the very elegant young man, who has just
now complimented madame the mamma, upon her
unusual good looks`wondering what lady it
could be with mademoiselle, whose acquaintance,
the honor,&c.'and sympathized very cordially
with the delicate state, from which our belle
appears
to be suffering.
The country beauties, from moderately sized
towns, behave quite differently. I was much
amused the other day, by the tripping way in which
two nice young ladies bounded up the steps; (though
they were covered with dust, and evidently much
fatigued.) They were followed very closely by a
plethoric old gentleman, whom I instantly set down
for the papa. Their dresses were a little shabby,
and it was plain that they were anxious the
company
should not scan very attentively their
traveling
toilette. Nothing, indeed, could be prettier
than their nervous inquietude, as they waited for
the papa and the maid, to show them their chambers.
In an hour's time they re-appear in the neatest of
barege dresses, translucent enough to expose two
pairs of exceedingly frail arms. They hang
affectionately
upon the papawho has completed his
toilette under the dispensation of a waiter with a
brush broomas if they greatly feared contact
with the very wicked world about them, and yet,
as if they had a hope of extracting from it a
considerable
quantity of innocent amusement.
In a little time they are seated cozily in a corner
of the drawing room; the papa looking attentively
at the chairs, the carpet, or the respectable
middle-aged
ladies; and the girls engaged in discussing
dressesregretting that they had not brought the
pink muslins, or the lilac silks, and remarking
naively upon the stylish air of some old female
stager, who is strolling up and down, upon the arm
of a very fierce looking young gentleman in nankeen
pantaloons, and very thin moustache. The papa, as
his attention is drawn, expresses the opinion that
the young gentleman of the nankeen pantaloons is
a puppy; whereat the nice young ladies utter a
simultaneous exclamation, look at the gentleman
very attentively, and think they would like to see
how a puppy danced, or talked;though they say
nothing about this to the papa.
The papa steps out to have a chat with the host,
or to run over yesterday's paper in the shade;
and the nice girls shrink together, like the
unprotected
females that they are. They presently espy
some old acquaintance across the room, when they
bound over, and forget themselves in a cordiality of
greeting, that absolutely shocks the elegant Miss
Miggs, who is bolstered in the corner, talking to a
nice marriageable gentleman of five-and-forty. Our
girls are already sufficiently enamored to venture
the exclamation to their new acquaintance, is'nt
it delightful? To which their new acquaintance
replies, with a glance at the young gentleman in
the nankeens, oh, charming!
The belle of two weeks standing, who has
learned the ropes, is most
degag
in her air,
and expresses herself very nearly as well by her
step along the corridor, as by the exuberance of
her remark. She does not blush at the close
approach
of the bearded face that so startles the nice
young ladies from the country; and is anxious
indeed to show her complacent daring of the most
overt acts of her admirers. She will even adroitly
18
swing the cane of her gentleman friend, or play
with his riding whip, or set his beaver upon her
head-dress, with a bravery which she is sure must
compel admiration, and excite the envy of the poor
weak spirited things in the corner, whose beauty,
or whose modesty, is unequal to such a triumph.
The energy and success of our married belles, has
excited in me a very great degree of wonder; and
however much I may be disposed to pity the
pale-faced
husbands who appear within the
drawing-room
only by special courtesy, and who splice their
energies with occasional cobblers at the bar, I
cannot
but admire the dashing ventures of their wives,
and the pretty, and artless play of bellehood, which
they so deftly blend with the responsibilities of a
matron.
A little anxiety, which at times seems to work
into the minds of the husbands, is at best, but a
very unseasonable and unreasonable anxiety; and
only serves to expose them the more to an
unfortunate
,
and unenviable observation.
One poor gentleman I have been frequently struck
with, who at intervals of from ten to fifteen
minutes
,
will throw down his paper, or his cigar, and
come to peer in slily at the drawing room doors, to
watch the erratic movements of his very blooming
lady;over whom, from appearances, he has about
the same degree of control that he has over his
equanimity, or his honor. If such gentlemen, who
I charitably suppose to be newly married, would
only study the habit of the better part of the town
husbands, who send their wives hither for a
month's recruitto get spirit from the springs, and
a classic name in the papers (whether Aspasia or
Juno,) and who live with the utmost indifference
as to results, they would lead lives of far less care,
and have the satisfaction of rounding their
domestic
economy into a very attractive, and fashionable
shape.
Upon the whole, this is a matter, with which I do
not much like to meddle; in the first place,
because
it is none of my business, (an antiquated
reason for which I almost need to make an
apology
;)
and secondly, since I have observed that the
class of husbands alluded to, are mighty testy
fellows
,
who are a great deal stancher guardians, of
what they call their dignity, than they are of the
women, whom they call their wives.
I have remarked on occasions and with some
interest
,
the presence of nice gentlemen of small
towns, who are curiously observing in the matter
of costume, and who sidle along the corridors with
their eyes fixed upon some veteran in the modes;
and who will presently re-appear with a newly
adjusted
tie, or a new boot to their heel. Thus
mended
,
it is their great delight to stroll along the
corridor
by the drawing room windows; and though
they rarely venture in, it seems to be an infinite
gratification to them, to accept such chance glances
of admiration, as may be cast upon them, from
behind
the drawing-room curtains. And yet these
entertaining gentlemen, will very likely carry back
with them to their place of nativity, large stories of
their flirtations, and convey such side winks as will
astonish their youthful townsmen.
Somewhat less modest than these in character
and management, is your blooming young lawyer
of some small city, who has escaped in the vacation
of the courts,who is a marvel of seemliness, and
who flourishes among the gentlemen of the bar
with an air of being `somewhat' in his town, and
as if ability were not wanting, to make him a
`somewhat' even in this Babel, And when he goes
back to dust his papers, and to throw himself into
the arm-chair of his small city, he will impress the
sheriff, and deputy sheriff of his court confines, with
the propriety of his observation, the extent of his
acquaintance, and the aptness and variety of his
manuvres of gallantry.
The action of a father of an admired belle is
worth casual observation; and has not unfrequently
given me a short respite from the stolidity of the
papers, or the plethora of a hurried dinner. The
affected carelessness with which he greets her, and
the entire coolness with which he gives her over to
the hands of the pestilent worshippers, is quite
amusing. Added to this, is the cool assumption of
his manner with the gentlemen under the trees;
the assumed permission to talk the smartest
platitudes
that ever fell from the lips of a human
creature
,
and the confidence that all will be
acceptable
,nay,
even praiseworthy, from the mouth of
a millionaire, and the papa of a belle.
As for a sketch of those numerous ones, who are
noticeable only by effrontery of manner, and
capital
study of dress, I am, Fritz, wholly unequal to
it; and no words however pointed, or however
spiced with Salic ingredients, could reach them.
Some creatures are as much below satire, as others
are above it.
Addison says, in the course of his admirable
critique upon the Paradise Lost, that he hopes
only for appreciation from men of learning; and
that he would choose, if the choice lay with him,
only learned and critical readers. Now, humble
as my labors are, Fritz, I do still need some small
measure of sense for their appreciation; and a
reproach which is hazarded on such creatures, as
18*
reckon the reproach of an honest man, an honor, is
wildly lost. When contempt of the person, is
greater than the contempt for his errors,when
even vanities, and follies possess a moral sublimity,
as compared with the private character from which
they spring,all satire is at fault, and irony falls
pointless.
Quid agas, quum dire et fdior omni
Crimine, persona est?
But my observations are by no means confined
to the hotel where I find myself lodged. If Lords
Lechery, and Hate-good, are the patrons of the
United States, I should think it ill reckoned, if the
Dowager Love-money, and the wench Live-loose,
did not sometimes thrive at the Union, or at
Congress
Hall. It is true there is a colder air in that
quarter; and there hardly seems to grow upon the
frequenters that easy warmth, which is so
captivating
in the wives, and middle-aged gentlemen of
the west end.
I observe here and there, at the east end of the
town, some very proper old gentleman, who brings
hither his wife or his daughters, as the case may
be, on annual pilgrimages, to look after the
wagging
of the world; and to catch, at safe distance
off, such dribblings from the cauldron of fashion,
as will adorn their rusticity for a twelvemonth.
Such gentlemen are naturally, highly respectable,
and possess a few ambitious, with a great many
correct notions. They believe that the world is
worth following up tolerably close, though a very
dangerous thing to pounce upon. They remind
me of those small carnivorous birds, which through
the lower Alps, keep close in the wake of the
vultures
;
and who though they would shrink from
any murderous assaults themselves, will yet regale
themselves highly upon the shreds, and fragments
of the dead carcass.
There are very worshipful, elderly ladies too,
who are patterns at home, of propriety, regularity,
and every good work,eminent members of sewing
societies,who look solemn at mention of a dance,
and who go into `tantrums' at sight of a cigar, or
the pop of champagne;yet they are not averse,
I observe, to taking an occasional look, through the
blinds, at the Satanic orgies which are passing at
the other house; and they will bring away such a
valuable stock of hints about dress and action, as
will quite set them up for fashionable women, in
their smart little country town.
The Union seems to me a very capital sporting
ground for such ladies as trim their religion with
a fashionable sprig or two, or who touch the color
of their fashion, with one or two soft religious
shadows. God forbid that I should speak
disrespectfully
of an honest and open-hearted religion;
(and I believe in no other.) But, I must confess,
that I have but a scurvy opinion for that peculiar
stiffness of belief, which approaches as near as it
dares to the borders of extreme fashion, without
upsetting its equilibrium,which rails at all
dissipation
,
and is sure to keep close in its track,
which teaches its devotees to utter anathemas on
the extravagance of the springs, and to make a
judicious theft of the fashions, for a blaze in their
country church.
Honesty and simplicity of action seem to me
capital qualities, even of a religious belief; and any
sort of belief which can afford to live without them,
does seem to me a very expensive one. Genuine
goodness neither hangs its hope upon a hat, nor
loses its hue by any quick contrasts of color.
Extravagance
and folly are odious enough in those to
whom such things are meat and drink; but in
those, who by profession live over them, they are
foul things to be sure.
I here and there fall in with a trim old
gentleman
,
whom I recognize as a visitor years ago, when
the Congress hall was in its glory; and I happen
upon pleasant chat with him about the vanities and
downward tendencies of the times. He laments
feelingly the great lack of beauty, as well as of
propriety
in the ladies of our day, and sighs deeply at
the mention of those elegant Baltimore dames, who
twenty years ago, were the deities of the `great
colonnade.' He keeps us his old tariff of
Congress
drinks, and walks as regularly, though not so
sprucely, as he walked thirty years since. Being an
habitual watering place goer, he has kept a
chronicle
of all the marriages, the elopements and the bits
of scandal,which last have so multiplied within the
six years past, that he tells me he almost despairs
of keeping his record perfect.
The peculiarities of the different cities are here
and there cognizable, and offer a pleasant
afterdinner
study. The sleek-haired Philadelphian
wears his oily aspect in the pleasantest and softest
manner imaginable, and any special eminence in
the dance, or in dress, is almost sure to be credited
to our Quaker city.
The Lousianian, full of chivalry and
shirt-buttons
,
is fully even with the heat of the times; and
rolls off his round of French compliments, with
almost French address. The New Yorker,
studious
of stocks, and of fortunes,carelessly assuming
the umpire, fills all the chasms of talk, and riots at
the bar.
The Bostonian, never forgetting his angularities,
whether of mind, or of manner, astonishes quiet
men in the corners, affects proper disdain for such
as are not Massachusetts men; and attuned to one
of the home furors of mystics or of poultry, he
apotheosizes Emerson, or searches for `fancy fowl.'
The stray officer, dainty in his step, most assiduous
in the polka, and most learned in strategy, (but not
of Jomini or Guibert,) leaves no opportunity
neglected, for close attentions to such ladies as have
a weakness for the epaulettes, or the buttons. The
snug countryman, gaping at each, learns a new
trimming to his hair: and cures his dyspepsia with
putting six tumblers of Congress water, to his
lobster
salad.
The show of equipages in the village is worthy of
its mark, and seems just now a rising token of
position
,
and of appreciative enjoyment of the springs.
There are few romantic rides to be sure, nor is it a
long walk to the Congress temple, but a drive into
the neighborhood, and a glass or two passed up at
the hands of a well-dressed footman, are excessively
fine. I think I might safely recommend to any
young gentleman with means to back the trial, (nor
is this always necessary,) a resort to this venture;
and I feel assured that a first class Brougham, with
a pair of bays, (a grey matched with a sorrel would
be better,) and two well-looking attachs, would
open to the proprietor, the familiarities of many a
most worthy ladynot at Saraccos.
Display, in short, is slanting off from the city
winter, and is reflected strongly from the sand
plains of our Vanity Fair; it is coming fast to be
one of the spring amusements. Even the fancy
balls are almost losing force, since the prettiest
of costumes can have only efficacy in redeeming
mediocrity for an evening. The arena will
presently
be transferred to the street; nor should I be
greatly surprised, if in less than two years time,
there should grow up an out-of-door masquerade,
and flowers and
moccoletti
turn the village road
into a Corso Carnival.
Indeed, this wholesale, Roman festivity,
characterized
by a more democratic intermingling of sets,
than can be found at any one of our places of
amusement
,
would, it seems to me, be far more rational
than the feverish pride, which plays, with dress and
equipage, to the eye and the envy of others.
An Eastern fable tells of a rich Emir, who wore
a brilliant diamond; and who was accosted on a
certain occasion by a poor man, who bowed to the
ground and thanked him for his jewel; `because,'
said the poor man, `I enjoy the sight of it, and
am relieved from all care of it.' The Emir had
not counted on such sort of thankfulness, which
humbled him to the position of a purveyor to the
delights of others. Our people who keep equipages
for short walks, would, I fancy, enjoy far more the
curses of the envious, than the thanks of the
grateful
:
and not to discourage them, I think their
enjoyment
in this respect, must be complete.
With all our boasted independence, we are the
most arrant slaves of the most despotic tyrant that
exists. No sooner can a man set foot upon one of
our recreative resorts, than he looks about him for
his cue:if carriages are in vogue, he must have
his carriage; if bowling, he must bowl; if bare
necks, he must strip his daughter to the farthest
verge of modesty; if a moustache, every appliance
is brought into requisition for its growth.
One manifest difference strikes the traveler,
between
the watering places of America and of
Continental
Europe. At the latter, people do as they
choose; in America, people do as others choose.
The European is set down at the
Hotel d'
Angleterre
of Baden Baden, to enjoy himself, just as it
pleases his humor to enjoy himself. He is utterly
careless how Madame the Duchess enjoys
herself;
he is even ignorant up to the last day of his stay if
her Grace the Duchess bathes at three, or at
half-past
nine: He does not even know if the
Marchioness
eats lettuce to her lobster,or drives a
brown or sorel horse to her phaeton; he has never
enquired whose is the claret coupe, or whose the
Bavarian footman in plush and plumes.
He orders his wine at the
table d' hote
, before
he has learned by observation what is drank; and
he drinks, for the stupid reason, that he has a
fancy
for what he drinks. He orders his horse to the
door, with amazing daring, at just such hour as
humors his habit; and he is quite sure that there
will be no hangers on at the door, to remark upon
his unseasonable hour, or to get a guide for their
own times of recreation.
If he has a liking for
rouge et noir
, he strolls
into the saloon, perfectly careless as to who may
witness it, and perfectly sure that for his own action,
he is himself abundantly responsible. He wears
a blue coat of a morning or a black one of an
evening, without the remotest reference to what
any
herzog
may wear; and in agreement only with
the disposition and resources of his own wardrobe.
Among the admirable results of European
civilization
,
which would be, I think, pardonable in
us to adopt, is this delightful truth:that a mans'
stomach, and a mans' caprice are his own;and so
thoroughly his own, that they cannot, by any
possibility, become the stomach, or the caprice of
any other man.
19
The truth is hardly yet acclimated with us:
there is, for instance, a fashionable stomach for the
springs, which serves as a sort of guage to all the
stomachs that drink at the springs: and a given
elegant caprice will straightway drive out every
private man's caprice, and like the evil spirit that
went into the herd of swine, will infect the whole
company, and set them galloping to the devil.
What is said, controls our words; what is done,
measures our actions; what is eaten, guages our
stomachs; in religion, we believe what is believed,
and in literature, are charmed with what is
admired
.
This feeling is in
bulk
, at the springs; but it
branches widely and sets up its teachers through
the country; not only in the saloon, but in the
pulpit. And even the young clerical sprout, grafted
upon a country parish,with not enough sense of
the honor, dignity, and independence of his calling,
to speak out plainly of things god-like, as men talk
to men,will trim his course by the teachings of
his last scholastic divine,will furbish up his
precepts from the skeleton of a theologic course,
and starve us with the miserable dry-bones of a
metaphysic lecture.
In God's name, has our country not enough of
breadth, for free growth, and for independent
action? In the crowded and forest ranks of more
closely peopled countries, we might expect to find
the limbs interlacing, and adapting themselves to
established figures:even as Buffon, (to the
discredit
of the bees,) affirms that the hexagonal form
of the honey cells is the result of rude mechanic
compression. But where there is width, and room
and freedom,God overhead, and prairie-land
below
,why
not make ourselves wide, and not
narrow? Why hedge our admiration by the pent
landscape of thick-set, established beauty, when
the rolling Savannah, deep with fatness, waving
with verdure, enamelled with flowers, odorous
with sweets,an ocean of land,is spread out by
the hand of the bountiful One for our love, and for
our growth?
This makes a queer tail-piece to a letter from
Saratoga; but now that it is writ, digest it as you
will, Fritz; and I will say to your judgment,
whatever it may be, (presuming on your charity)
ainsi soit-il
.
Timon
.
A temporary absence from the city must be my apology for printing
the following
Errata
for No. 19.
On page 156, for
provinciam
read
provinciaux
.
On page 159, line 19, for
sewed
read
served
.
On page 165, line 10, for
and
read
as
.
On page 168, line 6, for
turtles
read
turrets
.
20
THE LORGNETTE.
AUGUST 31, 1850. NEW-YORK. SECOND SERIESN. 9.
Je prends tout doucement les hommes comme ils sont
;
J'accoutume mon ame  souffrir ce qu'ils font
,
Je crois qu' la
campagne
, de mme qu' la ville
Mon plegme est philosophe
.
Le Misanthrope
Wandering about the country a little, of late,
my dear Fritz,snuffing the cool firstlings of the
autumn wind, I have come upon sundry odds and
ends, which seem worth covering with such
broadnibbed
pen, as a country tavern can only supply.
You know that I am not without a certain easy
deftness in `clothing upon' me the country habit;
and that I fling off, as easily as a city maid flings
away her modesty, any of those trim city shoots or
suckers, which a six months warming between the
hot-bed bricks of the town, may have started either
from my head, or from my heels. In fact, I do
not believe but that the old rustic lining would
smack through my outer furnishings,whether of
brain or of wardrobe,whatever I might do to
cloak its russet color.
However this may be, I find my advantage, as
well as my pleasure, in doffing eye-glass and glove,
and in looking about me in the country villages,
with the naive innocence that suits my complexion
every whit as well as it suits the villager.
Of the pleasure of the thing, you, gnawing at
your `roasting ears,' and reckoning in what moon
you will `top your corn,' have little need for
illustration
.
Of the advantage it is to me, `to talk of
oxen, and to glory in the goad,'a thing, by the
by, as easily reached, as the middle of this page,
with my short-nibbed pen,you may judge, when
I tell you how I have met crowds of our
town-livers
,
playing off the prettiest of their daintiness
at snug country taverns; and how I have made
awkward
vis--vis
in the dance, or at table, to
those who would be intensely surprised to find me
behind Mr. Kernot's counter, or dating from John
Timon's
sanctum
.
I have fallen in with many a thriving widower,
whose sombre air upon the wrong side of Broadway
used to cheat me into a kind of mental mourning
myself,forgetting himself in a country village,
to a most riotous series of flirtations. Young ladies
carefully cooped in the city, against any undue
exuberance, have surprised and delighted me with
such extraordinary gymnastic feats, as jumping
out of tavern windows, and have startled a whole
village population with a most intrepid array of
bare arms, bare bosoms, and bare brows.
Here and there, a town-artist has crossed my
track, who had taken up the
role
of troubadour,
and who, between album sketches, guitar, and
moustache, was doing an execution with his
moon-light
poetry, that he might despair of effecting
with any of his moonlight pictures.
I have been mortified, not to say depressed, by a
hauteur and a dignity on the part of several
traveling
families, who I had supposed, from a writer's
observation of their movements in the town, were
exceedingly democratic. But let me tell you, that
your bracing country air has often a wonderful
effect
upon weak nerves; and you shall find a lady
all smiles and nods in the town,suddenly become
among the villagers, as starched and learned as a
malaprop. It is wonderful, moreover, what a
sharpener of memory are your village breezes;
and how the city lady among the country people
will run over a galaxy of namesher
acquaintances
which
are not so much as to be found in
her card basket of the town.
Such familiar chats as I have ventured on with
the old farmers of the neighborhood,to say
nothing
of occasional strolls over the rye-stubble, in the
hope of scaring up a dove or two for my dinner,
have sadly hurt my character with many of the
traveling families. And I have been driven to all
sorts of shifts to make good my place among them
upon the porch;scarce ever, it is true, falling
below the reputation of being an itinerant lecturer
on Phrenology, or strolling doctor; and at times
rising to that of school master, or musical
performer
.
Under shadow of this last character, I enjoyed a
very capital talk with a pursy old gentleman of
the city, who is a profound admirer of the Opera;
and who discoursed to me for a half hour together,
upon the magnificence of the last winter's
entertainment
;
and, in justice to so worthy a man, I
must say that he showed proper charity for my
humble attainments, and the limited range for my
observation. He assured me that I should be quite
taken off my feet with once listening to the
performances
at the Astor Place; and stimulated by
my devout, and open-mouthed listening, he even
20*
invited me (notwithstanding sundry prohibitory
shrugs and glances from his wife) to a seat in his
box, in case I should even find my way to the city.
He was one of those honest and bluff old
gentlemen
,
who are eternally proving a marplot in their
wife's designs upon `good society.' In the town
they are held, between mothers and daughters,
fairly in leash: but once let loose in the country,
there is no end to the embarrassments they create.
It would be hard to tell which I enjoyed most,
the indiscretion of the old gentleman, or the
mortification
and anxiety of his wife. I increased the
entertainment by a promise to come; and hinted
to the old lady, who could scarce keep herself on
her seat, though she must have weighed over two
hundred,that if the traveling were good, I
should probably be down in a `horse and shay.'
The poor woman is, I fear, suffering intensely on
my account.
I sometimes meet with an elegant young
gentleman
of the city, who is dashing in a carriage, and
with a profusion of light kid gloves. He uniformly
creates a great stir in the neighborhood; the young
ladies of the first families (for I find these are of
country, as well as of city growth,) are, of course,
entranced with him; and the gossipping spinsters
shake their hands,wonder very much, and end
with inviting him to tea. He is supposed to be a
gentleman of elegant leisure, and strongly favors
the supposition; although, in one or two instances,
it has come to my knowledge, that he was only
enjoying a month's vacation from some retailer of
nouveauts
.
Do not, for a moment, think, Fritz, that I rank
him a whit the lower for this circumstance; or,
that I would sneer at any calling in life. In those
who have followed the plough-tail, so long as you
and I have done, it would be in very bad taste. I
only wish occasion to castigate anew that growing
American spiritof living upon false pretences,
of making display the measure of the man,of
cheating humble worth of its influence, and of
debauching the popular mind by building a taste
for exaggeration and extravagance.
The beaux of the village are of course thrown
into the shade by any such aspiring adventurer;
and are obliged to adjourn their conquests, until he
shall have taken his departure. As it humors my
fancy to take sides with the weaker party, I throw
myself into the little groups of discomfited rivals
about the inn-doors, and drop hints about the city
peoplenot being so grand as they seem. In this
manner, I have wormed my way into a very large
share of their confidence; and am set down by
them as a kindly old gentleman, who has seen in
his day a great many of the ups and downs of life.
I have even been favored with invitations to one
or two of the village tea-drinkings, and delighted
all the old ladies with praise of their tea-cakes,
and crockery. On all such occasions, I am
excessively
gratified by a study of the village spinsters;
who are the most inveterate talkers, that are, I
think, to be found, in the habitable world. They
possess a happy art of marrying everybody but
themselves; and this exceptionas they are
Christian
women,is, without doubt, attributable to
their own charity. They are always unlimited
admirers of the clergyman, and extol the dear
good man, over their tea, with an enthusiasm
worthy of all success.
If of the Established Church, they absolutely
doat upon crosses, and Miss Sewall's novels, and
offend their best friends by contumaciously calling
all dissenting church buildings, meeting houses.
Should they be of the other branch, they look with
very evil eyes upon showily bound prayer books,
which they reckon no better than so many devices
of Satan; and they are especially earnest in their
devotion to poor unmarried Divinity students. They
are famous at all quiltings and other country
gatherings
;
and with all their charity, are the most
arrant
scandal-mongers that can possibly be imagined.
They will be sure to know and report any little
excesses in a man's diet, and are curiously successful
in their inquiries about the lateness of hours, which
different families keep. As for any little domestic
broils, not so much as a hard word can pass between
man and wife, but they will hatch out of it a
pestilent
brood of stories, that will set the whole village
agog.
Here and there a pair of them will set up for
literary
ladies, which from the size of the town, and
the moderate attainments of most of the
inhabitants
,
is a position of very easy maintenance. They
will furnish opinions to the village in regard to
most of the new novels; and will be sure to make
the most of any errant knight of the quill who may
venture in their neighborhood; and they sigh over
Longfellow with an earnestness every way
commendable
.
They are mightily observant of all strangers who
enter their church on a Sunday, and will sidle up
to the postmaster's or the tavern keeper's wife after
service, to find out who was the strange gentleman
in the middle aisle. This class of ladiesnot all
of them spinstersare, I observe, a sort of
go-betweens
in all the factions which divide the village,
and use their best arts to keep all mischief at the
boiling point. These village feuds, by the bye, are
to be found in all the little towns where I have
lingered for ever so short a space; and I am very
sorry, for my gallantry's sake, to avow that they
are confined chiefly to the women.
What may be their origin, I cannot well
determine
,
but being set on foot, they serve to relieve
the monotony of a country village, and inspirit the
inhabitants into such rivalry of colors and green
blinds, as adds vastly to the life and animation of
the place. The head of each faction is very
pertinacious
in claiming for herself the highest rank of
of gentility; and nothing can mortify her more
than to find her rival dashing in a more stylish hat,
or showing genteel strangers into her pew of a
Sunday. If one has her grounds laid out by an
English gardener, the other will presently set a
Dutchman and Englishman at work together; if
one gives a party to a new married couple, the
other will maintain her superiority, by giving one
twice as large; if one purchase an expensive pew
at the church, the other will purchase a couple. If
one trims her children in finery, you shall find the
rival children presently startling all the maiden
ladies
of the village, with their sharp nursery tails,
their very short dresses, and their double ruffled
pantalets.
A stylish visitor from the city is a godsend to
either party; and it has been a source of
gratulation
to me, Fritz, that my plainness of parts, and
unpretending mediocrity, have saved me from the
sin of fanning any such unchristian feuds; and of
being offered up as a holocaust to the village pride.
Yet I have no kind of doubt, (and you will spare
my blushes,) that if I had ventured upon the
primrose
gloves, and a jaunty beaver,made free use of
my eye glass, and talked of the gaieties of the
winter
,brought
with me my ivory headed stick, my
pumps, and my striped hose, I could, notwithstanding
my years, have flirted with the belle of the village,
have had ambling nags put at my disposal,have
been reckoned passably young by the spinsters, and
read poetry with the Corinne of Main street.
But I forget that I am talking with a veteran, to
whom these things are as familiar as the chirp of
the katy-dids, or the cooings of the wood-cock, in
your low-lying cornfields. By your leave then,
Fritz, I will slip my cabledropping a buoy to
mark the spotand will drift out into deeper and
bluer waters.
COUNTRY CHURCHES AND PREACHERS.
Genti v'eran con occhi tardi e gravi,
Di grande autorit ne'lor sembianti;
Parlavan rado con voci soavi.
Dante
.
I am
not going to make any madrigal of
summer
woods and Sunday quiet; I leave that for the
young poets; the days of my madrigals and
milkmaids
are gone by, Fritz. Their memory may
serve to brighten our talk over a tankard of your
harvest cider, but will come poorly into my didactic
studies. Nor must it be understood that it is with
any unworthy, or irreverent motive, that I put a
seeming spice of pertness into my talk of churches.
Flippancy as little becomes the topic, as mawkish
verse; but there is a way of calling things by their
right names,unfortunately too little known
now-a-days
,which,
however roughly it may bear on
the attenuated sensibilities of my squeamish
readers
,is
yet as far removed from impertinent
gossip
,
as it is from that deferential cant, which
possesses
neither earnestness, nor vitality.
There has been heretofore very little poetry about
our two-story country churches; and I must say,
that with all their adopted richness of modern style,
they have only got hold of the measure of the verse,
without any of the soul that makes it buoyant.
They give us an infinitude of gables, and of carved
crosses, and colored windows,very rich all of
them, in their way,but not adding materially,
in their present stage of adaptation, either to
ventilation
,
comfort, or Christianity.
We have a fashion in churches, as we have a
fashion of Newport, and a fashion for wives; and
we have fashionable country gentlemen, who
having
seen somewhat of cities, instruct the
country-livers
as to how many windows will make a
Christian
temple fashionable, how many angels will
make it Evangelical, and how much ultra-marine
will make it
la mode
. The ladies accept iton
paper; the deacons, or vestry men assent with a
shrug;the architect complies with a leer; and
the builder leaves themin debt.
I do not mean to quarrel at all with the new
spirit in this matter, which has latterly infected
the country. Nothing can be prettier, and more
appropriate than the adoption of the forms of those
old English country churches, which have become
classic by age, and interesting by association.
There seems a touching, and a holy propriety in
worshipping as our fathers worshipped: and there
seems to me something more than tasteful, in
stretching only a simple raftered roof between the
devout and heaven;and I could heartily wish
that it were all the impediment that lay between.
21
I have a strong liking for the deep-stained glass,
throwing colors of `promise' (much needed) upon
the chancel, or the altar: nor have I any great
apprehension that a cross, whether of stone or of
wood, will gravitate very strongly downward; or
that the Devil has yet wrought that symbol
whatever
some Divines may think,upon his saddle
cloth, or his game bag.
But after all, there is a kind of bodily comfort,
which it is inhuman to lose sight of: and to stew
honest country people, in a poorly ventilated chapel,
under an August sun,whatever point it may give
to the Doctor's talk of perdition,does seem to me
as unnecessary, as it is untasteful, and unchristian.
In this matter, as well as in sundry others of recent
importation, we are dealing with the crudities of
the mere form, before we have learned adaptation.
And I would respectfully recommend to
vestrymen
,
and building committees generally, to pay
some little attention to the laws of climate, to
habit, to the Christian Almanac, and to
transpiration
,
while they are stuffing their brains with
crotchets, and finials.
Because a window of Gloucester, although
close-screened
,
and closed, may serve the Gloucester
worthies for ventilation, it by no means follows that
the same will serve in such western city as
Rochester
;
and, if I might be believed, the worshipful
chapter of Cirencester can keep themselves cooler
on the damp pavements, and under the scraped
columns of their minster, than they ever could,
with all their British phelgm, upon the carpeted
floors of the mock minsters, which lie broiling on
the New England hill-sides. I would respectfully
entreat of the benevolent gentlemento whom I
render all honorwho are desirous of canonizing
themselves by church erections, to secure agreeable
recollections of such temporal saintship as they
may attain, by a regard for the comfort of the
worshippers. And I would assure them that it is
much better to gain the gratitude of sober content,
than the heated canonization of a
Purgatoria
.
Of the preachers, I would speak with a charity,
that is as much their due, as it is their need. Let
me not be understood either, in any degree to
impugn
Christian motive: a high motive is worthy of
all regard, and its redeeming excellence will save
even mediocrity from condemnation. But as I
have already intimated to you, Fritz, I can see
nothing
in the sacerdotal covering, from the white of
a Philpotts, to the black of a Princeton student,
that should forbid analysis or inquiry.
It may be a gratuitous regret, and one which
may be thrown back cavalierly on my handsbut
it is none the less soberthat our country pulpits
lack sadly force and mental calibre: and lacking
these, they lack adaptation, energy, width,
influence
,
everything in short that should adorn the
highest office that a man can take upon himself.
A little personal dignity, and a little punctilious
investiture, seem to be all that are demanded, to
establish the claims, and to stamp the capabilities
of our country divines.
Blackstone somewhere says that some kind of
special training, or peculiar mental qualities are
reckoned essential to almost every profession,
except
that of legislator; but every man thinks
himself
born a law-maker. I am afraid that there are
great numbers of Divinity students, who are
laboring
under a kindred delusion, and obstinately think
themselves bornpreachers. Even unfortunate
aspirants to the honor of good farming, or good
house-carpentery, are turned over, with a three
years skimming of Hebrew roots, and unproductive
polemics, to teach the world its duties. They may
make good witnesses for the heathen; but they
will make a sorry set of Pauls for the Athenians.
It is true that the demand upon a preacher's labor
is absurdly great; and an absurd demand
weaklings
will best supply. None but a fool can write
two sermons a week. A strong man wants time to
digest his fullness, and to mature his thought: but
an empty man may talk forever, without any
cognizance
of his crudities, or any sense of depletion.
We are a progressive people, and I have a fear that
we are leaving the talk of the pulpit behind us:
it is certain that very little of that kind of vigor
which sets our ships afloat, is electrifying country
church-goers. That vitality which makes itself
felt by the strong throbs of enthusiastic action, does
not seem to invest very richly our country clergy.
There is a forgetfulness that men are awake and
active; and that the days of cramming children
with Westminster catechisms, and `reasons
annexed'
and of breaking their piety upon the pillory of
Saturday `sundown,' are gone by.
You shall hear prudent preachers, as the world
goes, wearying a mortal hour with a very strategic
assault upon some old bugbear of infidelity, that
is as dead as the sermon that combats it. Poor
Voltaire is brought ghostly from the tomb, to be
made the martyr of some clumsy spike of a quill;
and Hume is resuscitated, that some tyro theologic
sportsman, fresh from his rhetoric, may shoot down
the dead man.
I do not mean to express my sympathy with the
absurdities of philosophers: but I mean to say,
gentlemen(and if any man ought to be a
gentleman
,
21*
it is the clergyman)that your labor is lost.
The rational world is perfectly certain that the
pop-guns of Chubb and Tindal could not batter
down the bulwark of Christian faith: the
booksellers
of London and New York have long ago, with
the brief of their trade-lists, closed the case:and
judgment has been heard. Your antagonists are
damned. Christianity is believed. The weapons
are in your hand, clear and bright: there is work
enough for them on new foes, without any showy
butchery of old ones; and if you cannot make
them felt, it must needs be credited to a little
weakness
of the elbows.
There is something in the language of the
country
pulpits, which it seems to me could bear the
electrifying touch of vitality. I know no reason in
the nature of things, why the sleepy catechism-y
strain, should not give place to a little of the strong
breath of nervous and eloquent language.
Language
in these days of type, is as strong as a
leviathan
,
and as quick as light. Its force and richness
are on the growth; and its stores are at the
command
of whoever will make his study earnest, and
his resolution intense.
What possible sense can there be in pouring from
the pulpit the old short-ranging, six pound balls of
cant terms, and dogmatic expressions, when the
Paixhan gun fairly mounted, will throw such
terrific
shot as the modern vocabulary supplies? There
is not a science or a pursuit, which is not adding
honor and grace to its exhibitions, by that wealth
of allusion which new inquiries in every
department
of knowledge have afforded: and yet our
Divine, too nice for the wholesome homeliness of
Taylor, and not even with the spirit of the time,
guards his cant, and exercises his ingenuity in
speculations about the infusoria that float in the
muddy waters of his scholastic lore. But it may
be signified to me, that the Doctrine is old, and
unchangeable; be it sounchangeable as the hills,
and beautiful as the morning. But therein lies no
reason for not showing forth that permanence, by
those thousand aids of adornment and illustration,
which would give to what is old, the attractions of
what is new. The Doctors need have no fear that
their eloquence of life, or language, can mar or
obscure
the integrity of the tidings they bear. There
is much that is akin to geniusif it be not the
thing itselfin so wrapping old truth in the
garment
of language, that men shall rush toward it,
as toward a new friend to be greeted, or a new hero
to honor. A man may indeed blunder to the truth
through a slough of words; but build for him a
good bridge of well-jointed periods, and as truly as
he loves ease, he will be quicker in his approach.
In all this, I yield no iota in veneration, to the
staunchest of the doctors. It would surely be a sad
reproach upon the Deity, to believe that he had
given soul, with such curious capacity for
developement
and growth, and yet given it with no
purpose toward the fuller and richer illustration
of His Providence. Christian truth, it seems to
me, is no dried up mummy, to be eternally
swathed in the musty linen bandages of the
ancients
;
but it is a live creature, to be clothed over
with the richest dressings of humanity, and to be
crownedif crowned it can bewith the most
glorious accomplishments of learning.
These periods, and this train of thought, have
chased me, Fritz, into the small hours `ayont the
twal:' a day-light revision might take off a little
frill from the dressing; but, upon my conscience,
the color would not change.
ADVICE TO A SON.
`Que faudra-t-il done apprendre  mon fils?' disait elle.
`A tre amiable'repondit l'ami que l'on consultait, `et s'il soit les
moyens de plaire, il saura tout; e'est un art qu'il apprendra chez
Madame
sa mre.'
Jeannot et Colin
(
Voltaire
).
I HAVE in my hand a letter purporting to be from
a lady of standing and respectability, addressed to
her son at Newport; the means by which it has
reached me, do, I must confess, throw a little
doubt upon its authenticity; but its spirit is so
prompt and ingenuous, that I have no doubt that a
great many elegant mothers will be tempted to
endorse
it over to their sons, even though it should
prove to be a pleasant fabrication of my friend
Tophanes.
It begins;I am about to give you some advice
Tommy, concerning your course at Newport;
which, I am sure, if faithfully followed out, will
be of great service to you. You must not suppose
that our watering places are to be used, or
enjoyed
,
merely as places of amusement, or for the
pursuit
of health. These are indeed the vulgar
opinions
on the subject; but the education I have given
you Tommy, will, I hope, make you aware, that a
high position in fashionable society is one of the
choicest objects which a youth of parts and
respectability
can set before him; and believe me,
Tommy, when I say, that proper discretion at our
watering places is one of the readiest means of
attaining
this object.
Your marriage, my dear boy, your position, your
happiness, and the admiration of your too fond
mother, all depend very much upon a proper
regimen
at the place, where you now find yourself for
the first time. You will be careful in the
beginning
about your associates. Evil communications
as the poet says, corrupt good manners. (Do not
forget to read your Shakspeare). And as for good
manners, my sonlud! without good manners,
what is a man worth?
The Shrimps, I see by the papers, are at
Newport
;
and you would do well to cultivate them;
the daughters are not pretty, but let me assure you
that the mamma is of the very first set; and, as I
am told, very easily approachable by young
gentlemen
of address. She is, I am told, particularly
vain of her figure; I beg, my dear son, you will
bear this in mind. The daughters not being
elegant
,
or belles precisely, you will of course win by
a little considerate (but no special) attention. And
let me caution you here, my dear boy, against
undue
civilities to such beautiful girls, as may
possibly
tempt you, but who are of quite vulgar, or
second-rate
families. Your name in that case will
inevitably become associated with them, which
may do you incalculable harm on your return to
the city. Be assured, my dear boy, that the
temporary
and evanescent pleasure of dancing or
flirting
with a belle, will poorly atone for even the
smallest degree of degradation from our set.
Whenever you wish to elevate your mind above
such things, Tommy,think of your mother.
I know gentlemen enjoy greater liberty in these
intimacies than ladies; at the same time, a young
man whose position is not fully established, has
need to be very cautious. The families of wealth
whom I have taught you how to distinguish by the
character, rather than the amount of their display,
it would be well to treat with great, but cold,
respect, since, however vulgar they may be, it is
impossible to say how soon they may fill positions
of excellent odor.
The distinguished visitors you will use your best
efforts to find out, and never fail of any
opportunity
to make their acquaintance. If they be from
distant States, or are people whom you will never
be likely to meet again, pray study their manner
as much as possible, and this study will enable you
to profess an acquaintance in town, although you
should fail of all opportunity for an introduction
Mr. Clay, although since the City Hall kisses he
has become somewhat vulgar, I would still
commend
to your observation, and enough
acquaintance
to pass a flippant word or two with him in
the ball room, will not be undesirable.
But, above all things, my dear son, cultivate
intimacy
with the ladies of note; your own sagacity
will teach you their weak points, and then it wil
be your own fault if you do not succeed. Of
conversation
I have already told you at home; do not
be afraid of making errors, or rather of being
detected
;
fearlessness is a great deal better than too
much honesty,
[10]
[10]
This reminds me pleasantly of the Valets advice to Gil Blas, at
Madrid
:
La crainte ainte de mal parler t'empeche de rien dire au hazard; et
outefois ce n'est qu'en hazardant des discours que mille gens s'erigent
auourdhui
en beaux esprits. Veux tu briller, tu n'as qu' a te livrer a ta
vivacite et risquer indifferement tout ce qui pourra te tenir a la bouche;
ton etourderie passera pour une noble hardiesse
.
and nothing will so mortify your
hopes with women of the world as that foolish
naturalness which falters at a compliment, or which
shows a quick sense of burdensome stupidity.
`Learn to labor, and to wait.'
For your dress I need not now give you rules;
you know already, my dear boy, its great
advantage
.
A light undress of a morning, of plain
colors, and loose fit, is not only
recherch
, but has
a very aristocratic air. You will attentively
observe
the English mode in this particular, and will
recal what I have told you of the Duke of
Devonshire's
toilette, on the occasion of my meeting him
at Brighton. Nor should you by any means
overdress
at dinner, it bespeaks a
new
man; you must
seek to give the impression that your position
makes you able to afford simpler tactics.
Champagne
,
my dear son, is vulgar, and I do hope you
will study to overcome that perverse taste; if you
think, from your position at table, that it would be
polite to make a little show of extravagance, you
can order Chambertin, or Lafitte, which are both
expensive and genteel.
As you do not ride remarkably well, I would
caution you against engaging yourself in that way;
if unavoidable, pray arrange it for an hour when
you will be least subject to observation. I think
your polking very creditable; but remember that
you had much better endure the clumsy step of a
lady well placed, than to enjoy the grace of a
second-rate girl. You will not, of course, be
tempted to sing; but I would advise that you hum
to yourself, in strolling about the galleries, some
snatches from the newest opera; any
inadvertencies
will escape notice, and you will get the
reputation
of having an appreciative taste.
You would do well, I think, my son, to read
some work on fishing and shooting, and to wear
your shooting jacket on occasions. These pursuits
are gentlemanly, but they will hurt your
complexion
,
and if ventured upon, will expose your
ignorance. There is not the same objection to the
shooting gallery, and I would advise occcasional
practice; beside that it may sometime stand you
in need,not, my dear son, that I would ever have
22
you fight a duel,but with the name of a good
shot, you may escape with less imputation on your
bravery.
As for the degree of your intimacy with ladies,
particularly married ladies, I scarcely know how to
advise you. To become the subject of some talk,
and even scandal, is certainly sometimes effective.
But, my dear boy, you must remember that
religion
and morality are, after all, highly respectable,
and though not brilliant, are yet worthy of
consideration
.
I must say that conjugal infidelity,
striking as it is, has always seemed to me quite
questionable, particularly when discovered. So
that, my dear boy, in this matter of
liaisons
, (which
are certainly sometimes very effective,) you must
yield to a mother's modesty, and be guidedas I
hope you always areby your own discretion, and
your mother's suggestions. But be sure, my dear
Tommy, that if you err, you err upon the safe side;
believe me that nothing is more odious than
association
of one's name with a nursery maid, or a
grocer's wife.
I hope you will go to church; it has a
respectable
appearance, and I am told that the Newport
clergymen are generally genteel people, and a
trifling
acquaintance with them would not, I think,
much hurt your position. You will be cautious,
however, of lawyers; they are working men, and
are of very little assistance to a young man who is
building up a brilliant reputation.
Newspaper correspondents, and literary men
generally, you must always treat kindly; but do
not, I beg of you, be too familiar. They are, for
the most part, poor scamps, who will be easily won
over by a dinner, and a bottle of wine; farther
than this, you should not suffer your attentions to
run. You may be assured that however much
they talk about gentility in their papers, they know
very little about it in earnest, and are the sorriest
set of mountebanks that are to be found. A
popular
author, however, who has any chance of
becoming
a lion, you will at once perceive the necessity
of humoring; and, for my sake, Tommy, you will
excuse his vulgarities for the use you can make of
his acquaintance.
Should you attend the fancy ball, Tommy,
consult
scrupulously your complexion, and figure in
your choice of dress. I think the
debardeur
would
suit your style. If Miss Shrimp, as I hear, plays
the Sultana, do you, my dear boy, play the Sultan;
it will become you, and I do assure you that they
are the very pink of gentility.
I hear of a very pretty young lady who has this
year made her first appearance at the Springs.
My dear boy, I do hope you will do yourself the
credit of a
measurable
flirtation with her. At her
age, she will be easily flattered; but remember,
don't lose your self-possession. All depends on
your own nerve and resolution, and I have too
much confidence in you, Tommy, to think you
would be so indiscreet as to fall in love with a mere
girl.
Do, dear Tommy, pay heed to my counsels, and
rejoice the heart of your fond mother.
Adelia
.
I have nothing to add, Fritz.
If we had been blessed with such mothers, what
gay fellows we might have been in our day!
Instead
of wearying out our life in the tame pursuits
of industry, and reclining, as we do now, in the
autumn of our days, a pair of humble Benedicks,
smoking out quietly the remnant of existence, and
quaffing up the simple waters of content, we might
have had a life-range of gentility, and grown old
notorious.
As it is, we shall drop off by and by, silently,
with only so little knowledge of the great whirl of
gaiety, as our chance glimpses have afforded. Poor
outsiders, from first to last!  and may God
grant that, in the making up of the twin divisions
of the dead, we may be outsiders still!
Timon
.
23
THE LORGNETTE.
SEPTEMBER 11, 1850. NEW-YORK. SECOND SERIESNO. 10.
From the observation of this glass (
the Lorgnette
) we also draw some
puns, crotchets, and conclusions.
1st. That the whole world has a blind side, a dark side, and a bright
side, and consequently so has everybody in it.
2ndly. That the dark side of affairs to day, may be the bright side
to-morrow; from whence abundance of useful morals were also raised.
The Consolidator (De Foe)
.
To
you, Fritz, who are of a quiet, contemplative
habit, it must have sometime occurred, that we
Americans, with all our ancestral phlegm, are yet
an excitable people, working off our excesses in
occasional mobs, grand funerals, and triumphant
jubilees. We are as wasteful of breath, as a high
pressure engine; and relieve ourselves by
continued
explosive puffs of vapour, for which judgment
has not as yet supplied any economic, condensing
chamber.
I cannot recall a livelier illustration of the
mercurial
temperament of our town, or a noisier proof
of the justice of De Foe's
lunar
[11]
[11]
The curious reader will call to mind the ingenious apologue on
which are based the papers of the Consolidator.
observations, (as
quoted above) than the history of the last fortnight
supplies.
Upon a Saturday, not long ago, the street world
was solemn, and wore an unusual earnestness of
expression; and the newspapers, with their
gigantic
capitals, drew attention to that last, sad office
of Justice, which cut down a man, while in the
flower of his days, who had been distinguished for his
attainments; and who was criminalin the world's
eyeby only a single ebullition of passion. There
was something in his position, in the refinements
of his education, in the attachment and worth of
his esteemed family, and in the stern, dogged
resolve
which had sustained him throughout his trial,
that made him naturally the object of intense
interest
;
and in six hours from the time that the
trap was sprung, which `shuffled him off this
mortal
coil,' a hundred thousand of the town
population
were stung by a report of the dreadful issue,
into a thoughtfulness that bordered on amazement.
This was the `dark side of affairs;' but on the
morrow, the first day of the week, there was a turn
of our moral kaleidoscope. The same thousands
who had been hushed by the execution of an
eminent
criminal, into a soberness that was almost
reflection
,
forgot the gallows and the crime, as easy
as they forgot the Sunday prayers, and paid their
worship in a jubilant chorus to the Swedish singer.
The papers which on Saturday had set the Boston
gallows in capitals, were now making capital of
the songstress. The news boys had changed their
tune from Dr. `Websterlast day,gallows,' to
`Jenny Lind,first day,Irving House.' Dr.
Putnam gave place to Mr. Barnum; the moral
preacher yielded to the princely showman.
I had forewarned you, Fritz, of the approach of
our Jenny Lind mania; but I am free to confess to
you, that notwithstanding all the intimacy of my
observation, I was not prepared for the rueful and
extraordinary effects of the distemper; and it has
only been by dint of the most extreme caution, in
avoiding contact with infected persons, that I have
been able to preserve my usual state of health. It
has even been a serious question with me if it were
not worth my while to retire for a short time into
the country, out of the reach of the contagion; but
on second thought, a sense of duty prevailed
over my fears, and has kept me firmly at my
post.
Poor De Foe, when thrown into the like
circumstances
,
at the breaking out of the Great Plague in
London, says, `I resolved that I would stay in the
town, and casting myself entirely upon the
goodness
and protection of the Almighty, would not seek
any other shelter whatever; and that as my times
were in his hands, he was as able to keep me in a
time of the infection, as in a time of health; and if
he did not think fit to deliver me, still I was in his
hands, and it was meet he should do with me as
should seem good to him.'
I trust, Fritz, that no little of the same
self-devotion
has belonged to my decision. And you will
the more readily credit this statement, when I tell
you that my landlady, and nearly half of our
household
,
have already been seized with unmistakeable
symptoms of the distemper. Yesterday, on going
down to the breakfast table, at half-past nine
o'clock (my usual hour,) I was surprised to find
the whole family assembled, and talking with a
vivacity
which I had not observed, since the eve of
the late murder of Dr. Parkman; and this vivacity
was all the more alarming, since the coffee was
badly smoked, and the beef steak (of which there
23*
were two platters on the table) was very much
overdone.
The tasteful gentleman who sat over opposite to
me, was fearfully gay; notwithstanding the fact
(to which I was knowing) that his quarter's bill
had been sent in to him on the evening previous.
One of the young ladies served herself to the griddle
cakes no less than five successive times, with a
terrible
vacuity of countenance; and was so much
infected
by the prevailing disorder as to say to a
mild old bachelor who was sitting next her
`thank 'ye for a concert ticket';when she would
have said simply`thank 'ye for the butter.'
The number of the victims on the first day of
the outbreak, is set down in round numbers at
thirty
thousand; but as this statement is made up
from the testimony of the newspaper reporters, who
are strongly predisposed to all distempers of this
kind, and many of them even now classed among
the most hopeless of the victims,it should be
received
with due allowances.
It was really an awful exhibition to see
thousands
of these sufferers rushing along the streets,
regardless of all ordinary proprieties, and sometimes
screaming out at the very top of their voices.
Some would take off their hats, and swing them
several times around their heads, accompanying the
action with exceeding loud shouts, that brought
people in the neighboring houses to their windows
in affright. Some carried huge bouquets of
flowers
,
which they threw into the carriage of Miss
Lind, and kissed their hands, and made all kinds
of antics; after which they either grew melancholy,
and slipped away through the back-streets, or
quieted themselves with drink.
Some seven hundred or more, both in the town
and in the villages adjoining, have been infected,
even to song-making; but owing to the judicious
treatment of a committee of doctors, they have
been, with one exception, entirely cured of the
disorder
.
This singular contagion broke out, as I have told
you, at about half-past one o'clock, on the 1st day
of September; by evening it had spread to an
alarming extent; and at eleven o'clock, several
thousand square feet of pavement were covered by
a dense mass of people, who were gazing stedfastly
upon two iron balconies which project Eastward
and Southward from the Irving Hotel. The
windows
upon these balconies, were most of them
thrown open; and at times, as a female figure
appeared
before one or the other of the balconies, the
crowd upon the pavement would break out into
terrible shouts; once or twice, as it proved, under
the mistaken notion that the female figure was that
of Miss Lind. This error was observed to excite
the poor people the more; an attempt was made to
reduce the unfortunate sufferers to subjection by a
little music, but it so increased the violence of the
fever that I was fain to move away. I went to
bed that night, grateful for my own escape, but
firmly resolved to continue my observation on the
morrow, cost what it might.
The next morning the alarm was general; an
immense number had collected early in the day,
about the corner of Chambers street and Broadway:
they were so many that the omnibuses could with
difficulty make their way through the crowd. A
strange looking flag had been run up the flag staff
on Mr. Howard's hotel; which, I was told by a
bystander
,
was a sort of hospital signal, toward which
the poor people came flocking from all quarters of
the town. Many distinguished victims fell before
nightfall this day; among whom, if I mistake not,
was one Mr. Woodhull, being the mayor of the town;
also a small, gray-haired gentleman, who had lived
in the State of Mississippi, and who was much
known by his former patriotic efforts to secure a tax
upon tea and coffee.
Many deserving tradespeople had, I was informed,
gone quite crazy with the fever; and I saw myself
great numbers rushing into the house where the
flag was flying, with band-boxes, packages, silk
finery, riding whips, fancy combs, umbrellas, fans,
and other useful articles. The town papers had
quite given up all the usual topics of disunion.
tailors' wages, mutual abuse, and the like, and
were discussing with very great energy the
extraordinary
disorder which had broken out in the city.
Even the heavy, blanket-shaped journals, which one
would have supposed were too old or too stupid to
be in any way affected by the mania, were almost
as far gone as any with this Swedish fever; and
talked with a droll dignity about the engrossing
topic of the day. Their sportive and fantastic
humor
,
coming in between accounts of cotton sales;
and the heavy moralities of their politics, reminded
one of the playful capers of a superannuated old beau
who is stirred up by some little buxom baggage of
a country girl, into cutting a pigeon wing with a
pair of gouty legs.
As for the smart gossipping papers, they were
overrun with details about the prevailing disorder;
which to the great comfort of such people as read
the papers, swept their columns clear of all politics,
and morals. Even the dullest of the evening
papers
,
were for once snatched up with haste, and
under
the influence of the town fever, and horribly
excited, the poor people read through whole
columns
!
Once or twice I came near being overwhelmed
by the rush; and on one occasion, nothing but my
cane and my age could have saved me from the
onset
of a company of respectably dressed females.
Some of these infatuated creatures believed that they
saw an angel in one of the windows of Mr.
Howard's
hotel; and, furthermore, that the angel had
blue eyes; and another said that it had light hair;
and a third said (very wickedly, as it seemed to
me) that Mr. Beebe had just been measuring it for
a riding suit. This story was believed so much,
that carriages stopped under the windows, and the
occupants looked up to see the angel, and others
sent up their cards by the footman. It was said,
moreover, that Mr. Barnum had the angel in charge,
and that he would take it to ride after noon;
at which there was a great hue and cry; and the
people flocked around the carriage, as you have seen
them flock in the streets of Rome, about the
wonderful
bambino
, which they keep in the church of
the Capucins, by the Capitol.
One poor fellow would cry out, there she goes!
and then fall to swinging his hat, and shouting
like a madman. Some gazed with a disconsolate
air of melancholy; but these last were
comparatively
few, and consisted, as I was told, mostly of
song writers, and play actors. I looked as hard as
any of them, at what seemed to me a nice young
woman, with blue eyes, and a taking little hat;
but was afraid to say so little of her, for fear of
being
trodden down as a scoffer.
So things went on, getting worse and worse, till
night. Wherever I went, all the talk was the same;
and the next day the papers were at it, fine type
and coarse type, as hard as before. I should not
be surprised, indeed, to find that the matter had
been made the subject of a sermon, by some of those
clerical gentlemen who are familiar with allegories
and angels; if not, I would venture to commend
it, as a fruitful subject, and (what is better) liable
to be listened to; and this is what cannot be said
of a good many town sermons.
On the outbreak of such a distemper in the town,
a vast many quacks are sure to set up pretences of
being able to cure; and their advertisements are to
be met with in every corner. Among them are
great quantities of music sellers, who have
diplomas
guarantying their efficiency and good faith;
beside these, are the writers of biographies, who
are certainly very effective, and only to be
surpassed
by the seven hundred song writers; whose
modesty I am sorry to say, still compels them to
withhold the result of their benevolent endeavors
from the public.
No later than the fourth day, I found that
the fever had reached our quiet quarter of the
town; the chamber-maid was fairly delirious: the
tasteful man was rubbing up his last winter's kids,
and had got his note discounted for a hundred
dollars
;
while I caught his wife in the parlor, at eleven
of the morning, with her hair in papers, humming,
la casta diva
.
I could easily fill up my paper with the relation
of other most extraordinary circumstances, which
attend upon this peculiar visitation of Providence.
Many very dismal facts I might record of the
appearance of sudden and fatal symptoms in
those persons who thought themselves least liable
to attack. I might go on to recount the visitations,
the august ceremonies, the desertion of whole
neighborhoods
,
the frenzy of particular sufferers, the
parlor receptions, the casual remarks of
momentous
meaning, the speeches of their various honors,
the mayor and the president of the Art-Union, the
beauty of riding caps, the size and shape of tickets;
but all this has been recited with captivating grace
by our city editors. Their version is made up
con
amore;
and my own, if ventured on, would I
sadly
fear, be written out
can dolore
.
I must however, take the permission to name
one or two means of prevention, that have occurred
to me, against the fever which is now raging; and
that seem to me worthy of adoption, not only in
view of the public health, but of the convenience
and profit of those people who live in lodging
houses, or who have no ear for music, or who
frequent
the public streets, or who read the
newspapers
.
And first, I would throw out a hint against
the seemliness of blocking up the public way, by a
crowd of more than two or three thousand people,
who scream together: the unfortunate victims of
this mania are indeed to be pitied, but they are
none the less proper subjects for a police
surveillance
.
I would further recommend to
conversational
people, a moderate mention of the name of
Jenny Lind, as well as that of Mr. Barnum; it
having been observed that such mention is greatly
provocative of fever. Moreover, I would caution
the presidents of learned societies against
rushing
in large and tumultuous bodies upon the lady's
retirement; upon the journals most infected, I
would urge a course of dietingsay a column a
dayof Mr. Giddings, or Clark. The small poets
would do well to abstain temporarily from
songwriting
;
and if necessary, shave their heads, and
lease out their services to the Mother's Magazine,
or the Literary World.
24
In case Miss Lind should continue to be the
source of so violent and dangerous a furor, I can
think of no more effective way of alleviating the
excitement, and withdrawing her from notice, than
by electing her a member of the New York
Historical
Society, and by securing her attendance on
the next Tuesday evening meeting.
But a truce to this irony: you see where it runs,
Fritz. It runs to combat that odious, because
extravagant
and unseemly adulation, which has
waited upon the Swedish songstress. She is
deserving
indeed; and that enthusiasm which kindles
into transport in view of merit, is eminently
praiseworthy
.
But when that enthusiasm, by its blind
excess, by its stupid forgetfulness of proprieties, by
its abandonment of all self-respect, and by its
frenzied
iteration, fatigues the sense, and offends
delicacy
,
it becomes a fit subject for reproof. Respect
for the virtues of a stranger is one thing, and
respect
for one's own dignity is another; nor is there
any reason in the world, why the first should
destroy
the last. So soon as a man sacrifices his
self-respect
in the fervor of his applause, he is making
his applause for a sensible mind, good for nothing;
he is taking away from his admiration, all that
should make it sterling, and proffering instead, a
meaningless rapture.
Do not think, Fritz, that my spirit cannot be
stirred with the warblings of Jenny Lind; it
has been stirred thus years ago: but far more
kindlier than her songs, rare as they are, is her
benevolent
heart; and in view of that glorious charity
of Stockholm, I could cheerfully, old as I am, fling
up my hat in the air, and shout with the best of
themlong live Jenny Lind!
And now with a sweep of the pen, and of my
thought, I bring back before you that dismal
shadow of a gallows, which hung over the opening
pages of my present chapter. The contrast,
occurring
as it did within eight and forty hours, is good
for a gaping crowd to look on. Life is a play of
light and shadow.
There
is the professor in black;
and
here
is the singing-girl in white. There is the
murderer; and here, the angel of Mercy. From
the crime and gallows of the first, the proud may
learn Humility; and from the success and triumphs
of the last, the rich may learn Benevolence.
THE YOUNG MAN ABOUT TOWN.
Which course, if it were taken; what would become of many
thousands
in the world,
quibus anima pro sale
, who like swine live in such
sensual and unprofitable sort, as we might well doubt whether they had
any
living
souls in their bodies at all or no, were it not barely for this
fine argument, that their bodies are a degree sweeter than carrion?
Sanderson's Sermons
, IV. (Ad. Pop.)
There was nothing he hated more than an insignificant gallant
that could only make his leggs, and prune himself and court a lady, but
had not brains to employ himself in things more suitable to man's
nobler
sex.
Mrs. Hutchinson's Memoirs
.
Mr.
Noah Webster never made so pretty an
exhibition
of his descriptive powers, as in that passage
of his great work, where he speaks of a dandy, as
a `male of the human species, who dresses himself
like a doll, and who carries his character on his
back.' I take blame to myself, Fritz, for having
thus far left you in comparative ignorance of a
class, which goes so much to make up the
expression
of the town life, as that which is so cleverly
defined by the American Dictionary.
The growth of our fashionable man through the
various gradations of cellar life, drawing-room life,
club-life, committee life, and the life bankrupt,
and married, I have already traced: but of the
young gentleman now brought to your notice,growth
can hardly be predicated. He skims about, by
reason of his light draft, upon the surface of
society
;
and as he carries neither freight nor ballast,
his whole hulk looms over the busy tide, where we
are floating, each our several ways.
He may be found of varying age, from eighteen
to thirty; and between these limits he oscillates
playfully, as his whim, or the season may direct.
He smacks into the town life on a sudden; nothing
has been known of him as a school boy; and very
little of him as a child. His parentage indeed, is
nominal, and accredited: but his real generation
dates from those years of incipient manhood which
go immediately before his appearance upon the
boards of the town. He is found upon the street,
in the hotels, and at the watering places; sometimes
also he may be seen upon the steamboats or in
railway
cars, where he wears colored shirts, and is shy.
On his clean linen days, he favors the
fashionable
purlieus, such as Upper Broadway, Union
Square, and Fifth avenue; and is particularly fond
of a neglig position, upon the step of the New York
Hotel; or of an easy abandon (
i. e.
feet upon the
window) in the smoking room. If pinched for
funds, a matter which he keeps buttoned under his
own coat, he falls away during the hot months to
small sea-shore, or mountain places. Here, his
moustache, and town manner commend him to
hoydenish, lean young ladies, in very long
stomachers
,
24*
who wear fond expressions, and read pocket
editions of the poets; and to those estimable
middle
aged women who wear black mits and long
finger nails, and who talk about charming scenery.
He is cautious however, to avoid those old
gentlemen
,
who abound at small watering places, and
who carry yellow and black silk handkerchiefs,
take snuff, play checkers, sneeze, and talk about
the rheumatiz, taxes, and politics. He cracks
capital
jokes with a young woman who shuffles around
of a morning in patent India-rubbersabout the
petticoats that are hung upon the lilac bushes;
he also rolls at nine-pins occasionally, which
amusement
he makes excessively diverting;particularly
where a stout girl with a red face, keeps rolling the
balls to one side, and an old lady near by, in
spectacles
,
says`lasuz!'
He is not, by half, so much a lion in the town,
as he is out of it; he does not find so much of
fondness to fatten on. It may be that he is a
graduate of a city college, flourishing possibly
one or two barbaric insignia; and in the full
communion with some initiatory association, which
serves as dry nurse to the New-York Club. He is
of course, a zealous admirer of the Opera; and
knows to a hair's breadthwhen to laugh, when to
applaud, and when to go into ectasies.
Nothing proves such a finisher to one of these
young gentlemen, as a trip to Europe; it is of little
consequence that it be either long or wide. An
evening or two at the Gardens of Vauxhall, an
introduction to the
foyer
of the Haymarket, and a
week of a Paris winter's intrigue, are sufficient to
set up a young gentleman of ordinary ingenuity,
in our town, as an `old bird,' and a clever observer.
I should be gratified to meet with some such young
gentleman, who on a visit to Paris, had not
experienced
an affair
du cur
with a distinguished
lady;of undoubted position; who was very rich,
and attended by two or three domestics; elegantly
dressed; occupying a splendid salon, and so on.
And the acquaintance is uniformly so unusual and
romantic!very accidental in the first instance;
either it iswe met in a coach, or, `we met, 'twas
in a crowd;' or our young gentleman catches the
first glimpse of her at a public ball, where she is
evidently
annoyed by the attentions thrust upon her;
she wears the air of a stranger; she is clearly much
above the ordinary level; she does not venture to
dance; and besides, she is very beautiful, and has
a servant in attendance.
Our young gentleman trembles at his own
boldness
,
as he seeks to learn, from the
bonne
, by virtue
of a bribe, the address of the fair mistress. And
thenwhat a glance of the eye, what dreams of
rapture, and what a studied
billet-doux
for the
next day's post! On such memories, our young
man about town, regales his friends, over a
cobbler at Sinclair's, or a dinner at Delmonico's.
But he carefully conceals from them the abounding
disappointment at the end; and with all his
praises of the lady, does not enlarge upon
that art, which imposed upon his folly, and
which stripped him of his money, and of his mirth.
For his physical characteristics, I may refer you
to this relation of a new, but accomplished
correspondent
:
You often see his little lack-brain face,
peering from behind a cloud of smoke, in the
windows
of the New-York Hotel; and the indifference
which he is apt to cultivate, is grown into a
grateful
,
and graceful inanity of expression. He has
purchased, for the approaching cool season, an
enormous bag-shaped coat, with huge collar rolling
up above the tips of his ears. His sleeves are loose,
and long enough to hide his fingers to the tips; and
he walks with his shoulders curiously hooked
forward
,
and his arms bowed stiffly out, as if he were
in the course of training for some very extraordinary
and unusual gymnastic feat.
From a button hole in his waistcoat, to a side
pocket, sweeps a tremendous chain of enamel and
gold, serving to sustain a very trifling watch, and
an inordinate quantity of oxidized charms, in the
shape of bronze women in bath tubs, opera-dancers'
legs, and horse's hoofs. You overtake him in the
street, and speak, (observe, Fritz, that I am
quoting
from my correspondent,) expecting him to turn
his head; but such an expectation is very vain;
there is a slight lifting of the chin, a languid
semi-revolution
at the hips; you see one corner of his
eye, and hear H' ah y,and(to drop now my
correspondent,) it is the best he can do.
But, Fritz, is it not a waste of my paper, and an
added heaviness to my letters, to labor upon those
portraits, which when most finished, and most
true, make us most ashamed of our species? Yet
there are those who love such study, and who love
such samplers. A kind of mutual admiration, and
of mutual generation, sustains the class. Nature
not only favors bounteously the assimilation of
kindred spirits, but all the tendencies toward
assimilation. The young man about town, with
little to attract the ordinary observer, and less to
make afraid, will yet sustain a character for dignity,
possibly for wit, or even honesty, among those of
equal capacity and taste; nay, he may even be held
in high honor by small families of gossipping, elderly
ladies, or at the New York Club.
Sus sui, canis
cani, bos bovi, et asinus asino pulcherrimus
videtur
.
I am not familiar with the much lauded Fourier
and association doctrines; but it has sometimes
been a matter of curiosity to me, to conjecture in
what particular group, or phalanx, the young
gentleman
,
whose merits I have espoused in this paper,
would be entered. It does not appear to me that
he could safely be attached, either to the
industrial
,
or to the nursing groups; and I can only
conceive of his employment as a conversational
expounder of the system; which has now grown so
various under the teachings of different doctors,
that the vagaries of even a fool, could hardly
infringe
upon the integrity of the leading idea, viz:
the upsetting of society.
If the young man about town be of an easy moral
stamp, (and that stamp is current,) he had much
better be of good family, than of good wit. A
measurable position will set a refinement upon
errors, that would look very naked under the
coverings of a poor man's wit. It is French
philosophy
,
but the town will reckon it good,more
especially if I give my authority. In
la Nouvelle
Heloise
, (which it is surprising that our publishers
have not translateduniform with Consuelo,) the
father of Julie reproaches her mother for admitting
to her house St. Preux. `Who then should we
admit, if not
gens d'Esprit
?
' says the mother.
`
Des gens sortables, madame, reprit il en colre,
qui puissent rparer l'honneur d'une fille quand
ils l'ont offense
.'
[12]
[12]
Lettre LXIII. (
Rousseau
.)
I had hoped, Fritz, to jot down for you a few
of the oddities and strange things which belong to
the smaller watering-places along the shore, and
the skirts of the neighboring mountains; but my
present topics have crowded my paper, while the
cool evenings of the first autumn have fairly pushed
the summer festivities out of mind. I shall
therefore
recur to the former matters of the town; and
having fairly set you adrift upon the winter's tide,
by two more pulls at the oar, I shall leave you to
your own pilotage, and to your own reflection.
Timon
.
The
reader must excuse the author, for again pleading absence from
the city, and adding the following Errata for No. 21:
Page 203, line 18, for
writer's
read
winters
.
Page 203, line 25, for
malaprop
, read
Malaprop
.
Page 206, line 16, for
building
, read
breeding
.
Page 210, line 19, for
cooings
, read
borings
.
Page 212, line 10, for
angels
, read
angles
.
Page 224, line 3, for
polite
, read
politic
.
Several minor errors, particularly in the French, are committed to the
reader's keenness and charity.
John Timon
.
25
THE LORGNETTE.
SEPTEMBER 25, 1850. NEW-YORK. SECOND SERIESNO. 11.
Think, ye see
The very persons of our noble story,
As they were living; think, you see them great,
And followed with the general throng, and sweat,
Of thousand friends; then, in a moment see
How soon this mightiness meets misery!
Prologue to Henry
VIII.
Fritz
, you will doubtless remember our entrance,
some few years since, into the salons of a certain
distinguished old gentleman, who received us,
even amid the throng that crowded his receptin,
with a suavity and grace, and a familiar adoption of
our language, that surprised us; and that put us
at ease, even under the frescos of the old palace of
the Medici. And now the old gentleman is dead;
his strange life is ended. The reaper has put his
sickle, for his season's harvest, into the tallest of the
grain.
Let them carp and sneer as they will at Louis
Philippe;there died in him the spirit of a strong
man. Misguided he may have been; ambitious he
was, without doubt; avaricious, too;but in this
vice falling far short of that great Marlborough,
whose monumental column still rises from the
lawn of Blenheim, the worship and the wonder of
all cockneys.
There is something of manly vigor, long forecast,
and admirable action, about the man who could so
bravely struggle with peril, exposure, exile, poverty,
and all the ills that princely flesh is heir to, and rise
above them to the mildest deciad of French
sovereignty
that France has known in a century.
Let those who sneer at the late King of the
French, consider for a moment the enlarging
commerce
,
the flourishing marine, the remunerative
manufactures that sprung up under his thrall;
and let them wander through those galleries
enriched
by his munificence and taste; and if they
doubt the refinement and genius of the house of
Orleans, let them linger in that grand corridor of
the palace of Versailles, by that marvellous Joan
d'Arc in marble, which will go down to future
ages, with the monumental effigies of Augustus,
and of the Bythinian Antinous, as a speaking
testimonial
to the genius of the King's daughter.
Do not see in this any undue sympathy for Kings,
or for Kings' daughters. Louis Philippe was not
all he should have been, or all that his position
and his means would have made it easy for him to
be. But Louis Philippe was a man of talents, of
perseverance, of system, and of energy. And they
who think that monarchie associations will kill all
these, or that mere freedom will create them, have
got a lesson to learn, that they may take wisely from
the life of the old gentleman who has just now
died in the exile of Claremont.
Freedom may, indeed, encourage the
developement
of manliness; but if I be not greatly
mistaken
,
Fritz, there is a growing notion with us, that
Republican institutions are all that are needed to
guaranty it. No mistake could be greater, or more
harmful. Every man has a soul to be strung
discreetly
,
and delicately, and to be attuned carefully,
and with much labor. And when in princely
station
there meet us such capacity, such
developement
,
and such culture as belonged to the head of
the house of Orleans, it becomes us to think that
they were gained, as they must always be gained,
by determined effort.
Let our young men, boastful of their privileges
and exploding in pompous Fourth of July orations,
measure their abilities, from time to time, by those
of the men at whom they affect to sneer; let them
gauge their powers of endurance and the intensity
of their purpose by the same standard; and they
may learn, that bravado does not supply merit, nor
noise give strength of soul.
May the old graybeard sleep calmly in his tomb!
It his virtues were as common with his
countrymen
as his vices are, there would not be so strong
a contrast between their liberty of action and their
liberty of talk.
Pray excuse the sober garrulity which a
reminiscence
of our common wandering has started from
my pen, and I will come back to the topics of my
`stated preaching.'
THE RETURN TO TOWN.
` So having gorged themselves on such fatness as the countrie did
supply
cereris munus et aqu poculum
,nor this with the moderation
of poor folk; they turned themselves city-ward, where they did disport
them through a winter's festival,
non epul sed luxus
,
as he were the
best and worthiest, who could speediest kill off his tyme.
Auct. Var
.'
Now that your swamps have taken on the first
sprinkle of their maple scarlet, and the first frosts
have crowned the broad leaflets of your maize, the
town-world is shrinking back to its city covert.
25*
Already the streets are thronging with much the
same crowd, and the same equipages are astir,
which, eight months ago, tempted me into the
dignity
of print.
All the summer conquests have been made; the
muslin and the barge are giving place to the silk
and the worsted; and bare arms, whether blue
with the breakfast hour, or crimsoned with
ball-room
fatigue, will have to bide their time in sleevy
retirement, until the promenade shall yield to the
soire and the opera.
The fancy balls have, I fear, been without much
efficacy the present season; and from no little
observation
,for
you know, Fritz, that I have played
the debardeur, if not the man-of-war's man, in
my time,I am disposed to think that only the
most moderate clat attaches to the heroines either
of the Newport or the Saratoga display.
And between the advent of the Swedish
songstress
,
and of California, Utah, and New Mexico,
our heroes of the watering-place season, who had
brushed up their steps at Saraccos, and who were
counting on a large figure in the two-penny
journals
,
have been sadly out of sight. They are
deserving
fellows in their way, and, with a propriety
and prudence worthy of the poets, they have chosen
that sphere of indulgence which they are best
fitted
to adorn. But when matters of State, or a
popular singer, engrosses the town, they must even
yield up their vanities to the humor of the public,
and be content with that native inferiority which
some accident of marriage or scandal may, in time,
providentially relieve.
The accredited watering-place families, too, who
at this season are usually blooming on their honors,
and who resort with the chills of autumn to the
town, in the expectancy of much street
commendation
,
are now sadly behind the wake of the popular
taste; and from their carriage, and sour demeanor,
feel the neglect, in a way little credible to their
prudence, or to their philosophy. Even the
eminent
town-livers, who, by their houses, equipage, or
scandal, were the lions of the winter past, are now,
in the overflowing plethora of the streets, roaming
about like tame jackals, who cannot call a shout,
or be anything but inoffensive, with the boldest of
their clamor.
My heart is warm, Fritz; and it is peculiarly
alive to the curtailment of honors in those quarters
where honors are the only basis of character. There
is indeed a class of steady, honest, thriving, modest
people, who never feel loss of attention, because it
is not their habitual nourishment; they do not
court, nor shall they enjoy, my sympathy. But
what, as a Christian man, shall I say of those,
who, if they cannot bewilder the town into a gaze,
or astonish the humble, are the most unhappy
creatures imaginable?
I cannot help, too, entertaining great sympathies
for those who, by a little pardonable bravado at
springs, maintain quite a position, but who, on
their return to the town, are entirely swallowed
up and lost in the throng.
There exists a considerable class of hoydenish,
watering-place belles, who will cut a very gay
figure, either in the parlor of the United States,
or of the Ocean House; but once returned to the
city, where there are no public corridors for
promenade, and no very promiscuous dancing,
their honors are suddenly shorn. My friend,
Tophanes, has the class entered upon his list, and
by reference to his schedule, I find them entered
as,moderately rich,passably young, ranging
in good season, from twenty to thirty-five,good
dancers,busy talkers, sometimes given to pluns,
blooming (naturally),good riders, but of
uncertain
position, and of only moderate education.
In short, he makes them out, of admirable
qualities for summer amusements, and for
public
places; but he adds this significant note against
their names`shy of housewifery;' and thereupon,
by his peculiar system of classification, he drags
in their whole coterie, under his general head of
`forlorn hopes.'
The finer accomplishments, and any of the
graces of even lady learning, are sadly wasted at
our summer places; indeed they are in little
demand in any quarter (always excepting Boston)
during the hot months. With the approach of
cold, however, cultivation gains repute. The
musical and literary soires divide supremacy with
the street and the ball. Sonnetteers who have
lived on whey and Festus during September,
regain position at the town tea-boards; and
starveling
authors rejoice again in invitations to dine.
New books are cut open with the cast-away fruit
knives or exhausted corset bones, and critiques
upon the drama or the new novels are as plentiful
and gregarious as the Jersey reed birds.
The Home Journal is furbishing up again its easy,
hot-weather columns; and we may expect to find
the sprightly de Trobriand giving us, instead of
long Paris feuilletons, a new taste of the town
suppers, and of the town ladiesserved up with
his French
sauce piquante
.
It might be pleasant, Fritz, to pursue to some
length an inquiry about such literary elements
as belong to the town socialities, and to trace, if
possible, their reciprocal action. I am afraid,
however, that it would take me upon delicate
ground; it is certain that a little affectation of
literature is beginning to be employed as a
burnisher
for vulgarities; and our most worshipful
grocer or broker can in no better way take off
the edge from his ignorance, than by a studious
patronage of the crack-brained poets. Our
adventurous
bachelor lawyer, too, will foist himself
into the graces of showy companionship, far better
by his hap-hazard critiques upon Punch, or the
Berber, than by his Clientelle, or his Chitty.
Aspiring ladies, moreover, who are zealous for
something more than the notoriety which equipage
or magnificent rooms will furnish, would do well
to take a morning hour with the Enyclopdia, in
lieu of the upholsterer, and in a week's time they
will be able to astonish their vulgar and rich
acquaintances, with the extent and variety of their
erudition. I would further specially commend to
them an enterprising young artist of the town,
who has succeeded in producing such an imitation
of book-backs as would escape detection in any
classically shaded alcove. He should, however,
be instructed to confine his labors to the standard
works, which are rarely read; and any counterfeit
of Tupper, Boyer's Dictionary, or the Complete
Letter Writer, would be hazardous.
Thanks ought to be given, in this connection, to
those philanthropic gentlemen, who, while they
collect large libraries, show such a scrupulous nicety
in guarding their treasure from the profanation of
either public or private scrutiny. Like the old monks
that Curzon tells us of, they brood among their
books, and hatch out their ideas by incubation.
As for our young ladies, literary
accomplishments
vary strangely with taste and circle. We
have our Italian speaking, and loving ladies,
adoring Manzoni, whom they read, and Dante
whom they do not read,who are profound lovers
of the opera, and of moonlight,sentimental and
passionate, and uncommon admirers of moustache
and oysters.
We have our ladies of French suavity, by far the
most numerous class,practising on a patient
femme de chambre
,
and a dog's-eared Raphael,in
love with the Home Journal, and passionately fond
of waltzing,making their talk crisp and full of
equivoque, and partial to bare shoulders, and to
young men of fortune. There are beside, our
young ladies of English habit, the friends of some
`first families' either in Boston or Virginia, who
can repeat you long passages from Romeo, or the
Bride of Abydos,who are prim, and critical,
much given to letter-writing, and very knowing
about the habits of the town poets,firm believers
in the Literary World, and prone to long sighs.
Nor ought I to forget the odd and eccentric
coteries, who are ravished with German arias and
Faust, and talk incontinently in German twang;
nor yet those humbler literary victims, who read
Mrs. More's voluminous biographies, and who, if
you give them only moderate occasion, will
overwhelm
you with a gush of dogmatism, that is as
woful to withstand as the French of boarding
school girls, or the moralities of the Herald.
Of musical accomplishments, and of their position
upon the opening boards of the winter, it would be
indiscreet to speak, in view of that splendid
northern
comet of song, which is just now sweeping
over our sky, and trailing from its golden hair
fever and delirium. And, Fritz, I should be very
recreant to my intent of keeping you even with the
rush and current of the town life, if I did not give
you some further picture of the prevailing mania;
alas, the picture is only too ready; your philosophic
Timon has yielded to the infection; and this,
notwithstanding all ordinary means of prevention.
My only appeal now to your charity, must be
couched in the words of the old play:
I never thought to fall a victim;
But being fallen, good sir, pity me,
And hold me innocent of all the throes
And flights of my disorder; which Heaven,
And not myself, doth breed in me!
A CAVATINA.
Je ne say que faire de pareillement comme vous rhythmer, ou non.
Je n'y say rien toutefois, mais nous sommes en rhythmaillerie. Par
sainct Jean je rhythmerai comme les aultres, je le sens bien, attendez et
m'ayez pour excus, si je ne rhythme en eramoisi.
Pantagruel, Liv. V.
cap. xliii.
Not long since, there arrived in our city a pair
of the Lafayettes, who landed, washed, shaved,
bathed, ate, slept and departed, without so much
as starting from their ambush a single one of the
lion-hunters; with the exception of one or two
riddling
shots from the small arms of the evening
papers
,
they escaped scot-free, and as unscathed as if
their father, the poor old marquis, had never
buckled
on an epaulette for American Independence.
At Albany, indeed, I learn with regret, that they
were overtaken, and were honored with such a
surfeit
of mud, Devons and Dorkings, as must have
satisfied both their rurality and their pride.
To their escape from our town, they are indebted
not so much to our generosity as to our Jenny Lind.
You, Fritz, will understand this;for you have
listened to this songstress amid the blaze of kingly
attendance, and under the heavily embossed roof of
26
a Royal opera-house;where the King and his
suite were nothing, and the fairest, `high-bosomed'
dames of the Unter den Linden were nothing,and
where the long-moustached young officers of the
Prussian army twisted their German faces into all
shapes of delight. You will understand it, for you
have seen her add her native grace to the sweet
impersonation of the dreaming and wronged
Sonnambula
;
and you have seen her, with all the
accessories
of brilliant stage decorations, and with all
the vitality of infectious dramatic skill, stretch up
those little hands to Heaven, in all the fervor and
the strength of a song of prayer.
Seeing her thus in the old world, where at every
sunset martial music swelled upon the air, with its
tale of monarchic splendor, and of monarchic
power
,it
is pleasant to see her here, quit for a time of
the panoply of the stage, and in no character but
that which she best adorns, viz., her own,lending
her sweet voice and songs to the clear atmosphere
of our land of freedom.
Nor could our songstress easily find a more
glorious
singing-spot than that upon the edge of our
moon-lighted baywide as the gulf by Sorentum,
and with a richer green upon the shoresoft as
the Lagoons of Venice, and wakened with the
charm of a freer and happier life.
Had Jenny been less than she was represented,
either in tone or in heart, there might before this
have been a strong reaction. But from the first,
she has more than sustained her character; and
with a most liberal hand, she has showered back
the first largess of the town, to run like the golden
currents of her song in a thousand channels,
carrying
gladness and joy with their sparkle.
It is a new feeling with which to worship art
that of doing goodness by the worship. The
knowledge
of the abounding benevolence and liberality
of this high priestess of song, makes our offerings
seem like the sweet sacrifices of old to some
protecting
goddess, or like that Christian
munificence
which made the wise men of the East
prodigal
of their frankincense and myrrh.
Jenny Lind is reported to be appropriating her
earnings in this country to the establishment of a
great Swedish school; it can well be believed; her
charity and good sense lend evidence to the report.
Let me set the matter down for you, more
narrowly
;a
young woman, not yet thirty, scarce
appearing
two and twenty, with whom the
enthusiasm
of youth has not yielded one jot to the
approaches
of age,while yet in the hey-day of life,
when worldly vanities take strongest hold of the
soul, and under an amount of blandishment and
flattery that might overcome the staid virtues of a
veteran, is bestowing her honors on the needy, and
the triumphs of her art and study upon the orphan,
and the poor. It is as if Raphael had painted
always
to teach lessons of charity, or Byron made
verse for the endowment of hospitals.
I love, I must say, Fritz, the very exuberance of
admiration which waits upon such charity. It is
pleasant, amid the cynical things which are
credited
me, to give loose to such enthusiasm as five
and fifty years can yet keep within the walls of
manhood, and add the applause of a
Timon
to the
plaudits of the multitude. God save me from that
respectable class who cherish their impassive habit
under all the events of life, and who cling to their
coldness as the only security of their dignity!
You surely will not set me down as an echoer of
the praises of others, or as one given to the loose
carriage of indiscriminate flattery. My letters, one
and all, have told you a different story:nay, they
will have even made you question the heartiness
which you recognized in the days gone by,when
we mingled our struggles and our hopes upon the
brink of youth, as the tide set outward, and
leaped together into the stream that led on to life
and destiny. But now, with the memory of those
notes of the songstressnot in my ear, but in my
soulflowing over me like pleasant thoughts
heaven-ward
bound, and heaven-belonging,now
falling
to an echo, sweet as the sweetest memories of
childhood, and again rising and swelling, pure and
high as the best hopes that beckon us toward
futurity
,I
fall from my office of critic, carpist, or
whatever you may term me, and yield as profound
an homage as any, to that art which, though it
runs before the foremost, is yet sublimed to a still
higher pitch by its abounding charity.
There is something more than interesting in the
thought that a lady songstress, of foreign birth, is
gathering by her melodies, from Americans of every
class and every taste, the means to build up her
distant country of the North in the harmonies and
duties of civilization. Think of it for a moment,
Fritz, that your ticket, and your seat, is to give a
desk to some poor Swedish scholar; and that the
echoes of the Nightingale (sounds to be kissed) are
to re-echo through their whole life-time, in the
hearts and voices of ten thousand blue-eyed
Scandinavian
children!
There is a kind of moral sublimity in the thought,
that the inhabitants of our Western World are led
on by their sympathetic appreciation of the highest
art, and by their offerings at its shrine, to extend
the means of cultivation and of refinement to the
26*
people of that mountain peninsula, over which
reigned the great Gustavus Vasa, when America
was a wilderness, and this Castle Garden a low
alluvial
debris, on which the herons stalked among
the rank sea grass, and half-clad heathen stranded
their birch canoes.
The fashionable world, the papers tell us, has
held aloof, and has only here and there sprinkled
the benches of the Castle; if so, fashionable people
are to be pitiednot so much for their weakness
as for their losses. I am inclined to think that the
fashionable world is slandered by the report. Were
Jenny less than Jenny; were the sympathies she
excites less universal, or her vanities more in
keeping
with the proper vanities of the town, we should
long ago have lost her
navet
in the splendor of
parade, and our fashionists would have been
intoxicated
by her reception of their favors. But even
the idlest, and the strongest of our fashionable
world, are not apt in the offices of self-denial; and
though they are not remarkable for their deeds of
benevolence, yet they will not cheat themselves of
a song that beguiles their
ennui
, though the price
they pay is a reluctant charity. What a lesson is
given by this benevolent Swedish woman, to our
silken drivers of showy equipage, and to our fat
dandlers of poodle dogs!
How many of our richly-reared women, between
twenty and thirty, have got an ear or eye for
outcast
,
needy children, or for the groans and
sufferings
of the poor? How many of them are in the
habit of commuting their necklaces or their opera
fans into bread for the destitute? How many of
them keep the calendar of our schools by charity,
and do their offices of kindnessfor a blessing?
There are indeed honorable exceptions, whom it
would please my fancy to designate;they find
their reward in the glow of an honest purpose.
With the most of them (it is hard to say it, Fritz,)
this town life is but a round of delirious indulgences,
in which the delights afforded even by this new
meteor of song, are onlyan added excitement.
Bounty and duty are to them unknown terms, just
fitted for pulpit talk, but very harsh in the
boudoir
.
Their sensibilities are kept for the dreamy
rhapsodies
of elegantly-bound poets, or for the sweet
covers of their prayer-books. Their charity all
exudes in a twilight tear; and all their religion in
a Lentan fast.
You will perhaps set me down, Fritz, as one
crazed by the reigning excitement, and as giving
loose to a frenzied intoxication of spirit; but I
claim no absolution from that sympathy, which is
started by the holy offices of charity, and adorned
by the natural graces of simplicity and song. I do
not envy the critic, who must listen with
professional
coldness to such a singer, and curb his
admiration
by the music-master's scale. Even the
elegant journalism which talks of her
bravuras
, her
andantes
, and
falsettos
, is to me a Crispin criticism
upon a Phidian statue.
Jenny's
andante
is an
allegro
of spirit; she
cultivates no catch-penny
bravuras
of voice, though
her whole action is a
bravura
of soul. Her life,
like her voice, is of one register; and her actions,
like her tones, whether
di testa
or
di petto
, have
always that peculiar and holy symphony of
utterance
which makes them integral and
alone
.
There are those who object, that Jenny's voice
brings no tears, and that her style is cold. They
prefer the heated utterance of the Southron. Every
man will have his taste; but for myself, Fritz, I
had rather see the heat of the soul in deeds, than
to take my knowledge of it from the lip. And with
Jenny's warmth in the world, and toward the world,
she can well afford to spend her voice in cool showers
of refreshing and limpid sound, rather than in the
heated outbursts of sultry, electric clouds. The
tears she makes, are the tears of gratitude; and
the smiles she calls, are the smiles of wonder and
of joy.
I must confess that I have enough of the Saxon
blood tingling in these finger ends, to welcome, as
a northern cousin, the pure, bright genius of the
Swedish mountains and pine-lands, who is chaste
and pure as the auroral lights;nor do I regret one
whit, that she does not bring in her breath the heat
of the simoon, or show in her style the yellow
intensity
of the tropics. Her song is fresh, genial,
sympathetic; and though it does not welter and
writhe like a swollen and turbid mediterranean
river, it rolls on, pure and clear, like a rill through
heather, or dashes like a mountain stream,
watering
bountifully wide meadows, and making whole
hillsides green.
The Grisi has her richness of song, flowing smoothly
and evenly as oil; but Jenny's notes are like the
dashing sparkle of spring water. The first may
feed, with its combustible material, the fires that
are seething in one's bosom; but the cool, joyous,
and limpid brightness of the other will feed the
health and temper of the whole man.
I propose no quarrel with the critics; they are a
captious set; and a quiet gentleman must needs be
much disturbed, if not worsted, by an encounter.
But in this matter of objecting to the town favorite,
her northern style, and her lack of that impassioned
dramatism of musical sentiment, which belongs to
the Italian, it seems to me that the critics are as
idle, and meaningless, as if they were to object to
the blue of her eye, or to the golden shadows that
lie parted over her forehead.
She is therethe large-souled woman, with not
one affectation of the stage, or one mimicry of
feeling;only Jennyas the God who made the
people of the pine-lands, as well as the people of
the olives, fashioned her; and if the amateurs can
mend herthey may.
I wish, Fritz, from my heart, that for an hour I
could get at one of your forest skirts, to gather a
bunch of wild-flowers,with the golden rod in it,
and a fragrant orchis, and a blue daisy, and pale
ghost-flower, set off with the heavy fringe of a
brake, and the feathery lightness of the maiden's
hair,to make up a bouquet for the songstress. And
I am sure that such a bunch of wild flowers would
touch Jenny's heart more nearly, than all the
flaunting blossoms from our green-houses of quality.
Act upon the hint, my dear fellow, and tie one
with your own hands, with the ribbon grass that
grows in your meadow; send it me at once, and it
shall be braided into a thyrsan garland, to hide the
point of my Timon raillery, and to be laid down,
with all the grace that years have vouchsafed to
me, at the feet of the blue-eyed
Jenny
.
Timon
.
27
THE LORGNETTE.
OCTOBER 9, 1850. NEW-YORK. SECOND SERIESNO. 12.
This is Timon's last.
Timon of Athens, Act III.
, Sc. VI.
When I first took this task in hand,
et quod ait ille impellente genio
negotium suscepi
, this I aimed at,
vei ut lcnirem animum scribendo
, to
ease my mind by writing, for I had,
gravidum cor, fetum caput
, a kind
of imposthume in my head, which I was very desirous to be unladen
of.
Preface of
Democritus Junior
.
It
is now ten months, my dear Fritz, since I first
put on the dignity of print, and undertook to tell
you something of our Life in Town. As I then said,
a hap-hazard ramble over many portions of the
world, and a feeling that some modest
acknowledgment
was due from me, for the rich amusement
that the public had so long and gratuitously
afforded
,
prompted me to begin. I had also a hope,
that while my letters would relieve the plethora of
much and long observation, they might, in their
small way, do a trifle of good.
But it was no part of my purpose to make my
work altogether a public charity; for I had an
honest convictionnot currently entertained by our
town writersthat deeds of charity would be much
more acceptable in the way of spare pennies, than
in any dribblings from a pen.
A paragraphist in the Literary World has indeed
thrown out a hint that nothing but a long purse
could justify the author's continuance of his labor. I
understand this to be a pleasant intimation (coming
too from an experienced source) that the
Lorgnette
was a bill of expense to its author. To have
my open avowal on this point doubted by you, Fritz,
would grieve me; a doubt from some quarters
might provoke me; but there are still others, I am
happy to say, where the expression of such doubt is
neither grievous, provoking, nor important.
I began without any newspaper countenance;
from the start, only a single editor was cognizant
of the plan; and in his journal no notice appeared
not so much as bare mention of the paperuntil
a volume was complete. The work has had no
friendly puffs, but has steadily pushed on, neither
asking nor seeking other newspaper favor than its
merits might seem to demand.
It has met with no little rough jostling and hard
usage; whichyou will be happy to learnhave
neither broken my rest nor harmed my digestion.
There are some who have conveyed covert sneers,
in what they are pleased to term compliments of
my graceful style; who have insisted on the
trapping
of words, as if that had been my special study,
and there were no earnestness of purpose.
Now, I have no great admiration for the
brilliancies
of Rhetoric; but I must confess that I have far
more even for its needless niceties, than for that
pseudo honesty and energy which bases its
character
upon crudeness of speech, and which blurts out
its fancies in such gross shape, as to impose upon
the vulgar an idea of their weight and profundity.
I never yet saw reason to believe that truth or
earnestness
lost one whit of their power by aptness of
language; nor can I conceive what sort of truth
that might be, which would call for inaccuracy of
expression, or be promoted by violations of
grammar
.
There is no more ingenious way of diverting
attention
from the real purport of a speech, than by
commending its grace; an unbelieving Philistine
would take all the sting out of a Rabbinical
doctrine
,
by descanting on the eloquence of the
preacher
;
and there is not a prettier way of showing
indifference
to the knife that cuts us to the quick,
than by remarking upon the polish of the blade.
Surely, the charge of too much refinement is
novel; and it is one that the wildest extravagance
of retort would never justify me in hurling back
upon the critic.
But let me not be reckoned ungrateful for the
kind words that have encouraged me; words so
kind, indeed, that they have made even age blush
for its short comings. My particular thanks are
due for the kind notices of the Home Journal and
of de Trobriand's Revue; and they are the more due,
since, though an utter stranger to their conductors,
I have not forborne to bring them under the dashes
of my homely but honest pen. Very few of our
literary men, now-a-days, can, from position, afford
to be generous in their praises; and still fewer add
the willingness to the power.
I must also express my grateful
acknowledgments
to the Editor of the Albion, and to a late
critic of the Express;nor can I believe, from the
very kind tone of the last, that I am indebted to
that sagacious individual, who, at an early day,
furnished
me, in the columns of the same paper, with
27*
both sarcophagus and epitaph;
[13]
[13]
I append the notice in full:No. 1 of this publication was pleasant;
No. 2 was less so; No. 3, stupid; and in No. 4, we must say we see
neither wit, humor, or the purpose. Ere long we shall have to write
over it the two last lines of old Malsherbe's epitaph
`
`Elle a vecu ce que vivent les roses
L'espace d'un matin.
it was graceful to
compare my paper to the rose; but, alas,
il n'y a
point de roses, sans epines!
May Heaven grant to
the accomplished gentleman, who I hope is not yet
deceased, an epitaph as pretty, andas premature!
I have amused myself from time to time, during
the summer, with sauntering into my publisher's
shop,to overhear the remark, and to watch the
pleasant brusquerie of my excellent friend, Mr.
Kernot. Of late, however, he has grown suspicious
of middle aged gentlemen who wear a half country
air; he is by no means so communicative as at
the first; and only the other day, he honored me
with a look of searching scrutiny, that required all
my self-possession to withstand.
Of course I have heard very much said of my
paper, which my pride, more than my modesty,
will not allow me to repeat. One or two
well-known
writers of the town, whom I had reckoned
innocent persons, have not scrupled to express, in
my presence, the most contemptuous opinions of
my labor. It does really seem as if they might
throw a little more humanity into their speech; I
do assure them that I have no wish to trench upon
their ground, and still less, to borrow any of their
honors. We ought indeed to be capital friends; for
while they are unwilling to rank my labors with
their more tasteful productions, they may be
certain
of having my heartiest sympathy.
Some dashing ladies, whose names I find on my
New-Year's list, have returned the numbers to my
publisher, with very odious mention of the author;
I regret, exceedingly, that I could not dissipate
with my pen an ennui which it has been my sad
fortune to relieve, time and again, with the most
meagre of chat. But there are those I find,very
proper ladies, too,who, though quite grateful for
the attentions of an indifferent person, under the
walls of a salon, would altogether spurn him, when
they have no neglect to conceal. Like some
flowering
plants, they enjoy the smallest sunshine when
exposed in the garden air, but on their return to
the shade of the cellar, they thrive and recruit in a
state of natural torpidity.
Some few have thought it fashionable to
subscribe
for a shilling pamphlet,that has met the
kind mention of the Home Journal,and yet they
remain contemptuously ignorant of all that lies
between the covers. In this neglect, I find myself,
however, in capital company; and can afford to be
cast aside with a shrug, by those who do as much
for their dictionaries and their Bible.
A vast many, whose opinions are sound, and whose
talk even has aided my observations, would have
relished much more what I have written,if they
had written it themselves. They remind me of that
old philosopher, who advised his pupil to listen to
his conversation, and to note it down for his
advantage
.
Some time after, the pupil showed him a
digest of his reflections; which the philosopher
highly admired, until he learned that they were
derived from quite other sources. Opinions which
would have been worthy of every consideration, on
the lip of some correct old lady, lose their force,
when bruited in this public and anonymous guise.
The man who has no character as an author, has
no right to say good things on paper; and what
good people extol from their pulpits, is very
impertinent
in the type of an unknown adventurer.
A story is told in Athenian history, of some young
fellow of exceptionablebecause unknown
character
,
who, on occasion of an important discussion
in one of their popular assemblies, made a speech
which every one thought well of, but which no one
regarded; nor was it until it had been repeated
by an old and accredited demagogue, that the people
were led to act upon its suggestions, and, by their
compliance, to gain a triumph. So, it seems to me,
there are a vast many in our town, who have only
one look-out place; and their mental optics take
one unvarying plane of convergence; if any object
strikes the focus, it is all very well; but if a little
to the right or to the left, it is condemned to
darkness
.
They are like those domestic people
Rabelais
[14]
[14]
Gens nourriz dedans ung barril, et qui oncques ne reguardrent
que par ung trou
.
talks of, who flourish in a tight-hooped cask,
and are forever looking through one bung-hole.
It would puzzle some of the good folk not a
little, to find that the staid old gentleman, whose
visits they have honored with smiles of welcome,
is the same who has suffered such gross neglect
whenever he has taken up the pen.
I have been much amused, Fritz, by the
attributed
hits at particular individuals, and by the
undoubted
portraits which some wiseacres have
detected in my pages. Some of my pictures have
been declared excellent studies of those whom I
never had the happiness of seeing; and of whom,
unfortunately, I had never heard, until the
quick-sightedness
of the
quid-nuncs
brought them to
my notice. A gentleman who has worn very
much of the suspicion of authorship, assures me
that he has been assailed with threats, by one who
has fancied himself the subject of a special allusion;
it would be wise for our hero to reserve his ire, since
he has selfishly possessed himself on an honor to
which there was already a score of rival claimants.
Very many, as I am told by my publisher, are
pluming themselves on being the originals of sundry
of my sketches,whose follies and peculiarities
have been wholly without the range of my
observation
.
They are certainly very welcome to any honor
which I may unconsciously have done them; and
should my whim lead me to take up the pen again,
I shall be happy to afford them still farther
gratification
.
But heretofore, I have had a higher aim
than that of making individual portraits; my
attempt
has been to represent classes only,to ridicule
follies in the mass. It would be very strange, if,
in following out this design, I had not touched upon
some traits so pointedly, that they might be
recognized
as belonging to particular individuals. I claim
no exemption indeed, myself; and have been
conscious
often-times of offence, in the very matter of
my condemnation.
I have even been the subject of quite gratuitous
pity, as offering in my own person the ground-work
for one of the most odious of the caricatures; but
I enjoyed the consolation of an exceedingly
good-natured
friend, who himself pointed out the
resemblance
;
but advised me not to take it too much
to heart,with the comforting assurance, that the
author was dd low.
It is, perhaps, needless to say that my incognito
is still entire; nor can I see that conjectures are
any nearer the mark, or the
quid nuncs
any better
agreed, than on the first day of my issue. Some
of my nearest friends are assured of my connection
with the authorship; and others, quite as intimate,
stoutly disallow such assertion; as I cannot
confirm
either, without giving offence to the other, I
am content to let the matter take its own course.
In my own quiet quarters, the family are still in
the dark. The have indeed read my papers, and
have discussed them, sometimes to my great
annoyance
;
and more rarely, to the gratification of
a needy vanity. The younger ladies are delighted
with such portions as condemn those extravagances
that are beyond their reach; and the elder ones
are mightily pleased with what they fancy to be
sarcastic hits upon all society which they do not
enter.
The tasteful gentleman has had his suspicions
of me; but he cannot reconcile my quiet habits,
and advanced age, with either the general range of
my observations or the occasional flippancy of my
speech. The old lodger above stairs excepts to
nothing but the slur upon the Westminster
catechism
;
bating this grievance, he reads all with an
unction, that has once or twice flattered me into
taking a pinch of his villanous Maccaboy.
With this much of prefatory gossip, Fritz, let me
give you one more launch upon the town, and my
volume is ended.
TOWN SOCIETY.
Carbonarius in quadam habitans domo, rogabat ut et fullo accederet,
et secum cohabitaret:sed fullo respondendo ait,Sed non hoc possem
ego facere; timeo enim ne qu ego dealbo, tu fuligine repleas.
Affabulatio
.
Fabula significat omne dissimile, esse insociabile
.
sopi Fabul
.
The
public has seen fit to regard these letters
in the light of strictures upon the Town Society.
It was by no means my wish to give them so
narrow
a limit; nor has my playful raillery borne with
it, surely, any of the assumption of a judge. Still,
the public are welcome to their decision; and in
view of it, I cannot better close, than by setting
down, more pointedly than I have yet done, a few
of my old-fashioned opinions.
But first let me spare a word for those learned
coxcombs who consider all talk about society as
sheer twaddle. That a man who knows nothing of
the courtesies of life, should sneer at them, is quite
natural; but that he should plume himself upon his
ignorance, is not a little extraordinary. Such men
are to be classed with those bold spirits who carry
their independence in their manners, or in their lack
of them. I have great faith in one who thinks for
himself on such points,provided he thinks wisely;
but if he think wrongly, or if he think purposely
after a different manner from other men, on all the
minor forms and conventionalities of life, I think
he would be more happy and respectedthough
possibly not so much stared atif he employed
some one else to think for him.
The habits of amusement, the every-day
practices
,
and, in short, all those observances which go to
make up what is called fashion, have a very
considerable
bearing upon the virtue, the manliness,
and the intelligence of a people. To slight them,
while careful about the ordinary claims of
education
,
is to neglect the atmosphere we breathe, while
anxious only for our meat and drink.
I have been accused of balking the main issues,
and of playing around matters which needed the
firm touch of analysis; but I take the liberty of
saying, that these scattered shots upon the town
have had their aim. You have seen, my dear Fritz,
our old friend Dumas (not the Guardsman) apply
the stopper of a vial to some calcareous or silicious
28
mass,and watch the degree of the effervescence,
and taste,and try it with his blow-pipe, and
finally, setting it down, and putting his spectacles
back, you have heard him give, in a few well-chosen
words, the full account of the substance under his
hand.
It is much in this way,though by no means
with the delicate manipulations of the French
chemist
,that
I have been applying my tests, and
exhibiting
those special qualities, which give
character
to the whole of our society. I have coveted no
reputation of being a fashionable twaddler; nor do I
think myself very far in the road toward arriving
at that distinction. It seemed to me to be an
honest
man's work, to have a crack at those follies
which were growing upon our newly-formed
society
;
and the more honest, since nearly all the
journals
of the town were approving, and magnifying,
whatever fashion decided upon doing.
I have deemed it more politic to give a playful
trip to such light-heeled errors as good sense would
aid me in upsetting, than to affect the
arbiter
elegantiarum
,
by deciding upon either general or
special
proprieties. No effort has been made to show
familiarity with any other standards than those of
good judgment and good taste; and no pretence
has been started to anything more, or anything less,
than the character of a quiet, humble, independent
looker-on. French society possesses a luxurious
grace, a silken pliability, and a most grateful
amour-propre
, that would easily induce its
admirers
to prescribe from Parisian data the rules for our
social action; and on the other hand, I can
understand
how a man living for only a short period in
England, should grow into such sort of respect for
their foggy quietude, their aplomb, and elegant
indifference
,
as would make him zealous for the
establishment
of British regimen.
But it seems to me, Fritz, that every nation,
(and you have had the same opinion from me,
under the linden trees of the terrace at Frascati,)
must, and ought to have its peculiar social
ordinances
,
as much as those of its civil policy, or
commerce; and I see no better reason,
per se
, for
adopting the visiting hour of the Parisian, or for
dining in the night with the Londoner, than for
copying the Milanese in their opera etiquette, or
for showing hospitality with a pipe, and
entertaining
with sherbet and attar. The skeleton of
national
habit will always be made up by the hard,
osseous system of business; character will lay on
the muscle; and education, with taste and
refinement
,
will supply those finer tissues, and nervous
susceptibilities, which give to it social grace.
Opinion, climate, circumstance, all want their
action upon social organization; and adaptation to
them, at once easy, refined, and genial, make up
the highest grade of social elevation. This
adaptation
,
it seems to me, was perfected for France, in
those days of Louis XIV. when a Montespan was a
leader of fashion. Of the standard of education
and of morals I say nothing;but surely, for the
time, for the court, and for the national habit, the
ladies of Versailles were model ladies; wit could
never have played prettier on the lip of an
unfaithful
woman, than in the Vallire; and judgment
never sat with a more luxurious grace upon any
courtly dame, than upon the Maintenon. So too
it was in the age of the great Athenian commander,
when learning, power, and poetry had so ripened
social action, that the wit of the salon rivalled the
wit of the stage; and when Athenian ladies of
fashion
had lost, by culture, the masculine roughness of
the Spartan, the lascivious gayety of the Ephesian,
and the slavish reserve of the Persian.
Nor is this last allusion so far off, as it might
seem; with added moral (or the assumption of it),
political condition is much the same; there is the
same power to rise. And as Aspasia, by her
cultivation
,
rose to the heart and home of Pericles, and
afterward drew to the same station the humble
Lysicles,a New York lady of fashion, if only
she possessed Aspasia's wit and eloquence, might
do as much. Our social adaptation wants to be
directed in view of those changes of circumstance
which our institutions are constantly creating.
When there is no taste of a court to be humored,
when there are no established and titled classes,
who, by the prerogative of birth, carry from
generation
to generation, as it were, the dignity and
the rule of social aptitudes, every man's own
judgment
must decide for him; and it is in the easy,
refined
,
and gracious adaptation of his manners and
habit to his own taste, that what is called fashion
will find its perfection. Yet is there very little of
this sort of adaptation in the town.
Our houses, for illustration, are arranged by rule,
and by street; with no sort of applicability to the
peculiar tastes of the inhabitant; but only for its
party capacity, or for a certain quality of display.
Our fashionable ranks are made up after a similar
method:An education, fair in the rudiments, and
touched off with a trifle of Paris, a trifle of
equipage
,
a trifle of the opera, a trifle of Grace Church,
and a trifle of religion, completes the equipment.
Take any given set of what are called tonnish
people, and we may find one, just what would be
expected from his position and influence,possessed
28*
of fair appreciation of music, a pretty regard for
church matters, a knowledge of the journals, and
an easy air. A second, who is necessary to the
other, for some extrinsic quality, either of name, or
of mercantile position, has scarce none of the
qualities
of the first; and though they brood together,
under their wives' tuition, their sympathies rarely
meet. A third, with intellectual cultivation and
refinement, is attached to the other by loose
ligaments
;
either from special pride in the position, or
for the use that can be made of the wealthy
patronage
.
A fourth is essentially a boor; but by
extraordinary
wealth, or persistent search for just such
notoriety, is foisted upon the rest, and hangs upon
the coterie, with a kind of pleased yet foolish
bewilderment
,
that reminds one of poor Strepsiad,
listening to the cloud teachings of philosophy.
[15]
[15]
Clouds of Aristophanes.
In all this herding, there is none of that
adaptation
,
which results from careful observation, and
a desire to promote those comfortable elegances of
life, which make up a social genialty.
Take again the successful adventurer upon the
town society; he is well-looking, passably clever,
graceful, a good dancer, and has passed (
c'est la
plus belle rose de son chapeau
) a winter in Paris.
He is seen at the A.'s, who are of what is termed
the first set; this is enough to secure him an
invitation
to the B.'s,where, if his jokes be creditable
over the board, he is guarantied the entree at
C.'s; the sight of him in their box at the opera,
elicits inquiry from the D.'swho have daughters
so ugly, as to be drumming up very frequent
recruits. Nor is it until our hero reaches some
observing man, who has more of an eye for qualities
and fitness, than for reputable visiting, that his
character is subjected to an inquiry which secures
him
son cong
. With all the others he has
mingled by a habit of the class; nothing else
assured his position, and nothing else affirmed his
congeniality.
Let us look at a lady of a first set, and by first set I
mean whatever set is most talked of, most
conspicuous
,
most devoted to expensive public amusements,
and most famous for its balls. Madame is passably
looking, with passably looking children; she is
generous enough for display, and rich enough for
occasional well-timed charities; her carriage is
known, her footman is known, and her milliner,
and her clergyman, and perhaps her lover. She is
very likely a kindly sort of woman at heart, with
fair educationwho goes to the opera because she
likes to see and be seen; and frequents the balls
because
she loves attention, or oysters. And what
tastes could be more decided, or who could be at
more liberty to gratify them? And yet abundance
of people are sneering at her position and
extravagance
,
and, if there be a spark of scandal about
her, show the most Christian solicitude to fan it
into a flame. Very likely we shall find these very
traducers most anxious to get at her parties, or to
follow in the wake of her equipage. They do so,
because she possesess a fashionable publicity, and
not because they would enjoy a
tte--tte;
yet
they would endure a long oneto share her position,
or the softness of her lounge, or the luxurious suppers,
or any or all of those things which give her the
eminence
at which they secretly rail.And if it be
eminence, do you not perceive, my dear lady, that
by running after it with your infernal clatter of
wonder and scandal, you are exalting it to a place
in the public eye, that its own unaided qualities
could never secure to it?
Let her be the princess of suppers, the queen of
lorgnettes, and the sultana of the divan! Seek
your companions where you find agreement of
tastes, or of occupations; in short, give up your
tacit allegiance to those sets which, by notoriety,
are first sets; follow the dictates of your own
judgment
,refined
as much as you please with
education
,and
adorned as much as you dare with
charity.
As it is, our classes monopolize the distinctions, to
the discredit of the individual attractions. What
strange lady, after a year's life in the town, is
known as a delightful companion, or a pleasant
entertainer, one half so well as she is known for a
visitor in such and such circles, or as belonging to
such or such a set? And who, under the present
artificial range of classifications, can safely judge
of a man's character, by the houses at which he
visits?
A sensible man chooses his companion for
congeniality
of tastes; they together choose a third;
and presently you have a good fellowship, natural,
easy, and honest. But put yourself in a town-saloon
upon a reception day, and you shall find the
farthest
remove from this; and the more notoriously
fashionable the house, the farther is the remove.
Some are come to do themselves the honor of
making
show of the acquaintance; others feel that
they are doing a generous condescension, and
sustain
their position by a pretty superciliousness.
In this matter, let me note, for contrast, the easy
groupings of a Paris reception, where affinities are
more studied, and where the visitors mingle
spontaneously
,
as it were, and with a genial hum of
talk. With us, it is all the good lady can do, to
keep up an appearance of
bonhommie
, by adroit
manuvres from party to party. But while I
make this special comparison, in which the French
are more liberal, and truly republican, than
ourselves
,
I would not be understood to carry it
farther
.
Democratic institutions, and education,
ought to modify social action. Those Medici who
gave grandeur to what is now the Tuscan Duchy,
showed as much social as political wisdom, in
searching out companions and partners for their
children, among the most meritorious of the
Florentine
Bourgeois. Prescriptive castes in an old
country
,
and a feudal country, may be time-honored
and legitimate; in our town, they are either
prurient affectations, or the result of a publicity
and notoriety at which true delicacy is shocked.
They defeat the issues of rational geniality, and
make shelter for all manner of pompous deceits.
The absurd intimations which I have seen in
some country papers, that my letters were written
merely to unfold the pretensions of the vulgarly
rich, or the follies of an upper ten thousand, I
wholly abjure; if I cordially detest anything, it is
those eternal railers at an imaginary set, whom
they thus designate. It is not necessary to be rich,
to be vulgar,nor to be vulgar, to be rich. Folly
has been my target, wherever it appeared; and I
have endeavored, by the wide range of my
observations
,
to do away with the suspicion that I ranked
vice by social grades, or heaped upon wealth or
fashion any gratuitous reproach.
The tone of all my letters has been Republican;
they have tended, in their humble way, towards
the dismantling of those awkward and vulgar
scaffoldings, by which our social architects of the
town were trying to build up something like the
gone-by feudal fabrics of the old world. I have
pandered to none of the finical tastes of an Upper
Ten,to none of the foolish longings of a Lower
Ten, and to none of the empty and ill-directed
clamor of those who affect to guide the million.
John Timon, in the pride of his citizenship, as a
Republican, and as a New-Yorker, acknowledges
no Upper Ten! He will live where he chooses to
live; and he will amuse himself as he chooses to
amuse himself. He will neither take his building
schemes from the nod of Mr. Such-an-one, nor
wear his glove at the beck ofSuch-another. He
will try to consult those proprieties which reason,
good feeling, and good custom suggest; and he will
mingle in such circles as will receive him kindly,
as will greet him with a manly cordiality, and
entertain him by such frankness, intelligence, and
refinement, as he thinks he can appreciate.
Nor do I apprehend that these things are to be
bounded by houses, or by streets;or that any
man, or any set of men, can lay down the codes
by which I am to reach them, or prescribe the ways
in which I am to enjoy them. Good habit, in a
free society, is as much a matter of taste and
circumstance
,
as coloring in painting, or the
management
of the rod in angling; and who, pray, is going
to give us rules for the precise amount of chromes,
or for the exact length of line, or the dressing of a
hackle?
Good breeding does not necessarily suppose a
knowledge of all conventionalities; and a true
gentleman
can in no way better show his gentle blood,
than by the grace and modesty with which he
wears his ignorance of special formulas. If there be
not a native courtesy in a man, which tells him
when he is with gentlemen, and when with the
vulgar
;
and which informs him, as it were by intuition,
what will conspire with the actions of the first, and
offend against the sympathies of the last, he may
study till doomsday his etiquette, and his French
Feuilleton, and remain a boor to the end!
To concludeas the Doctors say,let me
suggest
,
that our Town Society needs nothing so much
as an added geniality, honesty, and simplicity. It
hardly seems to me of so much importance that
our streets should show a Paris
pardessus
, but ten
days old, or a new polka, in the fortnight of its
introduction
along the Faubourg St. Honor,as that
social fellowship should become easy and refined,
and a little wit, taste, and grace be grafted upon
the body of our Fashion.
And now, Fritz,
Timon hath done his reign!
It is hard to quit friends; and some friends I feel
sure that I have made. There are scores of honest
fellows, who, reckoning me honest, will have sent
me, by that chord of sympathy which stretches back
from number to number of my work,as it were,
on telegraphic posts,a cordial greeting. There
are ladies, too, not all of them old ladies, who, if
their confession means anything, entertain a kindly
feeling for the old gentleman who has talked so
honestly of their errors, as to make the crowd of
their virtuesdazzling.
They must be sure that he bears them no
ill-will
;
and that he will reckon their tolerance of
his garrulity as one of the best prizes of his
labor. I feel sure, indeed, that many have seen,
29
under all the apparent harshness of my speech, a
tenderness and admiration for those who adorn the
sex,more honorable to them, than to himself. If,
in the merest trifle, I may have quickened their
disgust
for what is vain and false, or kindled their
regard
for what is simple and true, I shall count
it my highest reward, to have made one jewel the
brighter, in the coronet of their charms.
My publishers have intimated their design of
sending my portrait to the world, with this volume;
but I feel quite sure, that if I receive such
flattery
at the hands of the kindly artists, as most of
the town-authors have secured, very few, even of
my most intimate friends, will be able to
recognize
me.
My humble position will remain, therefore,
inviolate
.
I have wished that my opinions should have
such credit, and only such, as their intrinsic value
would seem to justify. It is true indeed that I could
add little weight to them by an open avowal, save
among those who know me personally, and who, I
am sorry to say, have not yet learned to recognize
the hand and the heart of an acquaintance, in these
quaint and unusual labors of my pen. But I am
spared, thus, the pang of saying farewell to those
who do not yet know in
Timon
an old and
cherished
comrade.
Let me assure the critics, however, that it is
from no sense of shame, or of fear, that I forbear
to make known my name;nor, on the other hand,
do I feel prompted to such a course, by any feelings
of vanity:
primus vestrm non sumnec imus
.
I have amused myself quietly; and quietly
I shall slip away from public notice. There was
no flourish of trumpets to announce my coming
on the stage; and there shall be no hireling
mourners to attend my going off.
Adieu
.Mr. Timon
:I have read all you have written,
and like it very much. My mamma (for a wonder)
likes it too: so does Aunt Sophy. But they have
forbid my polking with strange gentlemen, at least
those who are introduced to me at the balls. Is
not this ridiculous?one meets such nice young
men at the balls, and nowhere else! I wish you
would persuade mamma so; if you could, you
would greatly oblige your true friend,
Terry
.Mr. Timon
,
Sir:I can't say that I like altogether the tone
of your remarks about Washingtonians. You
seem to have looked only at such stray
individuals
as have lost character at home, (which it is
possible to do,) and gone to your city to set up.
As for the members, I shall not defend them, as
they are at best but a shabby set of fellows, who
bother us amazingly in the winter-time, and have
no more gratitude for favors, personal or domestic,
than so many office-holders.
It occurs to me that you may be a disappointed
office-seeker yourself; if so, you are not the first
who has vented his spleen on Washington in
general
.
But I beg you would use discretion, and let
your wrath lie where it belongs; we do not boast
any consanguinity with the successive cabinets,
and only show them favor as they are liberal with
their wines, and ices. The Galphin affair was a
fat thing for them; and if the stupid louts of
your town had held their tongues, would have been
paid back in dinners, before the end of the session.
The Whig party is believed to be a very intelligent
party, and I trust it is so; but their family
management
strikes us as a little queer. General
Taylor is an honest old gentleman, and it is
fortunate
he is soto keep up the executive
reputation
to a fair average.
Cuba made us a little stir and fright the other
day; and M. Calderon (who serves capital mulled
wine) was in a sad fidget. Bucaneer stock seems
to be on the gain, and Savannah has led off with a
handsome figure; it is hinted that proposals are
afoot to erect a monument in the neighborhood of
the Pulaski House, to that intrepid adventurer, the
late Mr. Kidd. My friend, Mr. Foote, with whom
I strolled down the Avenue yesterday, is rather
disappointed
at the turn things have taken; he has
his doubts about Lopez's bravery, and says of him,
(he talks Spanish)
No est tan bravo il leon, como se
pinta;
which means, I suppose, that he is not so
brave in the shade, as in the `Sun.'
As for Daniel, he is hearty, and feels quite set
up by that snug dinner at the Revre. He thinks
Mr. Mann is better at `hints to young men,' than
hints to old ones; and that all good schoolmasters
are not, in virtue of the ferrule, good politicians.
As the mail is near closing, I can only give you a
sketch of the proceedings at a late Southern
caucus.
Mr. Clemens being called to the chair, and Mr.
Yulee appointed secretary, the committee, named
for that purpose, reported the following preamble
and resolutions:Whereas, the United States of
America are just now perplexed by sundry
embarrassing
questions, which, from the nature of the
government, devolve upon Congress for settlement;
and whereas, that Congress is not the most efficient
that can be imagined, and is made up in a great
measure of hot-headed Northern fanatics; and
whereas, the questions alluded to are vital,
involving
the dearest interests of a great many gentlemen
of the South, and collaterally of the North; and
whereas, the session of Congress is fast passing
away without any security being effected for a
continued, peaceable, and orderly possession of
privileges
at present guaranteed by the Constitution;
and whereas, California as a State, has repudiated
slavery in a most hasty, injudicious, and ill-advised
manner,therefore be it
Resolved
, 1st: That active measures ought to
be set on foot to turn the current of the world's
opinion, and to effect as far as possible, a revival of
those ancient and most respectable authorities
which sanctioned slavery, while they admitted the
duties and charities of our Christian Religion.
Resolved
, 2nd: That Henry Clay, in his proposed
arrangement of the points at issue, has flagrantly
overlooked the true interests and the rights of the
South, and has seriously compromised his character
both as an orator, and as a man.
Resolved
, 3rd: That the admission of California
as a State, in view of its action on the subject of
slavery, would be a crying injustice to Southern
opinion, and such a breach of our favored
institutions
,
as no Southern man of honest principles, and
no Northern man of Southern principles, could for a
moment consent to.
Resolved
, 4th: That the special thanks of this
assemblage are due to the New York Herald, the
Globe, and the Journal of Commerce, for their
dignified
and unflinching advocacy of principles dear
to the heart of every freeman.
Resolved
, 5th: That Mr. , the eminent
civilian, has taken a noble stand in defence of
institutions
which have been illustrated by his pen;
and that a subscription be set on foot for the
purchase
and circulation of his works, and that in
addition
,
the freedom of the South be presented to
him, in atobacco-box.
Resolved
, 6th: That in Dr. Grant, the advocate
of the Tabernacle, we recognize one of those
brilliant
intelligences which are in advance of their
age; and whose merit is only the greater, because
it is popularly denied.
Resolved
, 7th: That the noble State of
Mississippi
,
never recreant to her principles, and always
ready to Foote her debts, is doing yeoman service
for those institutions that have supplied her
coffers
;and
that her martial governor is applauded
in his sympathies, and encouraged in his devotion
to the progress of liberty, and the triumph of
arms.
Resolved
, 8th: That we cherish the
Constitution
,
though it was made in Philadelphia; and
that we are ready to stand by the Union, though at
the cost of association with the crazy zealots and
fanatics of the North. But patience has its limit,
and forbearance is only human; and if provocation
be renewed, the South will rise in her strength,
shatter the bonds of a corrupt and corrupting
connection
,
trample to the dust the fetters of modern
opinion and enlightened philanthropy, and place
her hope and strength upon the immutable basis of
freedom and humanity, as understood by Southern
jurists, and as illustrated by Southern chivalry!
P. S.If Mr. Timon wants further accounts, I
can only say facilities are not wanting. I have an
old friend in Mr. Clayton's household (head-waiter)
who is all right: I may further mention that I
have opened negotiations with one of the
chamber-maids
at the White House, from which I am led to
hope a great deal.
Yours to command,
Themistocles
.U. S.
Hotel, Saratoga Springs
.
My Dear Kitty
:
Here we are at length, and what a charming
place!such trees, and dinners, and then the
bowling alley; (do you ever bowl?) if you do, get
a pair of those pretty gaiters at
what-d'ye-call-him's
.
Papa has taken two rooms for us in the
east wing, and Marie sleeps in a little alcove just
out of mine. The galleries stretch around inside
the wing, and several gentlemenmarried
gentlemen
,
ma says(but very handsome) pass very
often. You don't know how pleasant it is to sit in
the window, in that
deshabille
you said was so
becoming
.
Ma begins to think so too, for Miss
Figgins
has got one just like it.
They say the company is not very good yet, so,
of course it isn't; but you don't know how many
elegant gentlemen there are lounging in the gallery
down by the office. I can see them now and then
through the trees. I think there is rather too
much shade; it looks gloomy, you know.
Ma don't know a great many people yet; and
she says I am too backward; I am backward; but
then it is very awkward always to come up and
interrupt mamma, when she is talking with a
strange gentleman. She says it's very proper; do
you think so? There are some foreign-looking
gentlemen (don't you like a moustache?) who
somehow manage to talk without being introduced.
I like that; there is something so romantic in it;
and then beside, you don't know but you may be
talking to some foreign prince. I walked for an
hour last night, under the front colonnade with
such a dear man! I shall be quite ashamed of
cousin Dick when I get back to the city.
Papa tries to make us go to the Springs early
every morning, but ma and I don't wish to. One's
eyes look so heavy after sitting up till twelve.
Besides, none but old gentlemen go to the Springs
in the morning, and some of them are vulgar
acquaintances
of ma's; and they are so abominably
familiar, that I will not bear it. Marie says it is
vulgar to go to breakfast in bare arms; but the
Fidges do; and there's a gentleman nearly
opposite
me, who I know admires them; he looked so
hard at them, he scarce eat anything.
I wish papa would keep a man-servant to stand
behind us at table; a great many do who are not
half so rich as pa; who, he says, owe him; but
he can't get it. Droll, isn't it? The bareges are
all the fashion; so are those dear little charms; I
wish I had bought more of them. If you are down
at Black's buy me a little dagger, a coral dog, a
hand with a ring, and a cornelian heart, and
anything
else that's sweet, and send them up by
express
.
You know I walk well, at least Marie says so,
and it's a great thing here; such everlasting
promenades
in the galleries; if you mean to come, you
had better practice. In the morning I write
letters
,
up by my window, in the white muslin, with
a flower or two in my hair. Then I dress for
dinner
,
which takes about three hours. I wish papa
loved hock; to be sure it's sour stuff; but then it
looks so distinguished to have the green glasses;
the Figginses do. I don't eat much at table; you
know one is so watched; and then, I don't know
why it is, but I never have an appetite. Marie,
good soul, brings me up a nice plate of cold beef
and pickles, every night.
Pa eats just as he does at home, and Ma can't
prevent it. It's very mortifying only to think of
the way he eats spinage and salads! I overheard
a gentleman who was looking at him the other
day, whisper something about
dejeuner  la fourche
,
at which the lady next hima perked-up sort of
thinglaughed very hard. What does it mean?
I always thought it was
fourchette
. Isn't it?
After dinner we go into the parlor, where it is
very dull, until the gentlemen have finished
smoking
.
Sometimes, though, we go out to ride. Ma
and I went yesterday with Mr. Templeton, out to
somebody's lake,one of the wildest places. Mr.
Templeton repeated some of Willis's lines. He
said it reminded him (the lake, not the lines,) of
Salvating Rosa. He is a very talented young man,
and I will introduce you when you come up. I
believe he knows French; at any rate, he
pronounces
soire
and
amour
beautifully. Before
teatime
we are all walking, and, perhaps, go down to
the Spring, or stroll up to the railway upon the hill.
I like it; but there seems to be nobody but vulgar
people riding, so ma has forbidden it.
Do you think, Papa took boiled onions yesterday,
and then offered to help mamma, though she looked
the other way, and then he wanted to know if the
Springs had changed her taste? I thought mamma
would have gone off.
You have n't sent me the last number of the
Lorgnette
. They say John Timon is here, I think
I saw him yesterday; he is a thin, tallish man,
with sandy moustache, but not at all
distinguished-looking
.
I should say he was about forty-five;
and, would you believe it, he has got a wife and
baby. Who would have thought it?
Some of Pa's friends stopped at the Union, and
they wanted us to go there. But one don't see
half so much, or get into notice half so quick. To
be sure Uncle Dick says there are better men to
marry at the Union, but they are not half so good
to flirt with.
A handsome gentleman sitting under the trees,
is reading a newspaper (or pretending to,) and
looking
every little while up to my window. I am
getting
tired, Kitty, so I shall close.
Your true friend, &c.
P. S.The gentleman in the chair is the one I
walked with the other evening,a charming man;
he has just bowed to me.
2nd P. S.I will tell you more about him in my
next.
Adieu, Chre Amie
.My Dear Timon
:Though your paper has
rarely
reached me, yet I have seen enough of its spirit,
to believe that some little account of my country
life will serve your turn, and give you some hints,
that you may possibly work over to good account. I
had made in town, by dint of jobbing, what they
call hereabouts a fortune; and not having gained
much footing in genteel society,partly because
we didn't care about it, and partly because wife is
principled against low necks, and the opera, I
determined
to set up in the country.
So I bought me a place of ten acres, in a
handsome
square lot, cut down the scrub oaks, and
hired an architect to put up, what they call a
cottage
orne
. It's a pretty affair, I suppose, though
the chambers are uncommon hot, and though there's
not much room to stir about. But a traveled
friend tells us it's very English, so we bear it as
patiently as we can. Besides, the young girls in
the town, think it uncommon handsome; and the
boys have an eye for it, and amuse themselves in
the fall, with throwing potatoes at the turtles. Of
course, I set up a carriage, and built a barn in
pretty Greek style with pilasters, which many
mistake for the house.
Wife, who is romantic in her way, proposed to
call the place Sunny Dell; but as the grounds are
remarkably flat, with the exception of a rather
deep kitchen drain, we settled upon Gooseberry
Park;which, as we cultivate gooseberries, seems
quite appropriate.
A short time after coming here, I was waited
upon by two or three of the elders, to become a
committee-man at a temperance celebration; as we
keep our wines, and small stores in a private cellar,
and as wife has a little political ambition for me,
we thought it best to accept. And a very warm
July session we had of it, and I should have
suffered
exceedingly, hadn't my wife, who is a most
exemplary, and prudent housewife, had a cool
punch mixed for me, against my return. But
unfortunately
,
our `help,' whom we got in the country,
scented the punch, and even expostulated with my
wife. The next day, our `help' told it to the
neighbor's `help,' who of course told it to our
neighbor's
wife, who is a `sterling woman,' and who
put on her shawl and bonnet to run into the
Deacon's
,
and mourn with the Deacon's wife, who is a
highly respectable old lady. I have great fears, in
consequence, of losing my election to the next
Assembly.
Wife at first, had her dresses made in town; but
the old mantua-makers who have have been
established
these ten years in the village, set up such an
outcry about city-pride, that she was obliged to
give it up. Though between fitting-on, and
scandal
,
and eking out four or five days at the cottage,
during which I am obliged to give up my wine,
it's an infernal bore. These milliners, by-the-by,
are the quickest observers you can possibly
imagine
;
and will report, as I am told, with the
utmost
accuracy, how much mustard I eat to my
beef, and how many times I use my napkin.
As wife is anxious to give character to our
grounds, we have put up a Chinese pagoda, which
is recommended I believe by writers on Landscape;
and we are now thinking about a rustic alcove.
The pagoda we thought would be a nice place to
take our tea; but the musquitoes are very thick,
and wife can't abide spiders, so we were obliged to
give it up. The boys, too, about the village, though
very well brought up, are inclined to amuse
themselves
with drawing very awkward-looking figures
about the fences, and on the pagoda, so that I have
been obliged to paint them all, a dull brown. To
give a little rural air, I had the walk to the gate
laid out in a circle; which doesn't seem after all so
much in the rural taste, since the country people
are sure to tramp across the grass;whereupon the
gardener proposes to set out some briers as a sort of
defence, which seems to me a pretty idea, and very
practical. The hedge that I put out in front, has
been so cruelly cropped by the cows that run in the
road, that I fear it will never `come to.'
As I wanted to get some credit with the
farming
interest, I concluded to buy Liebig's
Chemistry
,
a few Berkshire pigs, and a Durham heifer.
The Chemistry I don't find of much service, as
some salts it recommended, nearly killed the
prettiest
spot of grass upon the lawn. The heifer,
between
cash paid out for rape-seed cake, and
provender
,
has proved a sorry venture; and the first
day, the pigs rooted up all my wife's auriculas and
hyacinths. As for the sub-soil plough, three yoke
of my neighbor's oxen were put to it early this
spring, and snapped the coulter at the second bout.
I am inclined to think the sub-soil plough is not
intended
for rocky land; do you think it is?
Being in the country, I have determined to
revive
a little, the rural literature, so to speak; and
as I had a good Academic education, I bought a
Virgil, to see what I could do with the Georgies. I
found them very hard reading; and could scarce
get farther than the
qu cura boum
,
which, as the
Durhams were not introduced about Mantua, is
probably without much applicability to the `
improved
stock.' Thomson's Seasons is pleasant in
its way, and so is Somerville's Farmer's Boy. Yet
after all, these writers, and Theocritus among them,
seem to me a little antiquated, and don't touch
much upon the pith of the times. Can't some of
your town writers give us a little country
literature
?
for it does seem to me that the books are full
of nothing but town gossip; even the papers are
puffed up with heathenish terms about the opera
and theatres. As the country-people generally are
not very particular about beauty of style, or
anything
that looks like superior education, I should
think some of your town writers might turn their
wits our way, without much danger of being
abused.
I make it a rule, as well as a virtue, to go twice
to the church on a Sunday, which, as our preacher
is an old-fashioned Calvinist, requires some
self-denial
.
But with all his frightening words, he is
over timid, and very much under the thumbs of
three or four of the elders, against whom I observe
none of his remarks are ever directed; I suspect
they lay down for him from time to time a sort of
platform of opinion, which, if it is not altogether of
the old Saybrook mechanism, is at least as steady,
and makes as good a stand-point. The poor man
I find is subject, not only to a sort of moral
direction
,
but a regimen of dress, and household action
is laid down for him, against which, as he loves his
place and pittance, he don't dare to offend.
Even the old ladies of the parish take a motherly
interest in him, and by their gossip, mould him,
even to the cut of his hair. In short, he is as much
the village property, as the hay-scales or the
sign-board
;
and though he points always in one
direction
,
it is only under favor of the elders, and of the
gossips, that he can safely point at all. Let me
recommend
his case through you, Mr. Timon, to some
of the town reformers, to see if they cannot relieve
him from his cooped condition, and set him fairly
on his own legs.
As for enjoyment of the country, wife is
beginning
to doubt about it; and Dorothy, who is just
turned of fourteen, is absolutely pining. If not up
for the Assembly the coming spring, I think of
abandoning Gooseberry Park forever.
Yours,
Rusticus
.
P. S.If you should stand in want of a picture
or two of our town characters, I think that with
wife's, and Dorothy's help, I could send you
something
handsome.Mr. Timon
:
A year
ago I was married to a belle of the town,
and am beginning now fairly to sorrow over my
bargain: nor is this because she has lost her beauty;
for to tell the truth, I think she is more of a belle
now than ever; and is as complacent in her action
toward all the beaux, as I ever knew a woman in
my life. I can scarce come up a single day, from
my business in the city, but I meet her walking
with some spruce fellow of her acquaintance, with
whom she appears to be enjoying herself as well as
she ever did in my company.
This summer I have taken her to the Springs;
but there she is sure to be hedged about with a
troop of fellows, who will not so much as let me
help her into a carriage. And what is the worst
of it, she seems to enjoy the matter mightily,
much more than I do.
She has some property of her own, which I
regret
now, more than I ever chuckled over it before
we were married. If she was dependent on me, I
might hope to have a little control over her; as it is,
she pays her own way, and is as indifferent as you
can imagine. It was very pleasant at the first to
find her admired; but now, I must say, it is
growing
dullnot to say uncomfortable. I had half a
mind to take her abroad; and should have done so,
hadn't she been so delighted at the thought, and
insisted so strongly on a whole winter in Paris.
I assure you, sir, I am in a sad quandary; if I
forbid her humors about the young gentlemen,
she falls into a passion of tears, and talks about
her unprotected state, and her virtue, and all that:
and if I smile at her pranks, you will readily
imagine
that I am as uneasy as a man of honor can
well afford to be.
If you could give me a little advice, I should be
extraordinarily obliged; and remain your friend,
Senex
.My Dear Mr. Timon
:
As you have taken upon yourself to be the
censor
of modes and proprieties, which office I must
say, you have filled quite respectably so far, I want
to draw your attention to the developments in a
recent work by a distinguished lady, called (I speak
of the book, and not the lady)Truth Stranger than
Fiction. Such barbarity as is disclosed in this
book, and such extraordinary defence as is made
of these barbarities, by the officers of a
time-honored
Institution, ought to meet with a strong
rebuke
from every humane person (as I think you
are) and to make every woman of maidenly
sentiments quiver with indignation and horror.
Trusting you will do the matter justice,
I remain,
expectingly,
Dorothy
.